 -Prologue- Summoning a Farmer in Another World- My name is Hirayama Tatsuya, 29 years old. A black company arasa employee. TN: An arasa is an unmarried 30-year-old guy or about to turn 30. So….apparently, I was caught up in the thing called “teleported in another world”. On my day off, I went mountain climbing since it’s my hobby. When I was walking in the city on my way home, a magic circle suddenly appeared on the ground before I knew it… 「Oh, greetings, legendary heroes.」 After hearing that template line, I noticed that I’m already having an audience with a king on his throne. There are luxurious furnitures lining up along a long, fluffy red carpet, and there are many armor-wearing soldiers standing by the wall. Looking around, I saw brown and blonde hairs….there’s a group of men and women who are wearing blazers of high schoolers but they look like high school delinquents. Maa, these guys are probably in the same situation as me. 「Where is this place?」 A blonde with missing tooth, who seems to be the leader of that delinquent group, asks the king. 「This is the Iris Kingdom—- this one is the king. This world is in serious danger.」 According to the king, it seems like monsters flood every 100 years in this world. Every time that happens, the land and the towns are trampled and all places receive a devastating blow. It is said that the monsters that flood are very powerful. It seems like the knights of this world and the adventurers guild are not enough to defend against it so they usually counter it by summoning heroes. The heroes who came from Earth possess a number of super-powerful skills and he said that those can exert outrageous power. 「This is a skill plate. The skills you currently possess will be written there.」 The king distributed a 5cm x 10cm white silver shining card. Those are 6 sheets. One for me and five for the group of delinquents. 「Oohh! I don’t know what it is but what’s written on mine is hero’s lighting strike!」 The blonde with missing tooth, who seems to be their leader, shouted happily. 「Fumu. This lord….is similar to a legendary hero. It’s a cheat skill where the hero’s every attack has the power of lightning. 」 「As for me, what’s written is sage’s enlightenment! 」 This time, it was the long brown-haired delinquent who shouted. 「It’s a skill that makes you master offensive and healing magic from beginner’s level up to intermediate. If you train, you’ll be able to use all magic in existence….No, you can even cast the original maximum magic. 」 「Mine is holy maiden’s gospel! 」 「Mine is god of war’s fist!」 Presently, everyone is talking about cheat skills. Then, my skill plate is….oi oi, is this a joke? 「Oi, old man who has a rucksack over there, what’s written on your skill plate? 」 Old man?….Who the heck is this toothless blonde referring to? I’m only ten years older than you. And so, everyone’s gaze focused on me. 「Ah, my skill is — crop cultivation.」 Then, they all froze. 「My skill is crop cultivation. There’s also farming tool handling.」 「….eh?」 Everyone’s freeze continues. No, even if you react like that, only farming skills are written here. There are other garbled skills too. After the brief freeze— 「Fuhaha……..hahahahahahaha! Oi oi, we are called in this world to fight and your job is a farmer! My side! Seriously!」 「Hyahaha…..uhahahaha! Oi oi, are you serious!? It’s a hero summoning, not a farmer summoning. You’re a punchline.」 「This is exciting! A fighting farmer…..wahahaha!」 The delinquent group laughs at me like that. They are really stupid delinquents. That’s not how you should treat someone older than you that you met for the first time. The king coughed. 「Then, you lords will head for the imperial capital. There, you’ll be trained for the monster flood.」 The next night. We were camping in a large forest. It will take a day and a half walk in the forest to the imperial capital. As for the direction, we got a magic compass. According to what we are told, we only need to walk in the direction it’s pointing at. This forest is actually a kind of dungeon. According to what we are told, it’s a lair of a super-powerful monster. It is a dangerous place that is called the forest of no return. Currently, we were able to walk casually here because when we were about to leave the kingdom, a famous clergy gave us amulets. According to him, for the next 48 hours, we will not encounter any monsters unless we stimulate them on our own. By the way, I only have farming skills so it seems like I’m hated by the hero party. No one talking to me has become the norm. I couldn’t help it so I wrapped myself in a sleeping bag in a place a little far away from where they were camping….I fell asleep that day. —Scene Change— 「The old man seems to have fallen asleep.」 A guy with missing teeth said so while checking Tatsuya’s state. 「What are you trying to do, Miyamoto? You’re thinking about the one hundred gold coins per person, aren’t you?」 A blonde girl in a miniskirt said that with a shrug. 「Oh, I’m thinking about why do we have to share money with the useless old man. We have to look for hero equipments after the training after all.」 「Yeah. Any transmigrator can use those equipments, right?」 「We are talking about equipments with outrageous performance that can significantly increase our survival rate. If we find those equipments, we also have to share it with the old man.」 Then, the blonde girl in a miniskirt quieted down her voice while checking the state of the sleeping Tatsuya. 「…..this old man is a hindrance, right? As we are told, there were a lot of people who died among those who transmigrated, right?」 「Yeah」said that blonde with missing tooth. 「This isn’t a game. This is real life and death. And since we’re friends, it is normal to distribute things fairly. However, this old man is different.」 「and he’s a useless farmer.」 Good….the toothless blonde nodded. 「Everyone—-how about we leave while this old man is sleeping?」 Then, a girl with shoulder-length, raven black hair muttered. 「No, but….that’s….」 「Oh? What’s wrong Mayu?」 「This is a den of an ultra high-level monster and the effect of the amulet is only 48 hours, right? There is only one compass so even if he is not attacked by monsters….he’ll certainly get lost and die in the wild….」 The toothless blonde made a stunned expression while saying “Huh?”. 「Then, do you want to bring that old man? Are you going to give our supplies to the old man? Are you willing to lessen our survival rate? If you’re joking, this is not funny, right?」 「No, you’re right….」 「Right? It will leave a bad aftertaste if we kill him directly but he’s still a hindrance so…we’ll leave him behind.」 「That’s the same as killing him directly….」 「In the first place, that old man…is not a hero but a farmer. He’s a piece of sh*t which is a different race from us.」 With those words, the black-haired girl thinks of something and turns her gaze in the direction of Tatsuya’s sleeping bag. 「……I’m sorry….uncle…..」 Then, the toothless blonde nodded with satisfaction. 「Okay, let’s take all the water and food…let’s move. They’ll be wasted if we leave them to the old man.」 —Scene Change— The next morning. I woke up as the sun rose and was at a loss for words. 「They….really did it.」 The place where the high school students were camping has been cleaned up and the water, food, and money that the king had prepared….were all gone. – Farmer’s Garbled Skill Now, this is a large forest. It’s forest as far as my eye can see….I mean, I can also see mountains so is this a mountainous region or something? I’m currently in a place where I don’t know anything about. It seems like monsters appear when you’re in distress and I’m obviously in the worst distress. 「First, check all equipment….」 Sleeping bag Water bottle Pet bottle Knife Lighter One-handed pot Plate Salt and pepper Bread Chocolate Solid Curry This is all I have. They are the same equipment I had when I was returning home from my mountain walk. I don’t have enough food for a day but the most critical issue is water. I have 1500ml but assuming that I would walk all day, it won’t last. -There’s no water, there’s no food. Perhaps, as an omake, I should worry about the dangers of monsters. According to the king, without a map, it might be hard to even find a village because we don’t know both location and direction. If I blindly walk towards a place I don’t know the direction of, there’s no doubt that I will soon die from lack of water and food. For the time being, while I still can survive in this area, I should grasp the surrounding geography little by little. Then, I gave out a deep sigh. —Scene Change— Immediate priority 1. Securing water 2. Securing shelter 3. Securing food That is all. If I don’t eat food for a week, I will not die but if I can’t drink water, I’ll be out in two or three days. Securing shelter has been achieved. I found a cave near the place I was left behind. It’s about 2 meters high and a depth of about 7 meters. Looking around the cave, I decided to make a temporary sleeping place. I raked up withered tree branches and grass. Then, I burned the withered tree branches and grass in the cave. This is to smoke out indigenous insects and small animals. If I did not do this, I won’t be able to sleep since I’ll worry about insects all night. 「Now, it’s time to look for water….」 When I walked around this area before I discovered the cave, I saw a river. However, the water quality is a little muddy….it is a small smelly dirty river which I can’t drink directly. To drink its water, it is necessary to boil it to disinfect after filtering but I don’t know how to filter. 「Is it really possible for me to drink this…」 While looking at the muddy water that I had drawn using the pet bottle a while ago, I tilted my neck. For the time being, I guess I’ll leave it for a while and wait for the impurities to settle at the bottom of the bottle due to gravity… 「At times like this, I wish I can use internet….」 【Skill: Net Search Level 10 has been activated】 「I can use it!」 It seems like one of my garbled skills is this. 【Note: Level 5 skill is the maximum and 10 is the maximum limit break level.】 I took my phone out of my rucksack and turned it on. 「Amazing….the battery power became ∞….the signal looks good too.」 The voice of god said that skill level 10 is the maximum limit break level….I guess it’s a cheat. I am thankful for this. Then, I searched for a method of filtration using pet bottles. Use a handkerchief or a towel, after that will be things like natural gravel and sand. I tried it and it actually worked. Then, I boiled the water using the one-handed pot and drank it. The water was good and my stomach did not hurt after that. 「As expected, net search system is the strongest.」 That way, I managed to clear my shelter and water problem. —Scene Change— Now, what’s left is food. For now, I’ll collect nuts and hunt animals…can I do it? When I was strolling and wondering where I could find something to eat in the forest…. 「Co-corpse…..」 I found a skeletonized corpse in the forest. To be honest, I don’t feel good but let’s pray for it. 「But, why does it have farming tools?」 Looking around the vicinity, I found a ruined hut and a desolate field. Apparently, this person was a farmer in this place. So, it seems like this person fell due to illness or something while working on the farm. There’s a rusted hoe beside the corpse. 「It will be me tomorrow, isn’t it?」 Since this is a different world, there will be monsters, and there’s also the risk of starving to death. I looked around at the ruined hut but there’s no preserved food. All I could find that I could use are some tableware. Yeah…it would be nice if I could recultivate this field here and grow crops… The field is full of weeds and even if I plow it, I don’t have seeds. 【Skill: Seed Creation Level 10 has been activated. In your case, it is judged that the fastest growing crop you can plant is bean sprouts.】 That’s so elaborate. ….ah, beans of bean sprouts came out. When I was thinking about why my palm was shining, I realized that I already had a hand full of bean sprout beans. I don’t know why and in a sense, it scares me. I assume that this is also a skill of mine? Ehto….if I’m not mistaken, beansprouts are made by not exposing them to sunlight. I heard that if you put them in a dim place, after a week, you can already plant them. Maa, let’s just accept this situation that I received a ready-to-use vegetable seed. Then, I took the hoe… 【Skill: Farming Tool Handling Level 10 has been activated.】 「Oh! Music to my ears!」 Apparently, this is also a cheat skill. I didn’t feel its weight when I tried waving it around. In a blink of an eye, I plowed the area around and scattered the seed from my palm. Finally, I assembled some woods from the hut to shade them. And I heard the voice of god again. 【Skill: Crop Cultivation Level 10 has been activated.】 Hnn? What is this skill? Does it mean that I can make the crops grow faster or something? However, the voice of god did not respond to my question. 「….now, it’s dull if there are only beansprouts.」 Beansprout aside, the most important nutrient is sugar….in short, carbohydrates. If we talk about the most carbohydrate-rich vegetables, root crops are the fastest growing. This may be surprising but lotus root and carrots contain lots of carbohydrates. For now, that’s the only thing that I can use as a substitute for rice and wheat grains. 【Skill: Seed Creation Level 10 has been activated. 】 「Good good, carrot seed-like thing came out.」 I want to cultivate wheat and rice in the future but not now so I will put that plan on hold. When I was thinking about that, cold sweat flowed on my back. 「ah….this is bad」 I saw something really bad behind a tree. Right, it’s about 30 meters away from me – a giant wolf. It’s a wolf that looks like a Siberian husky only five times bigger. The name silver fang looks suitable for it. Or rather, it’s a monster no matter how you look at it….is the effect of the amulet already expired? Oi oi, what can I do? For now, I can only hold the hoe— –our eyes met. It is bigger than the tigers in the zoo and there’s no iron bar between us. Of course, my heart is about to stop. As cold sweat came from my back, my leg almost gave off. After a short eye to eye match, it dashed to me. 「Uwaaa! Don’t come! Don’t come here!」 I wave the hoe to intimidate it. However, that kind of threat won’t do anything against the wolf whose large mouth is already approaching me. 【Skill: Farming Tool Handling Level 10 has been activated.】 Eh? Skill activation? Huyin! The hoe pierced the wolf’s head and it even produced a wind-slashing sound. At the same time, something hot flowed from me that looked like something magical. It flowed towards the hoe….and finally to the wolf’s body. —-boom. There’s an explosion. Some sort of aggressive magic exploded in the wolf’s body. 「That is not at the level of farming tool handling….」 The flesh of the wolf, that exploded, scattered around. Looking at the carbonized pieces of meat, I was stunned on the spot for a while. After a while, I thought that maybe I could eat monster meat. However, when I picked up a piece of wolf meat, it was completely carbonized that I couldn’t eat much. 「It looks like it is difficult to get food from monsters.」 I made a deep sigh. I plowed a field with the size of 10 meters in every direction for a few hours. After that, I took my waist for a rest and put my mouth on the water bottle. 「….I’m hungry.」 Most of the food I brought is already running out. Well, strictly speaking, the solid curry is the only thing I have. I’ve heard that no matter how bad it is, you can eat it with curry but I want to do that as my last resort. I searched around for food but I was only able to find snakes. 「But I’m really hungry.」 I finally eat chocolate, the last ready-to-eat food I have. My hope now rests on….the carrots which I don’t know when I can harvest. 「There’s only snakes….」 I let out a deep sigh after remembering the snake I saw on a rocky place. If I can at least eat it….then, I gasped “Ah….”. —snakes are edible, right? Of course, a snake is full of protein and it tastes like bird meat….according to what I heard. I took out my smartphone and started searching the internet in a hurry. 「I see」 The snakes that I have been seeing everywhere are probably edible. It looks similar to the so-called striped snake in japan. 「Next is how to catch snakes…」 The next few minutes, I swam to the sea of internet and said to myself “Oi oi, are you serious…”. Apparently, if you burn your hair, it will attract snakes. What’s with burning hair? My head is filled with question marks but after investigating the reason, my doubts melted away. It seems like the sound that the burning hair makes is similar to the sound a snake makes when it wants to mate. Since that is the case, I took my knife out and started cutting my hair that’s already long. I wonder if I look like I had a haircut now or not. With my hair in a plastic bag, I started walking towards the rocky place where there were snakes. And looked back at the field— 「It’s already sprouting…」 It hasn’t even been half a day yet….I realized the level of cheat of my farming skills. —by the way, I managed to get two snakes smoothly. —Scene Change— Noon of next day. 「It looks like the beansprouts can already be eaten….let’s make a snake pot.」 The bean sprouts can be eaten after a day. I mean, the cultivation speed is not extraordinary but there it is noticeably faster. Aside from that, it is said that the snake tastes like chicken so I decided to cook it to a snake pot. I boil some water, pour the harvested bean sprouts, snake meat, salt, and pepper. So, let’s try eating it. The taste was thin so I put more salt and pepper before the hot water cooled down. I feel like I’m eating bird soup seasoned with salt and pepper. The bean sprout is also super crispy and very delicious. 「If the bean sprout is already this good….I’m looking forward to the carrots.」 While I was sleeping in my sleeping bag in the cave, I fell asleep that day while thinking of what other vegetables I should plant. —Hand riding rabbit The next day. 「I should be able to eat the carrots today.」 Today, let’s make a snake pot with bean sprouts and carrots. Well, my salt and pepper are about to run out. If there is no seasoning, it will be tasteless no matter what kind of boiling or grilling technique I do. Me eating will be for nutritional purposes only…. Maa, let’s just be thankful that I can eat something. I put the carrot in my mouth. This will be my first real meal. 「Ah, this is so sweet.」 Boiled carrots were so sweet like I’ve never eaten before. Its sugar content was so high. It is on the level that I might be able to obtain sugar if I process it. As for the beansprouts, they are crispy and delicious as always. While I was being impressed with the deliciousness of my cheat vegetables, a small animal appeared before me. —small animal….or perhaps a dwarf. The height is about from the tip of the middle finger to the bottom of the palm of an adult. In terms of numbers, probably about 15 to 20 cm? The exposure level of the clothes is similar to what the dwarves and fairies are wearing in picture books. There’s also a rabbit ear over the head. It has waist-long silver hair, blue eyes, and a beautiful westerner face. 「….amazing…it’s really fantasy.」 Until now, I’ve only seen monsters but this is the cute side of fantasy. This makes fantasy justice. When I was teleported in this world….this is what I heartily thought of. I stare at the eyes of the dwarf rabbit as it stares back. 「I-I-I-I-I! I’m! I’m not a bad rabbit that will steal your carrots!」 She waves her head as she shakes her head. Looking at her comical movement, it can only be called cute. 「Maa, you don’t want to steal it but….you want carrots, right?」 The rabbit nodded strongly many times as if she wanted to show that she’s listening. 「We are the rabbit race living in the forest desu. Big people call us hand riding rabbits desu?.」 「Hand riding rabbit….is it?」 「Hand riding rabbits perform rituals when we are about to be adults desu yo?.」 「Ritual?」 「Go on a journey alone….you will be recognized as a grown-up by bringing back a treasure to the burrow desu?. Marie has to bring a good carrot back to the village desu yo?.」 I see. It looks like carrots are valuable for them. But why do they treat carrots like a treasure? After thinking, I realized why. I’ve never heard of wild carrots. 「I see. I understand your situation now. What happened to you then?」 When I looked at her, she was looking at the bunch of carrots that I had put aside….when she saw the carrots I harvested earlier, she couldn’t help but salivate. 「……..」 「……..」 The hand-riding rabbit is staring at the carrots while her ears and tails are moving. 「Haaauuuu…..such magnificence…I’ve never seen anything like them….」 I put the remaining boiled carrot from breakfast in front of her. Sun sun, her nose moves as she smells the scent of boiled carrots. She salivates more and it now looks like a waterfall. 「You can eat it.」 At the same time I said those words, she began eating at the speed of light. When she took a bite, the hand-riding rabbit opened her eyes wide. And started eating with everything she had. 「De-de-de-delicious desu! This is the first time I’ve eaten something like this ssu! Sweeeet! Gooood!」 Maa, it is sweet enough that I’m thinking of making sugar from it. I was also honestly surprised by this carrot. After eating boiled carrot, the hand riding rabbit, shifted her gaze to the bunch of carrots I set aside again. 「…..If I could bring such a fine carrot home….I can triumphantly return to the burrow as a hero desu?.」 The hand-riding rabbit said so with greedy eyes. 「Do you want to take some?」 「Eh?」 The hand-riding rabbit opens her eyes wide as if she just heard something unbelievable. 「Can you even share such a fine treasure….are you sure you’re going to share it and not the leftover?」 It seems like carrots are treated as a rare item by their race. 「So, do you want to take some?」 The hand-riding rabbit nods over and over again. The movement of her tail is really cute. And like that, she carried three carrots tied by vines. She headed back to their burrows with a full smile. —Scene Change— That night, I was at a loss. —I just can’t. I just can’t catch any snake. Am I not using enough hair for the lure? In any case, not even one dare comes to me. I don’t think I can get by with just bean sprouts and carrots forever. I’m in desperate need of protein. 「Now, what should I do…」 It is said that beans are rich in proteins and can be used as animal protein’s alternative. Should I start cultivating beans now so I can eat them as soon as possible? I was eating boiled carrots while thinking about what to do next— 「Eh?」 Ten hand-riding rabbits jumped out of the bushes. 「Hello big person desu yo?.」 「Why are you–?」 「Is that big person that gave you the carrots desu?」 「Carrots desu?」 「Sweet carrots desu?」 The ten hand riding rabbits, all of them have the same beautiful face. I was at a complete loss for words. 「Is that….a wild boar?」 The hand-riding rabbits were coming towards me while pulling a wire. And I would have never guessed that what they were dragging using that wire was something amazing. Let’s assume that it was tens of kilometers….how strong are they to drag that at least 100kg wild boar? They are incredibly powerful contrary to how they look. 「What is that boar?」 「As thanks desu yo?」 「As thanks for the sweet carrots desu yo?」 「So, you are giving me this as thanks for those carrots?」 「That’s right. In exchange for the carrots desu yo?」 Ah, so they want to barter. 「But, how did you catch a wild boar…?」 The hand-riding rabbits stick out their thin chest and put their hands on it. 「We are hunters」 Their ears are sticking out too. These creatures are really adorable. No, I mean, it was dark so I wasn’t able to see it clearly but….about half of the hand-riding rabbits are armed with small spears. This wild boar is probably a rare catastrophe for them. 「Eh? Aren’t you herbivores? Isn’t that the reason why you asked for carrots….」 「Carrots are luxury goods desu yo. Basically, we are carnivorous nano desu?」 I see, it seems like the rabbits of this world are omnivorous. I mean, carnivorous rabbits sound terrible. 「That’s why we will live here desu. From now on, we will trade wild boars in exchange for carrots nano desu.」 And just like that, the number of people living together has increased. Even so, the problem of animal protein has been solved at the same time. The hand riding rabbits. They are creatures that don’t steal or do something evil. If I give them carrots, they’ll bring me beast and even do chores. I have free time now thanks to them. The biggest pro of them being here is that I no longer worry about not having meat. Originally, since I was living in a cave, I thought of repairing the ruined hut where the skeleton corpse I found was living. I’ve already planted wheat and rice but it will take a month before I can harvest them. After I’m done harvesting them, I’m going to do a full-scale search to find a human village. Since I’m still going to stay in this place for at least a few months, I don’t want to spend those time staying at a cave. For the time being, I cut some timber using the hoe and assembled it. This hoe…..it’s very dangerous. I wonder if it is the influence of the skill farming tool handling. I can easily chop timber as I would with a knife in vegetables. However, I find it hard to make boards given that a hoe is not designed to do that. I was in trouble because I don’t have nails but the hand riding rabbits made nails for me. They call the corpses of human adventurers as mines and they seem to process metal products from their armors and weapons. I thought they are very rabbit-like which only have animal instinct and hard and sharp teeth but they are smart enough to use fire and even process metals. They did not only made nails for me but they also helped me out making dishes and cups from wood. That’s in addition to building the house. Since they are tiny, they are more dexterous than humans in detailed work. They are a great help and they are very happy whenever I give them carrots. Well, as my honest impression on them— —They are very convenient. We managed to build the hut and a warehouse after one whole day. The size of the hut is about the size of a studio-type apartment and the dishes and pots left by my predecessors were cleaned and repaired. It greatly enhanced the cooking and eating experience. The progress of civilization has progressed a lot in a dash. I’m deeply impressed in various ways. By the way, the warehouse, it is highly secured and 1 elite hand-riding rabbit is guarding it in shifts. These girls are really convenient. After spending a while at the cave, I finally moved out. That evening, I used my last solid curry to cook a feast. Maa, I only cooked a special wild boar curry with lots of carrots as house moving celebration. 「Very delicious desu yo?」 「Curry carrot….for this to exist.」 「Delicious!」 「Is big person a god?」 「He’s definitely a god, right?」 「Definitely a god nano desu?」 The curry was gone fast and furious. I didn’t even notice that they had completely eaten it without me taking a bite. The satisfied hand-riding rabbits soon began to sleep on the spot and one of them got on my lap. It began sleeping there. Are these folks fond of me the same way the dogs and cats are close to those who feed them? For that reason, I also tried to pat her around her neck and back like what a normal person would to a cat or dog. The area around her neck, her ears, and her tail…..it looks so fluffy. It should feel great to touch. When I touched the tip of her tail, the hand-riding rabbit’s body shook. 「Hnnn….!」 「What’s wrong?」 Her cheeks are dyed red and the way the hand-riding rabbit looks at me is kind of seductive. 「…..more nano desu」 When she said that, I touched the tip of her tail again. 「Ah….」 With a wet sigh, the hand-riding rabbit rubbed her cheeks on my lap. Since it has become interesting, I played with the tip of her tail further. Then, the hand-riding rabbit’s body shook again. And she—- 「A-a-a…..amazing technique nano….. desu」 After saying that, she fell asleep on my lap as if exhausted. Then, the next day—- When I woke up in the morning, I wasn’t able to see any hand-riding rabbit. I looked at the warehouse but even there, no hand-riding rabbit is keeping watch. What does this mean….? Ah, I haven’t searched around that much yet. Could it be….I immediately looked at the carrot storage box and the field but nothing was stolen. 「What is happening….」 Are they a nomadic race or something similar? But how can they just leave without saying goodbye…..is it really like that? Maa, there’s no point in looking for those who are gone. Because of that, I continued my work on farming and dismantling and smoking wild boar that day. Honestly speaking, I was pretty lonely but there’s no point in saying that. And that night— 「Thank you for taking care of my children desu?」 A beautiful girl came with 30 hand-riding rabbits. No….I feel like she’s a human size hand-riding rabbit….I mean she’s a rabbit beastkin. She looks like she’s 15 years old. In Japan, she would be a junior high schooler or a high schooler. Her chest is modest but she has a great figure. Needless to say, she’s incredibly cute. 「You are?」 「Ufufu. My name is Sonja desu. Even if I look like this, I’m the queen of the little rabbits. And I’m the only king of the race….that’s why I’m this big.」 「Then, why….are you here today?」 「We’re moving out of the burrow.」 「Moving?」 「They discovered the production area of a superb carrot and even build a friendly relationship with the person who lives there…that’s what I heard desu yo?」 Ah, I see. So that’s how it is. They really love carrots huh. 「If we can provide you meat, you are willing to provide carrots, right?」 Then, Sonja smiled. 「Also, this girl….I heard something from her.」 Sonja pointed the hand-riding rabbit that slept on my lap yesterday. 「….She said your technique is amazing desu.」 Sonja licked her lips while looking at me from head to toes with her seductive eyes. 「….Eh?」 「I would like to try once….by all means desu.」 「Ah, no….」 「Hnn? What’s wrong desu?」 「Sonja is a bit….whoever looks will definitely know the problem….」 Maa, she looks like a junior high schooler or a high schooler at most. There’s no doubt that there will be problems in various aspects. 「Ufufu. Rabbits are a long-lived race desu. In other words, I’m — 22 years old desu!」 「Eh? Seriously!?」 「Yes nano desu! Do you….not like me desu?」 「—I don’t dislike you at all.」 And then—that night, a lot of things happened. By the way, rabbit-san seems to be one with the highest sexual desire in all of beastkins. They are in heat all year round. From that, it can be concluded—- —that as rumored, rabbit-san is indeed matchless. Three days have passed since then. I’ve been cultivating garlic since yesterday. Hnn? Why garlic? —because my body won’t last. Anyway, rabbit-san is matchless. The good night and good morning kisses are cut but…everything else is devilish. Maa, it’s not a problem that can be solved by eating garlic but at least it has a soothing effect which is helpful. Apart from that, I’ve learned how to use seed creation. I learned it using carrots. I can customize its characteristics like sweetness, fiberness, crunchiness, etc. For the time being, since there are women here, I kept the stink of garlic as unnoticeable as possible. Today’s dinner is going to be stir fry wild boar meat, carrots, and beansprouts…. My salt and pepper have finally run out. The yakiniku sauce has already run out during the snake-eating era. That’s even before Sonja came. As expected, without seasoning….it’s not unpalatable but it’s too tasteless. I mean, only the wild boar that the hand-riding rabbits hunted is delicious. It’s not in the level of branded pork but it is near there. For that reason, I feel more disappointed that there are no seasonings. It would be great if I could eat it with yakiniku sauce. Ah, just thinking of it, I’m already salivating. While looking at the ingredients in the warehouse, I can only sigh…. 「….I wish I can order seasonings from Japan….」 【Skill: Inter-Dimensional Logistics Level 10 has been activated】 That’s possible?! My garbled skills are really cheats. Along with the mysterious lighting phenomenon, an altar along with an offering box comes out in the warehouse. 「What is this? Why is there a Japanese style altar here….?」 『I’m the harvest—–farming god.』 A voice echoed in my head. 「Eh…?」 『You can speak with me because you are the master of farming, right? This is also fate. Let’s make your farming life better—-this is your luck.』 Amazing. I don’t really know what this means. But why did the god of harvest come out because of a logistics skill? 『It is normal for you to doubt.』 Did he read my mind? As expected of a god. 『However, as a god, I can let you cultivate the highest quality of crops—-but that’s not the only benefit for you. Given that, you will be able to live a better life. However, I don’t want you to quit farming.』 I don’t understand what you’re trying to say but, could it be that your vegetables are dangerous? 「For now, all I want is seasonings.」 『Umu. If you are saying you want to eat crops deliciously, that is within my jurisdiction. I don’t mind even if the thing you want should be taken from your previous world.』 Oh, seriously, inter-dimensional logistics is a cheat skill. 「So, how can I get it?」 『Wait a minute….fuhnn!』 ….that’s a gift catalog that you can get at a wedding, right? Now, there’s one in front of me. 『Open the catalog.』 I opened the catalog. Then, I look for yakiniku sauce which is a seasoning. —-Price: according to what’s written, it is 278 yen. 「You want money!」 『That’s why there’s an offering box there. Recently, the farmer who worships me, the god of harvest…. is decreasing. Because of that, I’m running out of money.』 「Maa, gods need it too huh.」 Looking at the lower right part of the cover of the catalog, there’s a digital balance there saying 0 yen. 『If you throw this world’s currency into the offering box, I will automatically convert it to Japanese yen.』 Even if you say that, I don’t have money. I headed to the main house while thinking about what to do. 「Sonja? Do you have any money?」 When I got out of the warehouse, I spoke to Sonja, who’s relaxing in the hut. I mean, she basically doesn’t work. All her work is done by assigning it to the hand-riding rabbits just like a queen. 「Yes desu? We don’t have a culture of trading or buying and selling but…. I have a bag of gold coins taken from the corpses of human adventurers. They were sparkling and beautiful desu yo?」 Sonja took out a big bag from her luggage and handed it to me. When I looked at it, there were more than a hundred gold coins. It was on a level that I couldn’t lift it if I didn’t put in a lot of power. 「Fufufu. I’ll give it to you for one carrot.」 「Your sense of value for money is amazing.」 Well, I guess gold coins are worthless for rabbits who are basically entirely living in the forest. Then, I returned to the warehouse, took a piece of gold coin, and threw it into the offering box. Of course, I did not forget to put my hands together and bow. When I looked at the digital balance on the cover of the catalog, the balance was one yen. 「What a rip-off!? 」 I don’t know but, I’m sure if you cashed this out in japan, it would be tens of thousands of yen, right? 『That’s how it works.』 「No, even if you say that….」 『That’s why I’m out of money. When people are praying to the god of business or the god of safe childbirth—-I can’t help but envy them!』 Maa, it looks like the other gods are even receiving thousands in just one prayer offering. 「But, isn’t this a little overkill?」 『It took me great effort to find a duck—-you have to earn for me!』 「I’m a duck!?」 『Though I said that I will make your life better, make sure you offer money.』 「Can’t you at least say it in an indirect way!?」 Apparently, this guy is violent when talking about money. Well, it’s a godly skill that transports goods from another dimension so it’s as valuable as thousands of gold. Even using my common sense as a modern man, even at a rip-off price, it is a reasonable price for something that came from a different world. 『Then, let’s work together from now on.』 「Yes yes, please take care of me from now on. 」 For the time being, I deposited 325 gold coins that I received when Sonja brought a carrot from me. The balance now is 325 yen. And then, I—- 「I’ll finally get my long-awaited yakiniku sauce! 」 Smoke suddenly pops in front of me….when the smoke cleared, there’s already a yakiniku sauce in front of me. 「Hawawa! What’s this!? Super delicious desu!」 Carrot, beansprout, and wild boar meat. Sonja shouted as she filled her mouth with sauced roasted meat. 「I’ve never eaten anything like this desu yo?」 「Agree desu yo, I agree desu yo!」 「Are you a god?」 「Meat, meat, carrot? meat, carrot?」 「Seriously!」 「Best thing ever nano desu yo!」 「Work of god nano desu yo!!」 It seems to be popular with the hand-riding rabbits. Maa, it’s good that everyone likes it. I also tried eating the roasted wild boar meat that was sauced with yakiniku sauce. -uh, ugh,uuggghhhhhh! The moment I bite it, the sweet meat juice full of umami overflowed that almost made my head melt away. It is thick but soft, the more you chew, the tastier it becomes, and the smell of the yakiniku sauce that enters my nasal cavity is so fragrant! While I feel like I’m rising to heaven, I tried putting beansprouts on my mouth. The crispy texture is pleasant as it sucks the fat of the wild boar on my mouth. And the carrot adds an exquisite sweetness as a whole….this is really delicious. I ate it in an instant and nodded a little like what Sonja did earlier. 「It’s very very delicious desu. I unintentionally ate three times desu?」 「Ah, I never thought it would be this delicious as well.」 「Fufufu? Do you know?」 「Hnn?」 「When I eat a lot of meat desu」 「….Hnn?」 「Rabbits will get aroused desu yo?」 Hey, we’re already doing it every night. Are you telling me you’re not even aroused back then? Sonja sits next to me and holds my hand tightly— —that goes without saying that doing it a number of times in a day is hard—in various ways. -Fox eared stripper, Succubus, and Adventurer’s guild The next morning. To be honest, I’m struggling. I’m almost reaching my limit by being Sonja’s partner every day. Although I haven’t even harvested garlic yet, I planted leeks and yam. As for the reason, leek gives lots of nutrients like garlic. As for yam, I often heard that it is good for “stamina”. 「Skill: Seed Creation」 Do leeks have seeds? Do potatoes have seeds? That question came to my mind but it was quickly answered. I mean, seeds come out. This skill is really useful. It will grow fast and furious…. When I was working diligently on the field—- 「Who are you?」 「Ah? Me? I’m Arisa, a foxkin. An adventurer.」 Fox ears…a beastkin? Maa, she’s like Sonja. She’s no different from a human except from her ears and tail. As for her age, she looks like she’s in her early twenties? Her height is around 155. She’s also flat chested but she looks healthy. 「W-what do you want from me?」 「Nothing, I’m just surprised? I never thought there would be a human cultivating a field in the forest of no return…. the border of the demon and human domain…..」 It looks like there’s also the usual ingredient of a fantasy world, demon domain. 「But niichan, are you not attacked by monsters? Looking at you….you neither have a smelly bag nor a spirit barrier….」 No, I’ve met a lot of monsters. However, I only need to “chudon” them with my hoe and it’s over. 「Smelly bag? Spirit barrier?」 Then, Arisa took out a small bag and a piece of paper with a magic circle drawn from her bosom. 「Like its name, a smelly bag gives out a smell that monsters hate. The spirit barrier creates a spirit field that monsters hate.」 So, they are like mosquito coils? Well, they are different but similar in the sense of keeping disgusting things away. I guess it is similar to the amulet the first clergy gave us. 「I also have other things that make me able to avoid monsters like my garments but….how can you live here?」 「Well, I have my own measures.」 Even I told her I just “chudon” those monsters, she will not believe me. 「Right….this place is supposed to be a lair of high-level monsters after all….」 Arisa tilted her neck and stared at me seriously. 「But, why are you here?」 「Ah, I am….a stripper.」 「Stripper?」 「This place is like a dungeon but you know that there’s a more dangerous dungeon nearby, right?」 I don’t know anything about it at all but I think it is better if I go with the flow. 「Yeah」 「That means there are corpses of high-level adventurers here. I’m supposed to strip them up of their equipment and deliver it to the guild. But as expected, it’s too dangerous to go into that dangerous dungeon alone…I can’t get in.」 「I see. So that’s what you mean by stripper.」 「Yeah. Aside from the things I can get from the corpse, the equipment will be bought by the family as a legacy of the dead and I will be paid by the guild by surrendering their guild plates.」 If there is danger, there must be a fee…I don’t know the market price but I think it’s a fairly conscientious business. 「Maa, it is hard to talk while standing….would you like to have a cup of tea at my hut?」 「Ah, I don’t really mind but, thank you.」 Arisa said “My throat is dry” with a smile when we arrived at the hut. 「Heh, this is a great herb tea.」 What she said is true. It was a herb taught by Sonja and you’ll only need to boil it. It even has a calming effect or something similar to warm green tea. From the information I got from her, it seems like there’s a city about 40 km southeast from here. She said that the political situation there is unstable and peace and order is also bad….until I gather more information about that place, I will put going there on hold. My life here with Sonja isn’t bad after all. I’m just a little tired. 「By the way, niichan, how do you really deal with monsters…..」 And one hand riding rabbit came into the hut. 「Are you drinking herb tea?」 While jumping around, she runs up my knee and then to the table. 「Oi oi, don’t just drink my tea without permission.」 「You stuff is mine nano desu?」 I can only smile wryly….. When I look at Arisa…. 「Ha…….ha………hand……….hand ri…….hand riding rabbit….」 Her eyes are wide open and so does her mouth. 「What’s wrong?」 She stands up from the chair shivering while taking two to three steps back. She then asked me with a voice full of fear. 「H-ho……how………….did you tame………one?」 「By feeding? If you give them carrots they’ll give you something in return.」 「You…..made…….a hand riding rabbit…….like that….with carrots?」 「It’s the first time I’ve eaten this kind of carrot…is what she said.」 While her mouth is still wide open, Arisa looks at the hand-riding rabbit again. She’s looking at her as if she’s not real. 「By chance, do you have…..devil boar….no, wild boar’s skin and tusk?」 After letting the hand-riding rabbits live here, they’ve already hunted two wild boars. 「The skin looks like it can be used for clothing or something so I’ve kept them though I’ve thought of throwing away the tusk and bones.」 Arisa suddenly became frightening. 「What! You must absolutely not throw them!」 「Wh? What do you mean?」 「Where is it! Where did you put them!」 「Are you asking about the skin?」 Arisa nodded many times so I guided her to the warehouse. 「Bingo!」 Arisa nodded with satisfaction and asked for a handshake. 「Handshake?」 「Give them to me! Skin, fangs, bones, everything! If you sun-dried the liver, I’ll buy it too!」 「…..I don’t really mind as long as it’s not the meat.」 「Negotiation concluded!」 Arisa grabs my right hand with both of her hands and shakes it. After shaking my hands, she handed me a bag filled with gold coins. Given its weight, it should be around 50 pieces. Then, she sticks up four fingers of her right hand. 「Four days! Give me four days! That’s only an advance payment….give me the skin, fangs, and bones first! After selling them to the city, I’ll deduct my fee and bring back the payment with a dash!」 I don’t really understand but it seems like this boar can be sold at a high price. While we were talking, Sonja barged into the warehouse while saying “it’s almost time for dinner”. And the moment Arisa saw Sonja—- 「E…..eee……..even the queen…..」 After saying that, she fell down. Side: Arisa On my way back to the city, I feel like my feet are lighter than usual. I’m carrying a bag in my back but it’s the first time that I’m returning to the city feeling too light. It’s because I feel like I’ve found a gold vein. —the fur, fangs, and bones of an A rank monster, devil boar. The adventurers guild will buy them on the spot with 800 gold coins….however, if I sell these directly to the weapon or armor shop, I’ll at least get a thousand gold coins. But those hand riding rabbits….. That niichan that managed to tame them is really something….. —-they are the worst fighters that live in the forest of no return. One time, there was a king of a country that accidentally trampled a carrot that the hand-riding rabbits are keeping near their burrow when he was hunting…..the bloody battle that comes next is still fresh in my memory. It was a war between 200 hand-riding rabbits and one country but no one expected that the war would spread to the surrounding countries. No matter what kind of carrots the major countries offer, they’ll only answer “The only palatable carrots for us are the carrots of the forest of no return” and kick their offer. They don’t even look at the carrots the major powers offer….. Maa, in any case, this means I’m really lucky! While feeling light and not even short of breath, I run all the way back to the city. 「To think that I’ll have the chance of getting close to that niichan! Thank god!」 —Scene Change— The hand-riding rabbits caught a bird. Given the size, it should be an ostrich and it looks like one too. The face is somewhat fierce or rather, it looks like a hawk. This is definitely not the ostrich I know of given its very wide wingspan. It looks like it can fly too. 「How did you hunt a bird?」 The hand-riding rabbits are an ethnic group of hunters but I’ve never seen them fly. 「We put nets between trees desu yo?」 「We put lots of nets desu ?」 「Then, we drive the bird there desu ?」 「Once caught, we’ll beat it out desu ?」 So, they induce the bird to go to a place where they set up a trap. I’ve thought about it before, though they look like a bunch of idiots, they are highly intelligent. They can process metals too. Maa, let’s not think about it and start dismantling this ostrich-like bird. Take out the internal organs and cut meats into parts. The meat looks like duck’s meat and looking at its fat, it should be delicious. Ah, that moment—-the fox-eared Arisa appeared. 「Oooniiichan! I brought the money from the other da……yyyyyyy….eeeeh?」 Her mouth opens and closes many times while pointing out the ostrich-like bird. 「That…..that’s a deathhawk!」 「Deathhawk?」 「Only super high-rank adventurers can kill that S-rank monster! Its meat, talons, and beaks….they can be traded with super high price!?」 「Ah, is that so? I don’t know much since it was the hand-riding rabbits that hunted it.」 「To be able to tame them….you’re really absurd.」 Arisa said that with a terrified expression….or rather, didn’t you say that before? Also, why do you have to be like that? The hand-riding rabbits are hunters but they are a really good race. 「So, why are you here?」 Then, Arisa brought out a pouch. 「Here’s the money from the sales of the devil boar earlier. I’ve already deducted my commission….these are six hundred gold coins.」 By the way, according to what I heard from Arisa before, the starting salary of a city guard is around 20 gold coins. Comparing its value to japan, one gold coin should be around 10000 yen. That means that boar sold at a high price. Well, Arisa was obviously happy the other day. 「600 gold coins? How were you able to put them all in that small pouch?」 「Ah, orichalcum coins. One hundred gold coins are equal to one orichalcum coin….so there are six pieces there.」 「Orichalcum coin?」 When I untied the pouch, there were six small shining plates. —-Orichalcum…..this is so fantasy-like. Yeah, I shouldn’t get too excited. If I put these in the offering box, that would be six hundred yen…. The money I’ve received from Arisa before and the remaining money from the yakiniku sauce I ordered plus these, I now have around 700 yen. 「What a great deal. Arisa should join us for dinner. You can stay in the warehouse if you want.」 It is almost evening so I can’t let a girl camp in a forest full of monsters alone. 「Okay. Thanks for the offer but…what’s for dinner?」 I replied while nodding. 「Karaage」 That said, I prayed to god and ordered vegetable oil and karaage powder. —pachipachipachipachipachi The sound of oil boiling echoes while the fragrance of karaage fills the hut. 「Here, thanks for waiting.」 I put the patter on the table and hurried back to the kitchen to make the second batch. By the way, I did not only prepare karaage but fried carrots for the hand riding rabbits too. 「Carrot? carrot?」 「Foooddd desu」 「Meat meat carrot meat carrot ?」 「I love karaage desu」 「Seriously desu」 「Meat meat carrot meat carrot ?」 Good good, it seems to be very popular with the hand riding rabbits. I mean, where does food go in their small bodies? 「More desu!」 「More nano desu!」 「I want to eat!」 Arisa then put a piece of karaage into her mouth. She opened her eyes wide—– 「Uwaaa…..this is…..!」 She closed her eyes and chewed again and again and again. After that, she swallowed it. She had a full smile as she stuck out her right thumb towards me. 「Oi, niichan!? What’s this? This is so delicious! This is the first time I’ve ever eaten something this delicious!」 「I’m not niichan, I’m Tatsuya. I have a name so use that to call me.」 「Ah, I’ve been impolite again. Then, I’ll call you Tatsuya-ani from now on….however, why are the hand-riding rabbits so fond of you….I finally understood. 」 「Half carrots, half cooking. They even have an alias which is gluttonous slaughterer…. From a hand-riding rabbit’s point of view, this place is paradise since they have both.」 「Gluttonous slaughterer….」 I laughed a little instinctively. Just like that, the first batch of karaage disappeared from the platter in no time. After a while, I put the second batch of karaage on a platter and put it on the table. However, the karaage disappeared fast and furious too. 「Oi oi, you guys….leave at least something for me to eat.」 「But it’s delicious desu yo ?」 Sonja is smiling happily while filling her mouth with karaage. Well, if everyone’s happy, anything’s okay. The third and the fourth batch…..while I was cooking the fifth batch, everyone’s fork finally started to stop moving. 「…..I guess everyone’s good now.」 I was finally able to sit on a chair with the last batch of karaage. 「Itadaki masu」 I didn’t taste it when I was cooking so I don’t know what the meat of death hawk tastes like. This is a luxury ingredient that everyone loves. That raised my expectations. I stab one using a fork and put it on my mouth. With just one chew, the juice full of umami overflowed in my mouth. So this is the reason why Arisa was chewing it over and over again….the more I chew, the tastier it becomes. 「Gooood!」 I couldn’t help but smile. —-ugh….yyyeaaahhh! I eat the second, the third. This is truly delicious. …..hot!! I almost got burned because I just put it on my mouth. —however, this made me miss rice. It would have been better if there’s rice. I feel like this karaage will be many times more delicious and reach the ultimate karaage deliciousness if there’s rice. …..I planted rice but it feels like it would take a month or two before I can finally harvest it. Or, it would also be great if there’s sake….I feel like this would make a great side dish. 「Thanks for the food.」 「It was delicious.」 「Tatsuya ani, in the future….if you can let me join your dinner again, I’ll be really happy. 」 And so, the karaage night party ended with great success. 「My long-cherished garlic….I finally got it!」 I’ve been riding a rabbit every day….Sonja has been pushing me to the limit. I feel like my cheeks have become deeper and I’ll fall if I still can’t eat something that would bring me stamina. Today will be garlic steak. The hand riding rabbits will eat too so I have to serve it with carrots. By the way, I shouldn’t give garlic to Sonja. If she gets more stamina, things will get worse. That time — the door opened after a sound of knocking. 「You…..are?」 A super beautiful woman was at the door of the shed. Looking at the size of her chest, she should be a G cup and she looks like she’s in her late twenties. She’s wearing something like a high-exposure bikini armor. She has silky pink hair that falls to her shoulder. She’s also incredibly sexy. Sonja looks like a junior high school student or a high school student so she could be considered as a young one. However, this person is an adult and the only word that can describe her is bewitching. 「I smell something delicious…..I am a dream demon succubus—- Maria. I was deprived of my power when I was expelled and my stomach is rumbling.」 Even though I didn’t ask her, she started talking about herself. I mean, she said she’s a succubus, and given her sex appeal, it’s quite convincing. The words “lewd pink” can’t be more suitable for her. 「Maa, since your belly’s rumbling, do you want to eat?」 It can’t be helped. I gave her garlic steak. After a bite – Maria’s eyes opened wide. 「This taste is impossible to achieve….even the demon world’s chefs can’t cook something like this. The only one capable of producing this kind of taste is a god…..I get it desu wa!」 Then, Maria ravages the garlic steak like she only has a minute to live. 「If you eat that fast, won’t you choke?」 She pushed all the meat into her mouth in a flash. 「The power of meat and garlic….! It filled up my power!」 「I don’t think you can digest it that fast!?」 Maria shook her head a little. 「Garlic is a symbol of energy. It is also a source of magical energy of succubae. It won’t be digested by physical activity….moreover, it will become another form of energy upon intake. To be more specific, if you put it in your mouth, magical power will be replenished. Maa, of course, the nutrition will also be absorbed but much later….」 「I see.」 And so, Maria turned to me….and she’s looking at me with flirtatious eyes. 「I ate garlic for the first time in a long time….it has been painful without it. Also, night activities are important for the recovery of a succubus’s magic power.」 「…okay?」 「With me being deprived of magical power, I will not recover in a day or two.」 「….in other words?」 「Ano….that….for a while…..can I trouble you in various ways….or do you dislike it….nano desu?」 So, I said my honest feeling. 「No, I don’t dislike it at all.」 Thus, the number of residents increased. —by the way, a real succubus was more amazing than those legends. -0- Three days later, during the morning farm work— 「Tonight, you’ll go to bed with me!」 Sonja clings to my right arm. 「Ara? Do you know what you are saying, lass?」 Maria is entangled in my left arm. I still have to do my farm work so give me a break….then, the two of them said something outrageous. 「Then, tonight is a threesome….」 「Uhuh! Let’s close the deal!」 I coughed heavily. 「Oi oi, you two….aren’t being unreasonable?」 Hearing that, the two replied with teary eyes. 「…you hate it?」「…you don’t like it?」 And so, I honestly said what I feel. 「I don’t hate it at all.」 Yeah, I totally don’t dislike it. However….I’m already worn out….I think. My body won’t last no matter how I think about it. I already have a steady supply of garlic for energy but it can’t catch up. When I thought that unpleasant thing, the voice of god echoed in my head. Pirorirorin ? 【Skill: King of the Night Level 10 has been activated】 「Why only now!?」 No, I really appreciate it…. So, a lot of things happened that night—- —the conclusion, it seems like it will be their turn to be worn out in the future. 「Do you know that Arisa is ripping you off?」 Today, after receiving the payment from the death hawk from Arisa, the succubus Maria said that. 「I’m telling the truth. If we’re talking about death hawk….if you’re going to trade one to the adventurer’s guild, you’ll get 1500 gold coins.」 I received 750 gold coins. She certainly said “I’ve deducted my commission!” like always…..however, taking half would be too much. 「Tatsuya-sama? What are you planning to do?」 「Uhuh….」 I don’t want to doubt others too much. But for the time being, it is necessary to clarify the facts. 「In that case, I’ll go.」 Just now, the hand-riding rabbits have hunted a death hawk. 「Where are you going?」 「I’ll check the purchase price at the adventurers guild of the nearest city. It’s a half-day walk from here, right?」 Then, Sonja, the queen of the hand riding rabbits, jumped in to join. 「Ufufu! The city, is it? I’m going too desu?」 「Ah, if you’re going with me, you are free to do so.」 I currently have 750 gold coins….to be precise, I have 7 orichalcum coins and 50 gold coins. Converting it to yen, it should be 7,500,000. I also know what the city looks like and I kind of want to buy household goods and supplies. 「Shopping? Shopping?」 Sonja began to happily skip. This fellow tends to hop while waving her tail when she’s happy. 「Ah, then I’ll go too.」 「You can follow me if you want. If we have enough, I’ll even buy you clothes and accessories.」 Hearing me say that, Maria’s eyes change color and she wraps her arm around my arm. 「You’re really a gentleman….I like it. You’re not only fascinating at night.」 The way she looks at me….it’s kind of painful. 「Ufufu. I’ll bring thirty carrots.」 Oi oi, it’s only a day trip. 「Are you going to eat it all in one day?」 「Yes desu?」 No matter how you think about it, she eats too many carrots…. And like that, we decided to go to the city. After eating lunch and a little commotion….we finally went hiking. That’s right, we just walked through the forest like that. On the way, Sonja hunted down two death hawks we encountered in the forest. The hand riding rabbits are already good but Queen Sonja is on a whole new level. She took down a death haw, which is a high-ranking monster, with just a hit from the back of her hand. We’re walking through the forest for three hours. We’re halfway to the city…. 「Ah! That is….we encountered something unexpected!」 Sonja found a ten-meter-tall dragon. Sonja and Maria worked together and after ten seconds of battle….the dragon died. Yeah, it’s true, the dragon was indeed defeated easily. The terrain is lightly destroyed, the surroundings are charred, and it is obvious that a fierce battle happened here…. Well, let me explain the details. The dragon attacked first using breath. The two of them evaded it. After that, Maria grabbed the front leg of the dragon and shoulder throw it to Sonja. Sonja meets the dragon in the air with an attack. The dragon fainted and my eight companions beat up the dragon. The battle ended in ten seconds. —-how do I say this….their f*cking strong. By the way, this dragon seems to be called an arc dragon. 「Maa, I’m the duchess of the succubus race. I have lost my position in the demon world but thanks to Tatsuya-sama’s grace every night, I’m now in perfect condition.」 「ufufu. Are dragons delicious desu yo?」 Of course, we’ll take the meat. As for other materials like bones, skins, and fangs, we’ll sell them in the city. I want to know if the death hawk is really worth 1500 when sold….if so, the errand business costs too much. By the way, the death hawk is as big as an ostrich. As for the arc dragon, it’s about 10 meters. To be honest, we’re already trouble on how to transport the death hawk—- Pirorirorin ? 【Skill: Item Box Level 10 has been activated】 And I heard god’s voice. Maa, item box is probably “that” skill that doesn’t need an explanation. By the way, since the skill level is the highest, that means I don’t have to be worried about space. In addition, it seems like there is a quantity limit of up to one ton. Time is also not flowing in it so everything is preserved. Well, it’s great. —–I wanted to taste dragon meat at least once. Well, everyone who likes fantasy will surely understand how I feel. -0- And we arrived in the city. By the way, the city was like a medieval fantasy world city….well, it’s a medieval fantasy world city. There were also skewer stalls. We’re already hungry so I brought some. 「ufufu. Very bad desu yo. Very very bad desu yo.」 「It is certainly bad. I feel like I’m eating garbage.」 I also ate but compared to the meat of death hawk…..well, it’s edible but it tastes so bad. I feel like they grilled rotten meat and sold it to me. The two ladies can’t eat it so they pushed their skewers to me making me eat three sticks of garbage. It would have been better to throw it away but I was educated to not waste food by my mother. -0- And we arrived at the adventurers guild. I tried to observe the surroundings immediately after entering. This is indeed how I imagine what an adventurers guild of a fantasy world looks like. There’s an elf receptionist at the counter so we head there without hesitation. 「Can you purchase materials….」 「Purchase materials? What do you have?」 I called the item box. By the way, its size is 1.5 meters in height, width, and length. I can put anything to it and I can naturally pull them out. I took out a death hawk and put it on the counter. 「…..de…..death hawk?」 The receptionist opened her mouth wide in surprise. 「By the way, I want to take the meat back home.」 「Then, we will purchase it for 1500 gold coins….15 pieces of orichalcum coins. Ah, we’ll also deduct the dismantling fee. However, since you can hunt an S rank monster….you shouldn’t be just anybody.」 Hmm. This confirmed how much commission that fox eared beastkin Arisa takes. She said that she already deducted her commission from the death hawk and passed me with a mere sum of 750 pieces of gold coins. Well, let’s think about that later. For now, let’s sell them. 「By the way, there are two more death hawks….」 「….eh? No, customer-sama, that’s not a good joke. Even ultra-high rank adventurers can’t hunt several death hawks…..eeehhh!?」 Seeing the two additional death hawks, the elf receptionist turns blue. 「45 orichalcum coins….I have to go….to the guild vault….?」 「Wait, we still have to add the arc dragon.」 When I said that, the elf receptionist’s face was cramped. 「Please, don’t joke around. Even if you can hunt several death hawks, an arc dragon is on a whole new level….the only one that can return alive after hunting one is a group of heroes…. In the first place, it is impossible to put something that big into an item box….」 Then, I took out the dragon’s head out of the item box. Maa, it is better to say making it peek than actually taking it out. Anyway, there is a huge dragon in my item box….the dragon head, which is about a meter big, shows up. 「….」 The receptionist froze. Pakupakupaku…..The receptionist opens and closes her mouth several times then hyperventilates for a while. At the same time, the adventurers in the guild all pointed at the dragon’s head and became nervous. Then, after a while, the guild lady finally regained her composure a little and talked into a mosquito-like voice. 「……that…impossible….can’t….?」 The guild lady is very surprised. That probably means that the arc dragon is something very dangerous. However, the two killed it in no time. That means they’re worse….. 「……arc dragon is 10000 gold coins. Death hawk is 1500 gold coins. The total is 14500 gold coins.」 That’s 145 million yen….this is totally unexpected….. However, if I put them in the offering box, it will be 14500 yen. It doesn’t feel that much because of that zenigeba god. TN: Zenigeba is someone that clings to money —when I get back, I’ll buy a 500ml can of beer in the offering box. 「Ano….there’s no way this guild’s vault has that much money…..we have to get money from nearby guilds in order to get that much so, can you wait for it until tomorrow?」 「What time tomorrow?」 「Around early afternoon….probably.」 Maa, it can’t be helped. I mean, there’s no point even if I complain. 「I understand. Oi, Sonja? Maria? Do you mind if we stay here tonight?」 「Then, let’s take a room where we all can stay.」 「Yeah, I have no problem with that.」 「…..then please consider others. Don’t make too much noise later…..」 They’re at a level where any inn we’ll go to will surely complain. When I was thinking how to make their voices at night lessen a little—- 「In the forest of no return….I met a disaster! Call the guild master!」 The strong-looking adventurer, who opened the door of the guild vigorously, shouted that with a pale face. 「Disaster….what disaster!?」 「Oi oi, are you serious!」 「What specific monster did you meat!?」 The strong-looking adventurer screamed again while running to the counter. 「Evil cyclops….! An SSS class!」 Those words made the whole guild silent. Then, a sorcerer screamed and chaos broke out. 「Impossible!? Don’t talk with the guild master, run to the king right now!」 「No, even the king can’t deal with it! Send someone to the imperial capital!」 The receptionist, who’s already pale because of the arc dragon, turned paler. 「A……aaa…..ahaha…..」 With her face turning blue, she immediately left the counter and went to the place that looks like the guild master room. 「Oi, Maria? Is an evil cyclops really a bad news?」 「It’s around 50 meters tall. Maa, that’s it desu wa.」 That’s terrible. That’s already gigantic, right? And at that time, all the gaze of the adventurers inside the guild turned to a swordsman in his fifties drinking tea at the table in the corner of the room. 「—Adventurer King Marx-sama!」 「The world’s best S rank adventurer is actually in this city, we’re saved! Please protect our city from the evil cyclops!」 The man who was called Marx shook his head. 「Are you telling me to die?」 「But you’ve already defeated an evil cyclops once—-」 「At that time, I have companions so we still have some leeway….but now, I’m alone. If you hunt it solo, given that you have the same ability as mine, you’ll only have 50% chance of subduing it.」 「But….!」 Then, Marx smiled. 「—if you have the guts to subdue the evil cyclops with me….I’ll think about it.」 「No, but….」 「You bastard don’t even have the courage to put your life on the line for others. I’m sorry but I love my life too. Well, if I can team up with someone with the same level as me….」 「How about someone with a higher level than you….」 And Maria walked to Marx—- 「Please excuse me for being silent all this time.」 「You are…..Maria? Did something happen in the demon world?」 「Well, some things」 Maria nodded emotionally. 「It is probably the reason why we were able to reunite here. Let me join you in subjugating it.」 「No, even if we team up, it will still be hard….we surely can beat it but there will surely be damage too….」 Then, Maria looked at Sonja. 「She’s the queen of the hand riding rabbits. We’ll take her with us.」 「Hand riding rabbit….seriously….? No, but….then….!?」 Then, Marx smiled. 「Let’s divide the reward into three equal portions.」 「Okay nano desu」 That’s amazing. I don’t know what’s happening but I think it’s great. And, well, what’s really—- —-we just came to the guild to verify our suspicion on Arisa….now it turned into something outrageous. As a conclusion, the next morning — the three of them came back to the inn I’m staying unscathed. Upon hearing what happened, it seems like the terrain destruction was enough to remake the map of this region…. I mean, I already heard it from the guild members yesterday but Marx-san’s is really on a whole new level compared to others. The other two are also ridiculously strong so they can fight side by side. By the way, the corpse of the evil cyclos is…..surprisingly 50000 gold coins. Maa, if I put it all on the donation box, it will be 50,000 yen…. Even for me, that’s a lot of money. Good, when we get home, I’ll buy a decent level red wine. I heard that Sonja and Maria are good drinkers. When I was thinking of that, Marx-san asked me to go out to the courtyard of the inn. 「Eh? In the courtyard? Why?」 「Just go.」 And so, we went out to the courtyard. The courtyard of the inn has fallen leaves dancing on it. There, Marx-san looked at me seriously. 「Hold your weapon」 Weapon? I don’t have any….for the time being, the only weapon-like thing I have is a hoe. As I was told, I held it. That moment, Marx-san opened his eyes wide. After a while, he made an expression that he had just eaten a bitter worm. Then, finally, gently smiled and tapped my shoulder. 「It seems that it’s true」 「….true?」 「I’ll leave Maria to you. As you can see…..she’s a delicate woman. Please treat her with care.」 What are you talking about? 「What do you mean?」 「Don’t mind it. Also, if you encounter any trouble, come visit me.」 Since he presented me with a business card, I took it with both hands. I don’t know what’s happening but he doesn’t seem to be a bad person. 「Well then, I’m going shopping with Tatsuya and Maria desu ?」 —And so, we went shopping in the city. When we received the money from yesterday’s transaction, we returned to our house in the forest. By the way, Marx-san received the money for the cyclops at a later date and we took our share from him later. -Marx’s POV- After leaving the guild, we explored the vast forest of no return. And we found the evil cyclops soon. It’s because it’s fucking gigantic. It’s about 50 meters high. If I fight with this thing alone, the chance of winning is 50/50. This is the reason why there are three of us. This will make things easier. And it was a landslide victory. I mean, the hand-riding rabbit queen was a cheat grade. And what surprised me the most was that Maria is much stronger than she used to be when she was still adventuring with me. Then, that night, we made a camp. The hand-riding rabbit went to bed early after eating a carrot she brought. While watching the bonfire, I asked Maria. 「Maria, what happened to the demon realm?」 「In the end, I had no choice but to return to the human world….desu wa.」 「That time, you got involved in a power struggle of the demon realm so you had no choice but to go to the human world even though you’re still a young girl.」 「If I wasn’t picked up by your adventurer party….I would have probably died. You also taught me how to fight.」 「At first, we only planned to leave chores to you. However, you’re too talented especially in fighting arts….the great mage even happily taught you magic. “Are you really human” that’s what I thought back then.」 「Maa, I’m from a duke’s family of the demon realm….I think my bloodline has an innate talent for fighting. The 15 years I spend with you…it’s not bad.」 「—these last five years since you’ve returned to the demon realm is painful.」 Marx’s eyes were teary and Maria agreed to what he said. He gently pats her head just as he did to Maria as a child. 「Hey, Maria.」 「What is it?」 「You’ve become a fine woman.」 That’s my honest thought. This child was a beauty even when she’s still a girl much more now. Well, that’s natural because she’s a succubus. That time, when we picked her up when she’s still a girl, everyone thought the same….that she’ll grow up to be a fine woman who would struck any man’s heart. 「Even if it’s only flattery, I’m glad.」 Maria and I laughed but I lowered my head. 「I’m sorry.」 「What are you apologizing for?」 「…..you’ve returned to the demon realm alone. Everyone has various opinions and ideas but it was me who told you to go back in the end. And for me, that still struck sadness and repentance.」 「You’re the same as before….desu wa. Marx-sama, I’m not a child anymore. I’m the one who decided to go back five years ago and I did not regret that.」 「………No, however……..as your guardian…..」 Then, Maria laughed happily. 「Marx-sama is not my guardian anymore. But I’m really happy with how you feel.」 Yes, this girl is already in her late twenties. She’s not the less than 10-year-old girl we picked up before. Right, I’m not her guardian anymore. Then—the world I wasn’t able to say that time….now…. 「Hey, Maria, if you don’t have anywhere to go to after being banished from the demon realm, why don’t you come with me?」 「Again….are you going to make an adventurer party?」 「No, I’m not going back to being an adventurer anymore. I’m only going to live my life normally.」 「Then, why?」 「—I want a child. I’m also….in my sixties. You’ve become a fine woman….No, to tell you the truth, when I saw you before, I already wanted to adopt you as my daughter….before I knew it, you’re already a fine woman. Don’t you want to live with me?」 That moment, Maria became obviously surprised. 「To tell you the truth, I only see Marx-sama as a man and not as a father.」 「Then–」 Maria shook her head. 「If you had asked me before I returned to the demon realm….I would have been very happy. I would also consider it positively.」 「What do you mean?」 「—-the reason I’ve become much stronger than before….are you not curious?」 Now that she mentioned it… Even though five years have passed, she becomes twice as powerful and she’s even comparable to my power now. 「Succubus gets magical power from life. A succubus’s horniness is strong but that doesn’t mean she can easily be subdued. Once she has given her body to a man, she will be dyed by the magical power of her first night and it will affect her for the rest of her life.」 「That means….you…..?」 「—yes, I’m already dyed. When I saw him at first glance, I instinctively understood. I knew that I would be blessed by that man’s magical power….」 「What kind of….man is he?」 「Marx-sama should have already met him in the adventurers guild.」 Are you talking about that dull niichan? Oi oi, seriously….I instinctively thought so. 「….is he strong?」 「A succubus instinctively tries to gain magical power from the strong. So, I…I guess that’s the reason why I was attracted to Marx-sama in the old days. And Sonja….the hand riding rabbit queen also instinctively realized something similar to mine and live with that man.」 「…I see」 Then, I said to Maria after sighing lightly. 「Can I try him?」 「Try?」 「Ah, if we are only fighting for a woman….as a man, I would have withdrawn already. However….as a father, I will not easily back down. I want to check his ability myself.」 Then, Maria made her sweetest smile today and giggled. 「Your overprotectiveness hasn’t changed.」 「Ah right. That’s right. ….a long time ago, you were so mischievous….but I really love that little brat Maria back then and even the grown-up Maria now.」 「Yeah, I love you too—Uncle Marx.」 -0- The next day. I called that guy called Tatsuya at the courtyard of the inn he’s staying at. 「My apologies but I would prefer if you hold your weapon now.」 With my words, Tatsuya holds a hoe. What is he thinking….is what I thought first but the next moment, I immediately understood what Maria had said. —I don’t feel like I can win. No, I’m sure I’ll lose. At first glance, he’s full of gaps. As a swordsman, I can kill him a million ways. However, I understood it with my instinct as a swordsman. —the moment I attack, I’ll die. If there is something like the world’s strongest ranking, I’m sure that I’m at a high place. Even so….I realized my complete defeat against this man without an actual battle. 「It seems that it’s true」 「….true?」 If it is this guy, I can let him take my Maria. He completely convinced me—I’m saying this as a warrior. 「I’ll leave Maria to you. As you can see…..she’s a delicate woman. Please treat her with care.」 -0- Then, the three of them returned to their house in the forest of no return. When I part ways with them, I continue looking at their backs as I wave my hands— —I’m looking forward to my grandchild. When I noticed what I was thinking, I could only smile wryly. On the way back to the guild……. We stopped by the material dismantling shop. And since we are bringing the corpse of a gigantic arch dragon, I naturally store it in my item box. It should be the guild who’ll handle all material after we receive the money. They are supposed to decrease the burden of adventurers this way along with minimizing the chance of materials to be stolen. Maa, because of my own kindness and the guarantee of Marx-san….I undertook transporting the materials to the dismantling shop. Of course, we’ll also receive commission so let’s just treat this as a pocket money job. It is a very large building and the workshop can be easily seen in the reception. There, I saw a tweezer-like tool that is around 5 meters but is being used by only one person. —-ooohhhh….I would never see something like this in Japan. When I was checking out the strangeness of this world, a muscular old man with white beard came out from the back of the workshop. 「Hey boy! Do you find dismantling unusual?」 「Yeah, it’s my first time seeing someone dismantling….it’s interesting.」 I’m always one of those guys who look around DIY and carpentry tools at Home Center. It’s really fun to look at different tools while imagining how you use them yourself. 「Ah, I see. So, you’re a rookie who begged the guild for material transportation commission…?」 No, that’s not it but…..maa, if I deny it, it will only complicate the story. 「Let me tell you this. The reward money has already been paid by the guild which means everything else from now on will be the responsibility of the dismantling shop.」 Wait a minute. 「…..Eh?」 We were brought to the office of the dismantling shop and they served the three of us tee and sweets. 「You’re hungry, right? I had a hard time when I was just starting out too. Maa, I can’t give you a big deal but you can accompany this old man and I can even take care of you.」 Ah, this old man is a good guy. Looking at him, he’s not a wealthy person but….yeah, he’s surely a good guy. 「Thank you.」 「Sweets desu?」 「This tea is fragrant.」 Then, after the three of us have some tea and sweets, I cough and cut to the chase. 「Well then, I’ll take out the materials to be dismantled.」 When I took out the item box, the dismantler gasped and said “Hou”. 「You have a rare skill. You’re lucky. A lot of people will hire you for it. Even though you’re just a youngster, you will not be troubled with money.」 「Maa….I’m not really troubled with money. 」 「So, what’s the material? 」 「Death hawk desu 」 I put the death hawk on the workbench. 「You hunted it? 」 「Yeah, you can say that. 」 The dismantler opened his eyes wide. 「If that’s true….it seems like you don’t need my backing. 」 The dismantler begins to inspect the death hawk and is bewildered. 「It’s certainly a death hawk. Normal newbies can’t deal with it. Even in this place, I’ve only seen one every two weeks at most. It’s a high-grade material so I have to work hard for it too. 」 「There are two more.」 Two more death hawks are placed on the workbench. 「….seriously. You are an outrageous group. It looks like I have to put my spirit on it too– 」 「And lastly, arch dragon. 」 The head of the arch dragon came out of the item box— –the dismantler froze while his mouth was constantly opening and closing. So, on our way back home. While walking in the forest, Maria said something while smiling. 「–now, that fox ear….that cheater Arisa, how are we going to kill her?」 「No no, please spare me from killing anyone.」 Maria looks like she’ll go berserk any moment. No, she’s smiling sweetly but you can feel bloodlust rather than sweetness. 「I don’t care about money. As long as she doesn’t cheat us of carrots.」 Maa, you’re not interested in anything else other than carrots. 「That said, she must be punished.」 「Right……」 Maa, it is confirmed that she’s only giving me half of the original price. That doesn’t deserve death penalty but I also agree that she must be punished. 「Let’s wait for her next move first.」 「Wait….is it?」 「Maria knows the selling price of the monsters we hunted, right?」 「Yeah, I’ve been an adventurer for a long time after all.」 「Then, next transaction, when she hands over the money for the monsters that the hand riding rabbits hunted, we’ll punish her if she still rips us off. However, if she gives us a reasonable amount….I guess there’s no reason for us to punish her but we still need to ask her why she rips us off before.」 「Okay…..maa, I understand.」 -0- Now, dragon meat. I don’t want to hide it from anyone but….I’m about to cook the dragon meat now. That’s right. My long-awaited dragon meat. I seriously stared at the dragon meat that had been chopped by the dismantling shop. Yeah, it has its own beauty. I cut a small piece lightly and eat it….. 「Ah, tastes like special wagyu beef.」 A5 is the highest grade of wagyu beef but this is obviously tastier than any wagyu beef I’ve ever eaten. I mean it. Seriously, I’m not exaggerating. Now…..and so, I went into contemplation. If I use yakiniku sauce, it will waste the real taste of this meat since it will influence the taste too much. Then, what should I do with this highest grade ingredient….? —-that evening. 「Tasty desu?」 「Right desu yo!」 「Super delicious desu?」 「I can’t stop eating desu?」 「Half cooked desu?」 The hand-riding rabbits ate the dragon meat faster than the speed of light. 「Tatsuya-sama, what kind of seasoning taste like this?」 Maria asked that while tears were flowing out of her eyes. 「Ah, that’s wasabi soy sauce.」 I judged that the seasoning must be as simple as possible to preserve the ingredient’s taste. Thus, I used wasabi soy sauce and cooked it in a medium-rare steak. I put the dragon meat in my mouth and chewed it. My mouth is immediately filled with juice full of sweetness and umami from its fat. And the wasabi counteracts its greasiness—- 「Delicious!」 I clapped my hand and groaned instinctively. At first, I thought of using salt and pepper but that would be quite greasy. In that sense, wasabi would be most useful. By the way, today, we don’t only have meat….we also have red wine. I removed the remaining fat in my mouth by pouring red wine over it—- 「Great!」 When I drank all the wine in my cup, Maria poured some more into it. Again….I throw dragon meat in my mouth and drink red wine again. I can’t….stop. I can’t stop eating meat and drinking wine. I threw another piece of meat in my mouth. And chew. I smile. And—red wine again. —endless loop. Scary. I can’t stop taking in meat and wine. They’re delicious. No, too delicious. Sonja and Maria are the same. They are silently putting meat and wine on their mouths. And then— 「Oh? You’re drinking? Then, I’ll join you.」 「Oh, Arisa. How can you get here at dusk? Also, you’re not supposed to come here today, right?」 「My stripping job was close by. I thought maybe you got some rare materials so I’m here…..I’m also thinking of eating for free. The food here has always been delicious after all.」 Maria sends a cold gaze to Arisa. Maa, I also think the same as Maria…. 「I’m sorry but I don’t have material today.」 The guild already bought them. 「That’s a shame. Then, can I at least join you for dinner?」 Feel at home — Maria said that loudly as she agreed immediately with Arisa’s request. 「I will present Arisa-san a special menu.」 「Special menu?」 「Dragon meat. Would that fit your appetite?」 「D-dr-dragon? Eat! I’ll eat it! I’ll eat it no matter what!」 Maria nodded slightly and left for the kitchen with the frying pan. Wait, you can cook? Maa, I heard you lived as an adventurer for many years so I guess there’s nothing she can’t do. After 10 minutes or so, she brought a dragon liver steak. 「Ooohhh! That’s a dragon liver! You can only eat that at a super luxurious restaurant in the capital!」 「Right. Please eat without reserve.」 Chew chew chew…..Arisa ate the dragon liver as if there’s no tomorrow. Then, Maria served red wine to Arisa and smiled. …….areh? I noticed that something’s going on. Why is Maria serving Arisa? She wanted to clean her up until a while ago….. 「Hnn…..? I feel weird.」 Arisa, who had eaten dragon’s liver, is blushing. 「What’s wrong?」 「Something’s…..my body on fire……」 Her fox tail is shaking and even her fox ears are moving. Arisa gave out a sexy sigh as she’s patting her face with her hands. 「Nothing’s wrong desu yo.」 「What do you mean, Sonja?」 「An arc dragon’s liver is different from a normal dragon. It’s like a magic item.」 「….huh?」 「If a beastkin eat it, that beastkin will enter its “mating season” desu yo?」 Then, Maria grinned. 「Tatsuya-sama…….Your body is so terrible that the two of us are struggling to serve you. So, I have to think about something…..think of it as the punishment of this foxears!」 「Ufufufu. Arisa will join us tonight desu?」 「Tatsuya-sama, show her your ferocity….I mean how powerful your love is!」 And Arisa sent me a lustrous gaze. 「This is hopeless! I’ve already entered my mating season….it can’t be helped!」 「No, but….」 「You don’t like me….?」 And so, I said my honest feelings. 「No, I don’t dislike you at all.」 Maa, that night, it was a hard night. And the next morning, an eye-bagged Arisa returns to the city after saying “Bro Tatsuya…..you’re a beast.” And so, that’s the end of the ripping off incident— —after that day, Arisa no longer ripped me off but instead, she began asking for dragon liver steak every time she visited. AN: This doesn’t have anything to do with the story but, she’s the main character of my other work: Isekai Guild Meshi TN: It’s a short cooking web novel. We finally had rice. That’s right, we harvested rice. By the way, what I’m currently cultivating in my field are bean sprouts, carrots, wheat, rice, and no fruits. As for the current work allotment, the hand riding rabbits are responsible for hunting while I’m handling the field work in the morning and playing with Sonja and Maria at night. Maria has been an adventurer for a long time so she can do everything like cooking and washing. —–as for Sonja, nothing. She’s the hand riding rabbit queen so the hand riding rabbits are working for her or so they say. Today, the hand riding rabbits hunted down a wild boar— 「Today will be katsu curry!」 That’s what I shouted in the hut. There are tens of thousands of yen in the offering box. With my current balance, I’ll be able to order curry roux. 「What’s katsu curry?」 「What is curry in the first place….?」 Ah, the only ones who have ever eaten curry here are the hand riding rabbits so these two don’t know what is katsu or even curry. 「It is the world’s most favorite dish.」 I’ve never heard of anyone who doesn’t like curry. There might be people who don’t like it but who cares, I love it. That moment, the door was knocked. 「Hou, this is an unusual group of people.」 —-a legal loli came in. That’s right, a legal loli. Blonde twin tail, crimson eyes, and purple mantle. She looks like a 12 years old girl….a true legal loli. Punk….no, she’s not. She’s dressed like a junior high schooler or a high schooler who’s devoted to her character on her tank top and tattered denim. She also has a skull with crossbones accessories. She’s wearing a fancy mantle over them. 「Oh, it has been a while, Maria. I heard you encounter a disaster one after another in the Demon City.」 Maria got down on one of her knees and bowed to her. 「It has been a while— Cornelia-sama.」 I asked Maria in a whisper. 「Who on earth is this legal loli?」 「She’s one of the 12 demon kings. She looks like a cute little girl outside but in fact, she’s the evil dragon of darkness. She stays at the border of the human world…..she’s a strange person who decided to live in seclusion with her followers without getting involved in the political strife of the demon world.」 Demon king….? Uuooohhhhh……..I’ve encountered a standard fantasy existence again. 「Then, why is demon king-sama here?」 As soon as Arisa whispered that, the legal loli demon king—Cornelia faced me. 「Oi, you’re the lord here, right? How did you manage to get along with that succubus and the hand-riding rabbit queen?」 「They came here and settled down without even asking my permission.」 Fumu…..Cornelia puts her hand on her chin and tilts her neck a little. 「I know Maria’s situation and even if I’m the one who’ll ask her, it will be difficult to chase out the hand-riding rabbit queen. Then, how good are you, lord of this place? How about holding your hoe for a moment?」 Marx, who I met at the adventurers guild, asked me the same thing. I hold my hoe and face the demon king Cornelia as she requested. Cornelia looks at me while keeping her eyes only a little open. After a while, she smiled slightly. 「I see. You’re a real man….ladies, whichever race they are, surely likes powerful men.」 「I’m not sure what you’re talking about but, why did demon king-sama come to our place?」 Cornelia glared at me. I sensed an intense pressure. Maria even screamed a little. Sonja’s ears are all up including her fur. She’s also not on her usual smile and has a serious expression. I don’t know what it is but did she let off an aura of intimidation using a skill or something? 「You are overhunting demon beasts. They are free monsters and not related to me but I’ll be affected if you hunt too much. Also, this is part of my territory so how can you build a residence without informing me? I even sent an evil cyclops to bring you to me but you purge it immediately.」 A hair-raising crisis was triggered. I can feel the heavy atmosphere enveloping the surroundings. Maria has already lost her will to fight and her face is pale. As for Sonja….I can see battle intent in her eyes. If anyone makes a move, she’ll jump out without hesitation. Then, Cornelia smiled in a truly dreadful way. Oi oi, if this continues, a battle will surely start. 「Hey, demon king-sama? Did you come here to fight?」 「What do you think, lord of this place?」 「No, I have no intention of fighting you, how about you?」 Then….Cornelia shook her head to the left and right. 「Even for me, I don’t think it is a good idea to have a fight with you….let’s put this on hold.」 「….on hold?」 「Being a demon king aside, I’m a fighter myself so I want to fight with you. However, I don’t want to take unnecessary risks. 」 「What do you mean? 」 「……if we can talk about it, let’s do just that. 」 Then, Maria raised her face. She has a startled expression. 「Cornelia-sama…..avoided a battle? 」 「What are you saying Maria? 」 「When she asked you to pick your hoe against her….she felt that you and her powers are equal. Because of that, she doesn’t want to take a risk and fight you. Or at least that’s what I think. However….is that even possible? 」 I don’t know what it is but, is holding a farming tool making me super powerful? I just held a hoe, right? Then, Cornelia smiles and says something. 「Do you want to verify? Actual ability is very hard to measure. 」 Again, tension rises. Oi oi, this girl is really a battle freak. —-at that time, the aroma of the curry I was cooking permeated. —-at that time, the aroma of the curry I was cooking permeated. 「What in the world? This smell, is this….」 「Oh? Are you familiar with this smell?」 「Not just familiar……」 The demon king’s expression softened as she breathed deeply along with a surge of emotion. 「It’s a nostalgic smell……」 「That’s our food for today, katsu curry.」 Hearing what I said, Cornelia opened her eyes wide. 「Ka…..katsu curry!?」 Oh? It looks like something inside her snapped. And her stomach’s grumble echoed at the hut. 「Maa, do you want to eat first?」 「Curry is delicious! Very delicious!」 With a smile on her face, Cornelia taps my shoulder. What’s with this girl….why is she suddenly friendly? 「To think you’re a Japanese that can cook curry! Why didn’t you say that first? We almost got into a fight!」 And the way she addresses me has changed, from lord of this place to simple you….. You wouldn’t even see a slight aggressiveness which she is full of when she comes here. 「Yeah….well, in short, you have eaten curry before and it is from a transmigrator like me?」 「Yeah. Since then—-my favourite food has been katsu curry!」 Maa, wherever world it is, curry will continue to be justice. In this world, where civilization level is low….if you eat something like curry, you will be shocked. 「So, how much do you like katsu curry?」 Cornelia thought for a moment—and nodded. 「Well, if it is for katsu curry….I’m willing to fight against the world!」 「Oi oi, that’s too much like….」 Anyway, I feel her extraordinary passion for katsu curry. And I also found that Cornelia put all the carrots on the edge of her plate. 「Do you hate carrots?」 「No, I don’t like all vegetables.」 「…..are you a kid?」 「No, I’m….are you asking me that because I look like one?」 You’re a kid, aren’t you? It is difficult to continue asking while you’re tilting your neck cutely like that. 「Maa, anyway, you and I are now allies!」 The demon king smiles and asked for a handshake/ You have curry on your cheeks and you look so cute. However, why do I need to feed everyone around me? I can only sigh. -0- Evening that day— 「I’ll be back to eat curry soon! Eat with me that time, okay?」 「Ah, I don’t mind.」 Cornelia smiles while holding a katsu curry bento as a souvenir. 「Make sure—-you’ll cook curry again, okay?」 「Yeah, of course. By the way, where do you live?」 「Just over there!」 She pointed at a mountain range on the west—-looking at it closely, there’s a huge mansion-like thing there. 「You live in a pretty big house. 」 「Well, I’m a demon king! I can’t live in a shabby house! 」 Maa, you’re right. And like that, Cornelia said “See you later.” and leave. —-The next morning. 「Big trouble desu?」 I woke up after hearing Sonja. I raise my upper body from the bed made of straw covered with cloth. I thought we can’t sleep in a bed like this forever so I should ask the foxkin Arisa or go directly to the city to buy furniture. One where four people can sleep on….. That aside. 「What do you mean?」 「Monsters are ravaging the field?」 Well, Sonja is smiling as always but….that’s something you shouldn’t say in a leisure tone. We have only known each other for a while but I only saw her serious when Cornelia came yesterday. 「The field is being ravaged by monsters? Then, why are you telling me that without any tension?」 「Ah, well, it’s not like they’re doing anything to the carrot field?」 「Is that so?」 After sighing, I go out after taking the hoe I left standing by the bed. —Usually, the field is being guarded by the hand riding rabbits. However, when they are out hunting, sometimes, the crops are being ruined by monsters and demon beasts. During those times, I came out like this and ended everything with a “kaching”. And so, I went out to the field but…. 「……who are you?」 My field is being ravaged as expected…..no, things are a little different. There are some five-meter high cyclops who are harvesting the crops in my field. And the one commanding them is an elegant beauty. Her height is around 167cm. She looks like she is in her late twenties. She’s a little shorter than me and she looks stylish especially with her slender figure. She has long red hair and pale skin. Her purple lipstick is also shining. Her chest is not big but the shape looks good. Given her high exposure clothes, she’s highly bewitching but different from Maria who’s a sexy dynamite. Yeah…..she looks like an oneechan who’s for an evil organization behind the scene. Maa, she also gives off that feeling. 「I am Ouroboros—-Demon King Cornelia-sama’s close aide.」 Ouroboros…..a snake monster? Cornelia is the evil dragon of darkness and her subordinate is a reptile too? No, it looks like she’s employing cyclops too. 「Why are you ravaging my field?」 「This is tax collection. The carrots are enough for the hand-riding rabbits….if you sell them to the nobles of the demon world, they will be sold as much as they weigh in gold.」 Really? My carrots can sell that much? I’ve lavishly given them to Sonja’s group as if they are only 70 yen a bunch…. 「Tax collection?」 「Bastard! Don’t you know that this is the domain of Demon King Cornelia-sama?」 「Ah, I know that but….」 「You also turned Cornelia-sama’s domain to your hunting ground without even greeting her. In addition, you also started a farm without permission. Given all your offenses —I will confiscate all your money. You have some gold in your shed, right?」 Oi oi, I thought my life here is finally on track but I guess I was wrong. What’s wrong with that demon king-sama? Yesterday, we were getting along well then, she suddenly sent her subordinate to get everything I own. 「However, aren’t you lucky? If it was Cornelia-sama herself who came here and not me….everything will be extinguished with her dragon emperor’s flame and even you would have turned to charcoal. However, this is not a manga so we won’t see any useless killing and I’ll let you off with my lenient judgment……」 Ah, this lady doesn’t know that the demon king and I have become friends. 「But Cornelia came here yesterday. She even said that she’ll come back again to play.」 Hearing me, Ouroboros laughs like there’s no tomorrow and she even puts her hands on her stomach. 「Cornelia-sama? Are you telling me that she took a liking to a human like you—-? I know you want to get away but even an idiot won’t believe that lie!」 「No, but…..」 「It is impossible for her to like humans except someone who can make curry!」 Curry is important after all. I mean, if you can make curry, it seems like everything will be okay. 「No, but…..」 「Shut up! Such a lie—-to think you have the courage to not be afraid of the demon king, but do you think this close aide of her will let you off?」 Ouroboros turned her gaze to the cyclops. 「Forget the previous plan, do it the rough way! After taking everything, destroy the house and the field!」 「W-wait….」 And at that time—- 「I’m back….I haven’t seen you since yesterday!」 「Ah, Cornelia. Yeah, you were here yesterday but…why are you here again?」 「Well, I came to eat katsu curry?」 「Didn’t you eat that yesterday!?」 Oi oi, you indeed said that you’ll come again but…..it hasn’t even been 24hrs. Cornelia replied with a smile. 「It’s for morning curry. Morning curry.」 Good grief….. Aren’t you worried about your stomach? No, I had the same diet problem when I was in my teens. And then, I turned my gaze to Ouroboros—- She looked pale. She’s trembling while kneeling with one of her knees. 「By the way, why are Ouroboros and some cyclops are here?」 「I want to know too. She suddenly wants to take everything I own as taxes and she also said she will destroy my house and the field too.」 After I said that, Ouroboros trembled more. 「Hey, Ouroboros? Raise your head. What the heck is this about?」 「Well, it is about the mysterious farmer that I mention in my report to Cornelia-sama a few days ago…..I’m trying to make them stop their selfish behavior in Cornelia-sama’s garden…」 「Okay? However, didn’t I send you a letter yesterday? I’m sure I indicated that the lord of this house is my ally so utmost respect is necessary. Did you not receive that letter?」 「I may have…..misplaced it.」 That moment, the carefree expression of Cornelia disappeared, replaced by extreme anger. 「Ouroboros.」 「What is it, Cornelia-sama?」 「Taxation, is it? Want to destroy his property? What are you planning with my precious ally? It is fully your fault that you have not seen the letter. Isn’t everything happening now your fault?」 If you want to express what’s happening to a manga scene, there should be a bolt of lightning in the background. Cornelia’s eyes are glowing and it feels like everything around is trembling. I’m sure the mangaka will write “tremble tremble tremble” in the background too. The way Cornelia stared at Ouroboros is terrifying after all. 「I………I…….I’m very sorry, Cornelia-sama!」 Ouroboros prostrated on the ground and headbutted the ground again and again and again. 「I’m sorry! I’m sorry! I’m very sorry! I didn’t know he was Cornelia-sama’s precious ally!」 I can even feel the tremor of the ground as she bangs her head on the ground. Oi oi, you don’t have to go that far….that’s dangerous. Moreover, rather than half crying, she’s weeping to the point that I don’t want to look at her. Cornelia thought of something and spoke. 「Raise your head, Ouroboros.」 Ouroboros didn’t dare raise her head and keep her forehead on the ground. 「……..I’m sorry..」 「I said raise your head. Besides, I’m not the one you should be apologizing to, right?」 Ouroboros raises her head. Then, while prostrating and with tears in her eyes, she sends a gaze of asking for mercy towards me. 「I did not know…..please forgive me.」 Then, Cornelia bowed to me. 「The misbehavior of the subordinate is the misbehavior of the boss. I did not make sure that my instruction was properly transmitted…..I have no excuse. I apologize for the rudeness of Ouroboros. I’m sorry.」 That moment, Maria opened her eyes wide and gasped. 「……..Cornelia-sama….a demon king…..lowered her head….?」 Not only Maria but Ouroboros looks extremely surprised too. Given the reaction of these two, I guess the race called demon king won’t bow to anyone. No, well, they’re the demon king after all. 「So, can you forgive me?」 If I didn’t say anything here, I’d be the one who’s being childish. 「I really don’t mind. Maa, I was surprised when she said she’ll break my hut and field though.」 Hearing what I said, Ouroboros prostrated again. 「I’m sorry!」 「Haha. I’m not saying that I hate you to the bones. Maa, since you’ve apologized that much, I think that’s enough. Raise your head.」 If she prostrates more than this, I’ll look like the bad guy. 「However, this is a problem….」 「What is?」 「You are my important ally. From now on, I can no longer afford to cause you trouble because of stupid things like lack of thorough instruction.」 「Well, that’s right.」 「Mou…..what should I do?」 Cornelia thought for a moment then nodded. 「Ouroboros, bring my favorite staff…the Evil Dragon Rod here.」 Hearing that, Ouroboros was stunned and asked Cornelia with fear…. 「Cornelia-sama? Are you going to do that? I’m not sure if that is the right thing to do……」 「Of course. Isn’t he the human who can make katsu curry? He’s a very valuable human resource that is as important as a part of my body. It’s worth doing that.」 「Oi, what is that?」 「Maa, watch.」 Cornelia concentrated on the spot. A storm blew around and a gigantic magic circle appeared on the ground. The brilliant geometric patterns extend rapidly not only to the whole field but even to the depths of the forest. Then Maria gasped and said “Ah”. 「This is…..dragon emperor’s divine protection….」 「Yes! That’s right!」 「However, I can’t believe it! To use it and target the land….something like this has never been heard of!」 Maria said so with an expression of astonishment. As for me, I’m looking at the shining geometric patterns on the ground, stupefied. 「By the way, what do you mean by dragon emperor’s divine protection?」 「Do you know that dragons collect treasures?」 Maa, that’s a classic setting in a fantasy world. There are many stories saying you’ll get treasures after defeating a dragon. 「Yes, I’m aware of that.」 「This hut and even the land around have been certified as a treasure house of a dragon.」 「Treasure house?」 「Yes, Tatsuya-sama was even…..you’ve been certified as Cornelia-sama’s treasure. If you stay within this barrier, it will be an absolute barrier against monsters.」 Cornelia nodded. 「There is no mistake in Maria’s explanation. Maa, let me explain it in my own way too. You can consider this divine protection as my marking.」 「Marking?」 「Yeah. This mark of mine is like saying to everyone that my treasure is in this place. If you cause any trouble within this barrier….it means you are looking for a fight with me. Any monster or demon beast will be afraid of my magical power and won’t dare approach this place. Demons that can converse will realize what this barrier means upon entering. No one would want to anger me unless it’s a fool. 」 「So that’s what all of this is about? To stop any kind of trouble in this place?」 「It is as you say. Maa, it won’t work for humans though. However, a high-ranking magic-user might get vigilant.」 「Maa, that already saved us a lot of trouble. Thank you.」 Then, the stunned Maria speaks. 「This can’t be taken lightly. A simple “thank you” is not enough, Tatsuya-sama.」 「What do you mean?」 「There can only be one dragon treasure house with a barrier desu. In other words, Cornelia-sama disposed of the divine protection on her own treasury to set up the barrier in this place…」 Oi oi, how much is she planning on taking care of me? While thinking so, I stared at Cornelia. 「Do I deserved to receive your divine protection?」 「Of course! You are my important ally! Do I need to hold back on my generosity towards my own ally? In addition, you can also think of this as compensation for the misbehavior of my subordinate.」 The demon king-sama, who looks like a twelve-year-old girl, is smiling at me. A very cute smile. I guess I have to buy curry roux later…. Also, I don’t feel bad being liked by a beautiful little girl. 「Have I already said that I want a morning curry?」 「Ah, as thanks for the dragon emperor’s divine protection….I’ll give my all to cook you some!」 「Great! Fufu, you’re really a good guy!」 Cornelia jumped up with both hands in the sky. She looks very happy. 「Now then, Ouroboros.」 「What is it, Cornelia-sama?」 「About your punishment…..」 Hearing that, Ouroboros was terrified and knelt on the ground again. 「I’ll accept whatever punishment you’ll give.」 「No no, didn’t she already apologized to me?」 「No, it’s about taking responsibility. Taking responsibility is important. That is non-negotiable.」 Then, Ouroboros asked Cornelia fearfully with her head down…. 「What should I do?」 「From now on, you’ll be a maid of this house and you should help with all the housework.」 「…..I understand.」 「Cool your head for a while and after that…..do your best to serve this man with all your heart, okay?」 「Leave it to me, Cornelia-sama.」 Oi oi, don’t just decide that on your own. Maa, it looks like they won’t listen no matter what I’ll say…. For now, let’s start making curry. 「See you later! I’ll have curry again when I return!」 「Aren’t you going to get bored with curry like that?」 「I wouldn’t mind eating curry as my three meals!」 「Oi oi…..you’re seriously going to get sick of it.」 「No way! Absolutely no way!」 「Then, instead of eating the same curry again and again, I’ll make you a curry hot pot. Though I can’t cook it if I don’t have cabbage and leek.」 「Hou? Curry hot pot!?」 Dusk, after Cornelia left—- When Ouroboros was cleaning the hut, a cyclops arrived. The cyclops can’t talk but according to the letter it brought, it seems to be Cornelia’s messenger. A package was also given to me along with that letter. The cyclops bowed after I received it and left. —so, it’s a package but….there was a maid’s clothes in it. 「Is that from Cornelia-sama?」 「Ah, yes but it’s a maid’s clothes.」 As if understanding Cornelia’s intention, Ouroboros took the package and disappeared into the warehouse. Then, Ouroboros, who changed into maid’s clothes, came back to the hut. 「What do you think of my clothes…..master-sama?」 「Maa, you don’t have to address me with “sama”.」 Perhaps because she changed her clothes, she no longer gives off the behind the scene organization atmosphere. Or rather, she now falls to a normal beauty you can fall in love with. Then, Ouroboros picks the hem of her clothes with both of her hands and raises it slightly. 「Please take care of me from now on, master. If there is anything that inconveniences you, please let me know.」 Ouroboros bows. Ah, she’s so maid-like. 「If you don’t like it, you don’t have to do that.」 「Cornelia-sama ordered…..I’ve been taking care of the demon king’s residence as Cornelia-sama’s close aide. From here on, I’ll stay here.」 「Maa, if you don’t want to be here, you can leave anytime….」 Ouroboros blushed slightly and asked. 「I usually look like that but…..」 What look? Ah, she means that high exposure clothes of her. 「—actually, I’m inexperience.」 「Experience?」 What are you talking about? And I tilted my neck a little. 「I mean, we have to share the bed tonight so….it would be inconvenient if you don’t know that.」 「…..what do you mean?」 Ouroboros’s face turned red. 「I have already prepared myself and have enough resolve.」 Oi oi, seriously…. 「…..Cornelia didn’t order you that much, right?」 「No」Ouroboros shook her head to the left and right. 「I’m also a woman so even if Cornelia-sama orders me….I won’t do it.」 「What are you saying?」 「Master is a man who Cornelia-sama deemed an important ally….I didn’t notice it earlier but master has tremendous power. As my second lord, I thought that you deserve to receive everything I have….」 「No, but…..」 Ouroboros turned her teary puppy eyes to me as if begging. —–whooow, so sexy. Though a different type compared to the cute Sonja and sexy dynamite like Maria. Her slightly flat chest gives off some kind of excitement…..I’ve never met someone as bewitching as her. 「—-you don’t like me….?」 Thus, I said my honest feelings. 「I don’t dislike you at all.」 And, well, in such a way, another person—-a new housemate joined our hut. The bath is ready. It’s only a primitive type where I hollowed out a huge piece of timber. I semi-buried it on the ground making it an open-air bath. It can be used by five people of everyone’s standing but probably can only accommodate one if the user is sitting. I think this is more of a goemon bath that I used in my grandmother’s house in the countryside. Of course, pouring warm water is a pain. I had to boil water several times in a big pot used at ramen stores I ordered in the offering box. I also have to prepare the proper ratio of hot and cold water. Maa, honestly, it obviously needs tremendous effort. I have to improve it in the future— 「Ah….paradise.」 I said that with a sigh. When I came here, the only way to clean myself was by using the river. Naturally, I go there every day but there’s no way a man like me who was born and raised in the modern world would be satisfied. After all, only a bath can heal my tired body. Maa, even though I said I’m tired, it’s not about farm work. It’s because of the three partners. As expected, even if I have the skill king of the night, I’ll get tired after being attacked alternately. —-mainly because of my sleep time. In addition, the special foxkin guest also joins once a week. Moreover, when the foxkin comes, Sonja eats the archdragon’s liver with her….turning her into a berserker rabbit. To be honest, that’s a situation where I feel I almost can’t take it anymore. It appears that it contains a mysterious substance that activates beastkin’s mating season. After taking on Sonja like that, the remaining two will say it’s their turn….as if that’s the normalest thing to happen. Maa, it’s okay since I don’t hate it at all. I look up at the sky while thinking about it—- 「Ah, there are two moons.」 I know of the red moon but today, there’s also a normal moon. Perhaps the normal color moon can only be seen occasionally due to the rotation of the planet or something. 「I have never looked up at the night sky like this…..」 At first, my life depended on catching snakes and then a woman came, then I was ripped off….in the end, I met a demon king. Maa, anyway, my life here has been on track. I don’t have any food problems and if I ask Arisa, I’ll be able to procure things from the city. If I want seasonings, the offering box has every kind. Yeah, I think I can live steadily in this world from now on. And more than anything else, they are all so cute…….really cuteeeee!!! After thinking all of those, I climbed out of the bath and entered the hut. Sonja rushed up. 「Bath time desu? I’ll be going next desu?」 She seems to be in a very good mood. She’s even hopping. I mean, I heard that there’s no habit of taking a bath in this world and I was shocked culturally when I heard that. 「This is my very first bath desu?」 Then, Sonja takes off her clothes and tries to run to the open-air bath without even wearing a towel. She looks like a first-year high schooler or a third-year middle schooler and she’s naked. I thought of various things. However, her skin quality is also like that whether you touch or look. 「Hey, wait a minute.」 「What is it desu?」 Then, I handed some modern goods I got from the offering box to Sonja. 「My present.」 「Present, is it?」 I nodded while Sonja tilted her neck as she received it. 「….ah, perhaps….that will surprise you.」 「A-a-a-a-amazing desu!」 Sonja has just finished taking a bath. After she finished drying her hair with wind magic, she shouted in a super loud volume. 「Wha? Is it that amazing?」 「Yes! Yes! Super desu!?」 Sonja said so while touching her hair. She has a very ecstatic expression. 「Smootthhhh! Very smooothhhhhhh desu!」 Maa, in this world, bathing is basically getting wet with water and wiping yourself with a towel. Hot water in a bucket is enough for that. Of course, they have never used shampoo, conditioner, or any treatment. If you give them a weapon of mass destruction called hair treatment, it will naturally smoothen their hair like Sonja—- Maa, the only thing missing on her smooth hair is an angel ring. 「What is it desu? What do you call it desu?」 Even if she’s a rabbit, she’s still a woman. She’s naturally obsessed with beauty….no, it shouldn’t be that much. Maa, she’s just surprised because her hair suddenly becomes smooth, soft to touch, and bouncy. 「It is called treatment.」 「Tori-tomento?」 「I don’t get it but….」Sonja suddenly hugged me. 「Thank you desu! This is the first time I’m like this desu! Super smooth desu! My hair is super smooth desu! I’m super happy desu!」 「Ah, well, you’re welcome.」 The sweet smell of body soap and shampoo. The smell of a woman after bath is a crime….I had to control myself or—- —-I feel….sharp gazes behind me. 「Tatsuya-sama….?」 「Master….?」 Maria and Ouroboros are enviously looking at Sonja. 「That tori-to-mento….please let me use it too.」 「But why?」 「—-aren’t I a woman too?」 Ah, of course. That’s right. Then, Ouroboros came to me and looked up at me with puppy eyes. 「Master, have mercy on this Ouroboros. That tori-to-men-to….please let me use it.」 「Maa, I really don’t mind but can you tell me why?」 「–There is a battle where I can’t be defeated. I can’t let them monopolize.」 What are they going to monopolize….ah….me? And so, like that, they took the shampoo, conditioner, and body soap from Sonja and headed for the bath. After taking a bath, the two of them immediately dried their hair with wind magic. And for some time, they play with their hair in front of the mirror with sparkling eyes. Ouroboros and Maria’s eyes met—they grinned. After that, they stared at Sonja too and in the end, the three of them stared at me. 「……..」 「……..」 「……..」 I can see them—the sparks in their eyes. It looks like they want me to comment. It can’t be helped—- 「You are all stunning.」 Their cheeks were dyed red as if they’re shy. And, well, that night…. —-my body was dyed with the sweet scent of shampoo. 「A big carrot tower….」 That’s the only thing I can say to what Sonja did to the carrots. At the edge of the field, she piled up all the carrots. 「Ufufufu, amazing no desu!」 Sonja is jumping and jumping while her smooth hair shakes. And the hand-riding rabbits are jumping happily like her too. 「We did it desu!」 「The carrot tower of our dream desu?」 「Should we dive into the tower desu?」 「Let’s do that desu?」 The hand-riding rabbits jumped into the tower with ecstatic expressions as its surface rumbled like a mountain. 「However, there’s no way we can consume them all.」 Sonja stared at me when I said that. 「I absolutely hate it!」 「What?」 「Carrot-san….I’m not selling them!」 That’s right. However, I have to disapprove. 「Oi oi, it’s better than letting them rot, right?」 Sonja’s eyes became teary as she shook her head to the left and right. 「But if that happens desu…won’t my carrots be less desu yo」 However, Ouroboros says that these carrots can be sold at a ridiculous price. Since the offering box is a rip-off system, I need a regular income that doesn’t depend on rabbits. As expected, saying that it’s the same price as it weighs on gold is nonsense but it doesn’t change the fact that it’s very expensive. 「I’ll make a stew with lots of carrots with the money we’ll get from selling them. Just think of it as an investment for that. 」 White stew and carrots are a good combination. I mean, it goes well with curry-like food. 「What is white stew? 」 Ah, she bit the bait. Now, they are all staring at me. 「oh, white stew. It will taste incredible with carrots. 」 「Is it a dish that makes carrots better like curry? 」 「Yeah, it definitely goes well with carrots. 」 Ah, I feel like their pupils changed to heart shape. Their tails are also flipping. These girls are really cute. —-you can never tell that their world known alias is Gluttonous Slaughterer…. That aside. 「Seasonings like solid roux are expensive so we have no choice but to turn the carrots into cash. 」 After thinking for a while, Sonja nodded. 「You’re just going to sell the surplus, right? We must never sell what we can consume. 」 When I got her approval, I went back to the hut and talked to Ouroboros. 「Demon king…..I mean, can we use Cornelia’s connection to sell carrots to the demon world? You said it can fetch a high price in the demon world, right? 」 「As you wish, master. 」 Ouroboros bowed. 「This evening…I’ll leave for Cornelia-sama’s residence. 」 「Ah, please do. 」 Maria will do all the housework during that time. Since Ouroboros came, she had been working as my farming assistant. Originally, housework was Maria’s job. By the way, Sonja does nothing. —If you ask her, she’ll say that she’s doing her job as the queen. Well, in a sense, she’s kind of working hard. Especially when she’s in her berserker rabbit mode. 「However, master. 」 「Hnn? What is it? 」 「Cornelia-sama and you are allies so I think they will not even charge you except for the tariff of products in and out of the demon world.」 「What do you mean? 」 「There are multiple restrictions on trade with the human world. Also, everyone will be strictly inspected at the border checkpoint….. 」 「That’s normal 」 「Please be prepared that more than half will be pulled out. 」 「That’s a rip-off. Maa, it can’t be helped then…..I can only sell to human cities in the future. Then, blam, the door was opened. 「Hey! I heard what you are talking about! 」 It was the character who speaks kansai dialect, the foxkin Arisa. 「Oh? Arisa? My apologies but we have no materials to sell you today.」 「No no, that’s not what I’m talking about. I feel like your money-making scheme is more profitable than that.」 「How much do you think this carrot will sell for?」 「Though that is my specialty, I can’t give you the exact price….but the answer is definitely positive. I can even say that all vegetables that Tatsuya-nii planted are the same.」 「What do you mean?」 「Let’s talk about something you made me eat before….like the prototype petit tomato. It’s sweeter than apple.」 That’s when I raised the sugar content to the maximum using the skill seed creation. 「Given how rare it is, if you sell it to novel gourmet, after the negotiation, it won’t be surprising to sell them at the same price as their weight in gold.」 I see. It seems like the vegetables I made are terrific. 「Then, how about I have you sell our surplus vegetables in the human city next time?」 「No, we can’t do that.」 「W-why?」 「Why do you think I only take materials like skin, fangs, and bones and never the meat of monsters and demon beasts? And why do you think I have a custom made special knapsack to carry them?」 「Ah, right. This forest is treated as a high-difficulty dungeon.」 「That’s right. There is no way I can travel in this pathless place while pulling a cart. If I hire some high-level adventurers to guard me, I might be able to do so….but that comes with an outrageous request fee. No matter how much Tatsuya-nii makes, it will only be paid to expenses.」 「Hearing it from a rip-off expert, it is very convincing.」 「I promised I won’t do it again….」 Arisa turned silent as her fox ears drooped down. I heard that she only did that because her mother was sick. She needed a huge amount of money immediately so she couldn’t help but rip us off….. Maa, if she only talked to me properly, I would have cooperated with her. By the way, she returned the gold coins she ripped us off. I mean, these days, Arisa has hardly deducted any fee. It seems like she only deducted the necessary expenses. I’ve checked it out with Maria so it’s definitely true. Maa, it even balances everything out. No, well, I’m not charging her for eating at my home though. 「Then, does this mean that we can only sell them to the demon world using Cornelia’s connection?」 「However, doing that means we already lost more than half of them.」 Yeah….Arisa and I began thinking about how to solve the trouble. Then, Maria suddenly hit her own palm. 「How about selling them to elves?」 Then, Arisa gasped. 「That’s it! They’re vegans! If we sell them Tatsuya-nii’s vegetables, they’ll buy them at a high price like idiots! The magical products they made can be sold highly to the humans so this will definitely make us a lot of money!」 Hearing her saying that, Ouroboros tilted her neck a little. 「Elves are a reclusive race. They even call themselves sages of the forest and avoid unnecessary interference with both Cornelia-sama and the humans….. Will they even trade with us?」 「I’ll take care of the negotiation. I think it can be solved by making them taste the vegetables.」 「Oi oi, what do you mean you’ll take care of it….you’re the one who’s going to negotiate?」 「Of course! Your group is composed of a na?ve hand-riding rabbit and demon nobles, right? Only someone with a commoner’s sense can do that.」 Well, what she said is reasonable. Maria and Ouroboros are nobles of the demon world and Sonja is not interested in anything but carrots. And I’m not even an original resident of this world. 「Ah, I understand. You talk to them.」 Arisa made a full smile. 「However—-I want some commission!」 「You never learn, are you?」 I smiled wryly and Arisa hit her chest. 「You already know that I’m a rip-off expert! You only need to ride the ship with me!」 So, the next day— With Ouroboros staying at home, me, Arisa, Sonja, and Maria were heading to a corner of the forest where the elves are living. We brought carrots, garlic, petit tomatoes, bean sprouts, and soybeans as presents. The elves especially love tomatoes and according to Arisa “If you let them eat that, it’s a done deal!”. 「Stroll desu?」 「Are the carrots still there desu?」 「Commander, we found a wild boar, do you want to hunt it?」 Sonja replied with a smile. 「I’m off to hunt desu yo.」 The hand-riding rabbits are still the same, making it peaceful with only a little noise. After a while, we arrived at the elf village….. 「What the….amazing」 It is surrounded with a wooden fence with thorns…..it is also surrounded with a moat full of bamboo stakes that will surely skewer you once you fall. Rather than a village, it is more like an elf fortress. I guess this kind of fence is surrounding them since I can’t see the end. 「Maa, the elves are a fighting race in addition to being smart.」 Oi oi, this is the first time I’m hearing that. Then, from the place that looks like the entrance of the village, there is a blonde female elf guard— 「E-e-e-enemy attack! The hand-riding rabbits are attacking in groups! Hide them! Hide them! Hide the carrots! Prepare to intercept at the same time!」 The elf, who looks like the guard, ran into the village. Huh? What is happening? 「Ufufu. You’re exaggerating, we won’t steal your carrots anymore desu yo. Tatsuya’s carrots are more delicious desu?」 「Ehto….wait a minute, Sonja-san.」 「What is it desu?」 「You guys….in the past…..have you done something to the elves?」 「Elf carrots are delicious desu yo? That’s why the coming of age ceremony of the little rabbit-chans are risking their lives to go to the elf village desu.」 「Ehto…..can you elaborate it?」 「The elves are calling us the forest’s little children gang desu yo.」 I freeze for a moment—- 「That means, the elves are not exaggerating?」 「No, if you were stealing from them, it is normal to be treated like this, right?」 I’m sorry but…. I failed to consider how the sweet-looking hand-riding rabbits are to others because they have been friendly with me from the start. They are usually happy go lucky but they are also called gluttonous slaughterers. Anyway, it seems that there’s no doubt that they won’t choose any means if it is related to carrot. 「I mean, seriously.」 The entrance gate of the village is tightly closed and there are hundreds of elves armed with bows making noises from beyond the fence. 「Maria, what’s that?」 The direction I pointed at is a watchtower-like place built next to the gate. Dozens of elves wearing robes are lined up there and they are all pointing their wants toward a certain formation. 「Those are elf mages desu—-they are casting a ritual attack magic!」 Uooohhhh! I don’t know what it is but I think the name fire ball suits it well….a huge ball of flame with a radius of about 10 meters has flown to us. In addition, the elves on the other side of the fence poured us rain of arrows. —-damn it! What should I do? For the time being, I took out my hoe… Whack smash crash bang! I hit all the arrows coming to me with the hoe at a tremendous speed. Until now, I’ve been fighting monsters and been hitting them once but this time, it feels completely different. I feel like my body is moving on its own…no, that’s not it. My body is certainly moving as I want it but I know how to move and my body is as light as an idiot. Sonja and Maria are also basically overpowered so they evade arrows with simple movements or even catching them. They were never hit. As for the hand riding rabbits, their body is small and they can move fast and precise. Them hunting high-level monsters is not just for show. In addition….I smiled wryly. 「Have you always been strong?」 「Even though a stripper’s best skill is running away, I have a certain level of combat ability….or else, do you think I would dare to enter this forest? This looks like a normal forest but the moment you step into it, you’ll notice that it’s an extreme dungeon.」 Arisa is holding her dagger and using it to defend herself. She can use it well as she cuts off all arrows going to her. 「The biggest problem is that…..」 Of course, the fire ball that was casted earlier is flying towards us. 「Tatsuya-sama! That is a ritual magic that dozens of elf mages cooperated to activate! If I and Sonja will hit by that, we will be severely injured….」 「No, it’s okay.」 I can’t say that I’m absolutely sure but I feel like that’s what my farming tool handling is telling. I feel like it should be almost certain. I stepped forward to protect everyone and faced the fireball. The distance between me and the fireball is around 5 meters. 3 meters. 1 meter. —now! I held the hoe up and shook it into the giant fireball. After the “shushin” sound, the fireball disappears. 「oi oi….it’s really gone.」 I mean, the farming tool handling skill is not bad. Given that this is only a mere hoe. Before I noticed it, the rain of arrow had stopped falling too. I turned my gaze to the elves on the other side of the fence. 「……」 「This is….not happening….right?」 「That’s the full power of a ritual spell that combines the magical power of 18 elf mages…..how could a weapon without any attribute do that….?」 They looked terribly surprised but they should really be. —-me myself is surprised too. I only draw a hoe and hit it….I see. So that’s why the adventurer king I met in the guild and the demon king Cornelia had me draw my hoe. 「As expected of Tatsuya-sama. I was also trying to strategize a defensive posture….however, even if I succeed, I wouldn’t be able to let everyone unscathed.」 Maria is happily smiling. Yeah, she’s normally a sexy beauty but she’s a little charming when she smiles. 「Amazing desu! Tatsuya is amazing desu!」 Sonja came towards me hopping. She hug dived me. 「Advent of god desu?」 「God of war desu?」 「Hou, that means he’s not just a carrot man?」 「I’ll follow you all my life, aniki!」 The hand riding rabbits are also praising me while hopping happily while saying “amazing amazing”. 「No, everything happened because of you.」 I smacked Sonja’s head. 「Ugh….it hurts.」 By the way, the mages in robes who were in the watchtower-like place near the gate all have pale faces. 「What should we do?」 When I asked Arisa, the tightly closed gate opened. A woman appeared from the gate of the village. She’s beautiful and has a very good style. She has long limbs, blonde hair, and blue eyes. She looks like a twenty-year-old human. A very picturesque elf. No one’s following her as she walks towards us. She’s only equipped with a bow and arrows. I mean….though not as much as Cornelia, this beauty somehow gives off a sense of intimidation. 「Akan….the elf queen has come out.」 After seeing her, Arisa suddenly became pale. Maria’s sweating coldly too….doesn’t that mean we are in danger? And there—– 「This is bad desu.」 「The elf princess desu」 「Real bad desu- We can’t do anything against her desu」 「Commander! Permission to escape!」 Sonja turned her gaze to the hand-riding rabbits. 「Ufufufu. Little rabbit-chans?」 She laughs and makes a bottomless smile. 「I will give you permission. However….it is permission to struggle.」 At the same time she said those words, the hand-riding rabbits began to make a fuss as if they arrived at hell and turned their gazes to Sonja with condemnation. 「Oni desu」 「This is impossible desu」 「An oni has descended desu」 「Impossible impossible」 That said, it seems like the hand-riding rabbits can’t go against their queen’s order. Everyone turned their gaze to the elf queen while being frightened. No….I don’t think so. They are checking her back and preparing to run away. 「Why tell them to struggle? As long as it’s not related to carrots, you guys are basically gentle, right?」 Sonja nodded. 「That elf is a carrot maniac too desu yo.」 「Carrot maniac?」 「Elves are vegetarians so they value vegetables very much desu.」 I understand. Then….they are dangerous to rabbits who steal their food. 「Once upon a time….the carrots we had stored near our burrow have been stolen. The one who stole it is an elf corps led by that elf queen while we were away.」 「No, you stole it from them in the first place, didn’t you?」 「Half was stolen from the elf village but the other half was from the warehouse of a demon noble desu yo」 What in the, these guys are stealing everywhere. No, is that how the hand-riding rabbit race acquired powerful fighting abilities in the process of evolution? And so, the hand riding rabbits—began to buzz. Their ears suddenly stood up straight on their heads and their blue eyes suddenly turned red. 「I remember! That was two years ago, our carrots suddenly disappeared! At that time….. I was struck with despair!」 「Right, that bitch….stole our carrots!」 「Argh! To do something like that—-unforgivable!」 「To lay her hands on our carrots….the only thing she can trade for that is her life!」 「So what if we can’t win against her! Since I’m going to die, I’ll bite her carotid artery and go together with her in the afterlife!」 「You dare do that to us, prepare to die! I’ll cut you into pieces!」 「Anee anee-san, permission to fight!」 「Let me do it! I’ll destroy her!」 Ah, it looks like a switch was pressed. How important are carrots? Maa, there is also something that I’m convinced of since I’m seeing it now. Is this the reason why they are called forest’s little children gang? Also, how did they suddenly speak kansai dialect…..or, should I really tsukomi? 「Vegetable war….is that what’s happening?」 A war without humanity and justice. Just robbing each other’s vegetables. That’s kind of…. 「That’s not it, Tatsuya-sama?」 「What do you mean, Maria?」 「Sonja and the other are, but the elves are not idiots.」 「Yeah, Sonja and the others are definitely acting like idiot children. 」 「Yeah, the elves on the other hand are sensitive when it comes to stored food. That might be the reason why they stormed at the burrow of the hand-riding rabbits. It is like a military action against bandits.」 Maa, these guys….are a carrot-eating race. Since they steal all the time, they should have accumulated a lot of carrots. Then, the queen of the elves stopped at a place 10 meters before me. 「Fumu….hand riding rabbits and their queen. Noble of the demon world….a mysterious man who uses farming tool.」 With a bow on her left hand and arrow on her right, the elf queen stared at me. 「Mysterious man over there. I can feel wave of insane power comparable to the demon king Cornelia from you.」 Speaking of which, Cornelia also said that she doesn’t know if she could win against me. I don’t really know why but it seems like I really got a mysterious cheat skill when I transmigrated. Then, the woman made an expression of resignation and smiled in self-deprecation. 「The hand-riding rabbits and their queen should be as powerful as our village and it could be said that we are equal. However, with that demon noble over there and you….there’s no way we can win.」 For now, in terms of power rankings…..Cornelia and I are equal. With the description of the elf queen, Sonja and the elf queen should be equal. Maria and Ouroboros should be equal and getting down from there, the hand riding rabbits and the elves…..getting down a whole lot more, there should be Arisa. 「Then, what are you planning?」 「Since I’m going to die, I want to at least die as a warrior, therefore…..I challenge you to use your full power! If you are a warrior, you should understand what I’m saying!」 「Even if you say that…..」 I’m a farmer. To be honest, I’m just an ordinary person with skills. 「Now, draw your weapon!」 No….even if you ask for my weapon, the only thing I have is a hoe. 「The only weapon I have is a hoe….are you okay with it?」 The elf queen laughed. 「Is your hoe even for plowing field? Yes, your hoe….you are probably using it to plow your enemy’s head!」 What an amazing imagination. —plow the enemy’s head….. 「No, wait a minute! Listen to me!」 「We already attacked each other. The war has started and it won’t end unless blood flows!」 By the way, I heard that the elves are fighters. However, it seems like they are not fit to fight alone. 「I guess so, however, if I win, will you listen to me?」 「Before we start…..losing is not something you can find in my head!」 Then, the elf queen shot an arrow at me. No….four arrows were released in a single shot. She’s a skillful archer. One on the head, two on the torso, and one on the foot. The arrows flew at a tremendous speed to me and the trajectory is very accurate. —-however, that’s na?ve of you! Four flashes. I intercepted the arrows in the air and cut the distance by dashing towards the elf queen. 「It’s over! You won’t be able to use your weapon at this distance!」 When I dashed and raised my hoe—the elf queen laughed. 「You are the na?ve one! World Tree Gospel: (Ruby: Green Holy Flare)!」 I felt something behind me, I turned around—-and found a green sphere of around two-meter radius popping out behind me. Looking at it closely, it came from the magic circle on the ground and is now advancing towards me. That means there has always been a magic circle there and she’s baiting me to do what I’m currently doing? 「That is the base defense ritual magic circle that us elves have built over several decades! Even the demon king won’t be able to handle that— that is the maximum power of our village, our supreme magic, taste it with your body!」 My intuition is speaking to me. —it will be bad if I get hit! However, the green sphere is already just a stone away. I can’t evade. And that time— 【Skill: Farm Work Level 10 has been activated】 Uooohhhhhh! —-I can feel overflowing power in my body! All my motor nerves and reflexes are sharpened to the limit. It seems that everything around me has stopped – with that, I evaded the green sphere by doing an acrobatic backflip. Then, when I managed to stabilize my stance, I waved my hoe! The green sphere disappeared in one blow. For a few moments, the elf queen who saw everything was stunned. 「……No way! How can you move like that?! How did you do it!?」 I want to know too. How can I get transcendent physical ability with farming skills? How can I destroy magic with just a farming tool? Then, she lost all hope and looked up at the sky. 「……No, admitting defeat is also…a warrior’s honor.」 As she is, she let go of her bow and arrows on the ground and knelt down. 「……I lost….kill me」 I shook my head to the left and right. 「Our purpose is not to fight. We came here to establish friendship.」 「Friendship? I don’t know what you are planning behind the scenes to say that but, do I look like an idiot who’ll believe the enemy’s words?」 「Anyway…..once you had a taste of my carrot, we’ll be good friends.」 Hearing me say that, the elf queen stares at my crotch. Then, blushes and dropped her gaze to the ground. 「Kuh…..kill me now. I won’t be humiliated!」 I’m not sure but it seems like she misunderstood me. Then, there was a big banquet. 「This sake is delicious desu?」 Sonja is drinking sake with the elves. It is a distilled liquor made from fermented potatoes…maa, it’s basically shochu. 「However, Tatsuya-dono is such a meanie. If you came here to trade vegetables, you should have said so from the start….」 The elf queen glared at me while drinking shochu. 「No, you guys suddenly attacked us…..」 Maa, if I say that again, it will only start with a fight so I better keep my mouth shut. That aside, the queen’s attitude softened when we fed her my carrot just like what Arisa suggested. The elves are originally busy working to export weapons and tools that are magically enhanced. It seems like they are too busy that it is too impossible for them to farm. There is a high demand for magically enhanced products from various countries and you can say it’s a business where money flows non-stop. However, they are living close to the forest of no return so it is very hard to carry fresh vegetables there. It seems like a stable food supply was one of the weaknesses of the village because they only rely on imports for food. Given their situation, they have no choice but to wage war against Sonja and the hand-riding rabbits. 「Maa, let’s pour the past into the water and just enjoy the superb vegetable and sake today.」 The queen is pleased but it seems like there’s more sake than vegetables. In fact, they even brought me smoked meat from a certain hut while they served me more and more shochu. 「By the way, how did you make these vegetables taste like this?」 「It’s a trade secret.」 I’ve confirmed it with Maria but it seems like I’m the only one who has farming-related skills in this world. In addition, we were in a state of war just a few moments ago so there’s no way I’ll reveal my cards. 「Maa, given how they taste—-it is normal that you want to keep it a secret.」 The queen seems to especially like the petit tomatoes since she has been eating them since earlier. And she also drinks shochu while eating. The sweet little tomatoes are like strawberries but I don’t think they go well with sake…. 「By the way, queen-san, why don’t you try putting this on vegetables and eat it?」 「What’s that?」 I tried to put mayonnaise on a small plate because it is good and I thought they would like it. Along with it, I gave her carrot and cucumber sticks. 「…….fumu?」 While tilting her neck a little, the elf queen sticks the tip of the stick to the mayonnaise and puts it on her mouth. 「…..what is this?」 The queen quickly ate the sticks on her mouth after dipping them in the mayonnaise—she’s so intense that she had to drink shochu to unblock her throat. 「I can only think of this as a work of the spirits of the forest…..what is this taste? Is it alright for something this delicious to exist in this world?」 Next time I come, I’ll bring some vegetable dressing. Maybe you’ll forget everything once you taste it. 「You’re exaggerating.」 When I answered with a smile, the queen shook her head with a serious expression. 「This taste….I can’t think of it as a product of human hand.」 Then, the queen turned her gaze to Sonja. 「And of course, if you have this kind of carrot, you’ll certainly get this girl…」 「I also ask them to not steal anymore.」 Then, the queen giggled. 「Yeah, they don’t need to.」 「Huh?」 「I mean….after tasting it….they can only think of your carrot….」 Maa, I don’t feel bad being praised. 「Your vegetables are really delicious.」 The queen is eating mayo cucumber while drinking shochu. Then I thought, how many glasses have we drunk? I mean, this place smells like alcohol already. 「Well then, it’s time we go home….」 It is almost duck and today’s purpose of establishing friendship has been achieved. I will leave the deal later to Arisa…..if we continue drinking like this, we won’t be able to go home at night. 「Even if you say you’re going home…..everyone’s already sleeping.」 Sonja and the hand-riding rabbits are sleeping drunk. Maa, the little children gang are done for and Maria and Aria are sleeping in a velvety state. 「Looks like it…..」 When she heard me say that, the queen smiled. 「By the way, Tatsuya-dono.」 「What is it?」 「You are strong, aren’t you?」 「Ah, that seems to be the case and it just happened for some reason.」 Then, the queen said with a lustrous sigh which was strengthened by alcohol. 「I heard from those three that you are also very strong in that…..」 Oi oi, how much did they drink to tell others about that….. Before I knew it, there were already ten elves surrounding me. 「Oi, are you going to take revenge after you got us drunk?」 I have to defend myself…..so I took out my hoe. The queen shook her head. 「Have you noticed that there’s no male elf?」 「Eh? Is that so?」 「Our race continues by getting seeds from other races.」 Then, along with the ten elves around me, the queen’s cheeks turned vermillion red while looking at me with erotic eyes. —-oi oi, this pattern….could it be…. 「We’re looking for seeds of outstanding me so—stay here today!」 As expected. I can only shrug my shoulders. 「No, but….we just met today, right?」 「There are ten beautiful elves here, right? Are you saying you don’t like them?」 Everyone is sad to the point that they are teary. It looks like they’ll start crying any moment. And so—I said this with my honest feeling. 「I don’t dislike you at all.」 A lot of this happened after that….I literally mean a lot. There’s even a time that I almost got scared because of the sheer number of people but other than that, there’s no problem. If I don’t have the skill “King of the Night” I might have been killed. No, I’m just exaggerating but they are strong opponents even individually. Well, I won in the end. —-given that, I concluded that elves are erofu. TN: As the title said, it’s a bad pun. Elf in Japanese is Erufu. Ero is short for erotic. 「Ah, paradise.」 I healed the fatigue I got from farming in the bath while I sighed as I looked at the two moons. Taking a bath is great after all. The food is good and I’m surrounded by beauties….perhaps I’m living a better life compared to the one I had in Japan. However, there is slavery in this world and “boom” I could have ended as one. In addition, I’m currently living in a monster den. In fact, it seems like my life here is in hard mode. It’s thanks to a number of mysterious skills I have that I don’t need to worry about those things. I really should be grateful for my isekai transmigration privilege. And then— 「Bath? Bath?」 Sonja came into the bath. 「The bath is great desu ne.」 Maria came in too. 「Master….I would like to rest in the bath if you don’t mind….」 Ouroboros came in too. 「I came to purchase materials but before that, I’ll take a bath.」 Arisa came in too. 「I came here to inspect the vegetables before the trade but….I heard that the bath is amazing and felt good.」 And so is the elf queen. I mean, this bath is a simple goemon type bath so it’s small. And since it is deep, the basic style is to enjoy it while standing. Of course, now that everyone went inside, it’s tightly packed. And since it’s packed, body-to-body contact is a matter of fact and that will make…a lot of things happen. In other words, it’s all according to these carnivorous women’s plan…. 「Aaaaahhhhh!」 And so, my moan melted into the darkness of the night. -0- The next day. 「The bath is broken?」 「Yes, master….Sonja is being reckless.」 The disgusted Ouroboros can only shrug her shoulders. I mean, I feel like everyone was reckless and not just her….let’s put that aside. 「The number of residents has increased so I want to make a proper house. I also want a proper bath and not a simple bath like that.」 「I see….」 Ouroboros made a difficult face—- 「I heard what you are talking about. However, Tatsuya-nii is also reckless.」 Arisa barged in through the door like always. 「Reckless?」 「If you want to make something right, you have to call craftsmen from a village. You will need both artisan and workers.」 「Maa, I suppose that’s true.」 「You have to hire a lot of people from the village and it will be a huge expense. As you know, this place is a high-level dungeon. They won’t go unless they are being escorted by high-level adventurers.」 That reminds me, you said that before too. 「It will be a life-threatening construction project in a high-level dungeon so you’ll be charged at a rip-off price. In addition, you have to keep high-ranking adventurers stay for several weeks. The total number of people needed should be between 15 to 30….and they’ll work for several weeks with their lives at risk.」 「How much will it cost?」 「It will cost around four thousand gold coins, materials not included. High-rank adventurers are like luxury goods especially when they’ll be dispatched for a long period of time in a dungeon…you can only hire them with that price. 」 All my money is sucked into the offering box….honestly, I’m like a fool. 「Is that your trouble?」 And then, the elf queen hit her palm with her fist. 「How about I send 10 of your young ones and craftsmen? It’s fine if you’ll just give us the right amount of compensation.」 「I appreciate your proposal but….the problem is, elf building skills is basically using trees, right? Is that okay for Tatsuya-nii?」 Maa, when we went to the elves’ place last time, it felt really fantasy-like because their houses are basically hollowed-out trees. It’s like, remodeling a big tree as an apartment. To be frank, I don’t like it that much. If you’re looking for a place to stay for one night, it will be a fun experience but if you’re going to live in a place like that….. 「Then, how about we talk to the dwarves?」 I smiled after hearing those words. It seems like I’ll meet one fantasy race after the other… –The next day. The next day, we arrived at a dwarf village not far from the elven village. Our group consists of me, Sonja, Ouroboros, the elf queen, and the hand riding rabbits. By the way, Maria was left behind to guard the hut. The dwarf village is located near the mine. In the center of the village, there’s a big steel mill-like structure in which black smoke was rising. 「I’m sorry but we don’t have enough manpower at the moment.」 The dwarf chief said that war is about to break out in the neighboring countries so the village is now focused on producing weapons and armor. By the way, dwarf men have an average height of around 155cm and 140cm for women. There are only old men and women and children up to twelve years old there. According to Ouroboros, the dwarves are some kind of “old race” where they suddenly become old at a certain age. And that’s for both men and women It seems like it is the normal feature of an old race so you would never find anyone that looks in their mid-teens to early thirties. 「Can’t you do something about it, chief? You and I are close, aren’t we!?」 The elves have been buying from the dwarves things that they will grant magical attributes to and they have been doing this for a long time that they have built a good relationship. Well, the elves are kind of a hermit race so they are basically treating them as good neighbors. 「But….」 The dwarf chief, who looks like a seventy-year-old grandfather, made a troubled expression. By the way, we are currently in the drawing room of the chief’s house. Seeing the things around, he should be living in a fairly good condition. The tea served is also delicious. 「By the way, I heard that chief has…a grandchild! I heard that she’s still a halfling. If that is the case, she should be free, right? Carpentry is one of your basic skills….she can do it too for sure, right? Lend her to me for around 2 weeks!」 Then, a twelve-year-old girl came out from the back. She has glossy light blue hair and her height is around 130cm. Anyway, she’s too different from the dwarves in my imagination since she’s not muscular. —-I mean, this girl is so cute. She looks like a pretty girl that will break if you touch her. Just looking at her can heal you. 「Grandpa….can I go? I’m still a halfling but….I’m already recognized as a full-grown if it is related to my skills….」 Bo-bo-bo….boku girl? TN: The pronoun “boku” is used by males to refer to himself. As expected of a fantasy world. This is the first time I’ve met a girl who talks like this. 「You can’t, Katya!」 「…..eh?」 「You are still a halfling! I won’t allow you to go out of the village!」 「Can’t you let her, chief? How about a week! I’ll even pay more!」 Oi oi, I’m the one who’ll actually pay. Don’t decide without my permission….maa, even if I say that, she won’t listen so I’ll just keep quiet here. 「Even if it is requested by the elves, we can’t since it’s the law of the village….」 「Law?」 「Yeah. Being a halfling means you are a trainee. You must not get to the outside world. A halfling can only be full-grown if he mines a special ore himself and make something from that ore as proof of being a full-grown.」 「But….」 「To tell the truth, this girl is already as good as a full-grown in terms of skill like she said herself.」 「Then, why is she still not making that proof?」 「Her birthday was last month and she should have done so according to plan. However, sudden order came, a lot of them, because of the war…..no one was free to escort her to the mine.」 「…..she needs escort?」 「The mine has become a dungeon. She has to be protected while exploring the mine. 」 And the elf queen nodded and smiled. 「I understand. As for her escort….we’ll do it! 」 You talk fast! In addition, she never thought that she needed to consult us before deciding anything first….. Well, it seems like it has been decided that we’ll go to a dungeon. A cave mine. We took a dimly lit, cold, and rocky path. The hand riding rabbits seem to have good night vision and are very useful in leading the route. 「Adamatite ore monster?」 「Yes. That’s our goal.」 「So, we are going to kill it to get the ore?」 Katya shook her head. 「Special ores can’t be dug, they can only be received. Adamantite is rare so it is very hard to find even you dig a lot.」 「But the other party won’t give us for free, isn’t it?」 「Ore monsters have a habit of collecting magic imbued metal products.」 Katya took out a sword that looks like a product of the elf village from her backpack. 「I’ll ask it to give us ore in exchange for this.」 「Why would it….take weapons?」 「This magic sword was imparted with magical energy using magic ore. Monsters can use that power to improve themselves.」 「I see.」 「Maa, just think of it as an ancient give and take contract.」 There are many kinds of monsters out there huh. 「That aside, it should already be dusk….」 And thus, we decided to set up a camp. -0- 「What’s that….it smells so good.」 「Ah, this is called curry. Don’t worry, there’s enough for everyone.」 Retort curry is so convenient, right? TN: Retort curry = instant curry. This time, it’s not a solid roux but a packed one that you only need to add hot water and boil. 「Curry?」 Then, Sonja said to Katya with a chuckle. 「You’ll be surprised desu yo.」 The water is already boiling so it is time to put it in hot water. After that, I served it to them with the rice I had cooked. Katya tilted her head upon seeing the mysterious brown food for the first time. She sniffed it and her stomach growled. She looked like she was wondering whether she should eat it or not so I smiled and gave her a push. 「Don’t worry, that doesn’t have poison.」 Katya nodded. Although kind of scared, she thrust the spoon to the curry. And then, put it in her mouth—— ——the moment she tasted it, she’s on fire. She started eating one spoon after another at a very fast pace as if she’s on fire. She’s eating so fast that just looking at her made my stomach feel full. She ate it all in less than a minute. She was so moved that she put her hands together in front of the chest and spoke. 「I’ve never eaten something so delicious.」 I laughed at her saying she’s exaggerating. 「It’s true desu?」 「We’ve never eaten something this good either desu?」 「So give us more desu?」 「You guys eat it all the time!」 I gave the nearest hand-riding rabbit a stern look and it got teary-eyed. 「Katya, do you want more?」 「Of course!」 Katya had an adorable smile on her face. -0- After dinner and a cup of tea, it was time for us to go to bed so I took out the sleeping bags I brought. Before going to bed, Sonja and Ouroboros asked for night action as usual…. 「Eh? You girls…..what are you trying to do…..?」 Katya froze and blushed. She immediately goes back to her sleeping back. This might have been too exciting for a 12-year-old girl. Read the latest update only at SHMTranslations.com —-the next morning. I was the first one to wake up. While boiling water and making tea for everyone, Katya woke up. 「A-a-ano….you guys were…..」 「Hnn? What is it?」 When I asked her that, Katya blushed. 「Do you always do that?」 Katya asked while blushing more. 「Maa, you’re supposed to do that before going to bed and when you wake up.」 Katya became redder. 「You’re saying…..it’s very normal to you?」 I’m not sure why she can’t look directly at me. She’s just glancing at me from time to time which makes it hard for me to talk to her. 「Actually, I’m kind of interested in that kind of…stuff」 「Heh, I see.」 「Dwarves have a low fertility rate. There are no men of my age in the village. The only men there are children, old men, and grandfathers.」 「Maa, you’re one of those children.」 「That’s why I’m interested. However, I don’t have a partner.」 「Such a shame.」 「…….like, ki….ki…..kissing….I’m interested in that too. I was so nervous last night that I couldn’t…… sleep. That’s why I waited all night, waiting for you to wake up.」 I don’t know what’s happening but I’m starting to get irritated. 「What are you trying to say?」 「……dwarves are blacksmiths by profession. We also have the power to detect whether a person is strong. If a person is not strong enough, we’ll not hand over our weapon to that person. And we’re also attracted to the strong.」 What does this girl want to say? 「I guess that’s also the reason why the oneechans are attracted to you.」 「So, what are you trying to say?」 「I’m interested, I’m nervous, I couldn’t sleep! I have no partner!」 「I’m sorry but I don’t get what you’re saying.」 Katya’s face turned red but in a different meaning—- 「Mou——-! I don’t care about you! I’m going to sleep!」 And she went inside her sleeping bag. And so, we proceeded to the depths of the mine. I don’t know why Katya was sulking but I don’t care. However, sometimes, she’s giving me some…. hot stares but I don’t care about it either. 「Charge desu!」 「Let’s do it desu!」 「Hahaha, our army is invincible.」 「Let’s beat them desu!」 「ＴＯＲＡＴＯＲＡＴＯＲＡ!」 In any case, the monsters we have encountered were beaten to a pulp by the hand-riding rabbits as soon as they were discovered. Incidentally, Katya said “Eh? Those guys are the hand-riding rabbits?”. Her legs gave out for a moment after learning that. I think we should thank them since these lovely creatures are helping us to get rid of monsters along the way. Then, as if we were going through an uninhabited field, countless monster corpses, slain by the hand riding rabbits, are piled up along the way…. Read the latest update only at SHMTranslations.com A giant crystal….No, it’s not. It’s an ore. Anyway, we found the giant crystal-like, pale iridescent ore monster. 「This one is the adamantite king.」 I see, so this guy was the one who Katya explained to me yesterday. 「I’m the dwarves’ chief’s daughter. I want you to give me adamantite according to our ancient contract.」 Katya took out the sword that was imbued with magic by the elves from her backpack and handed it over to the adamantite. 「….I’m sorry but I can’t.」 「What do you mean? Are you going to back out from the contract….」 「The adamantite in my body has already been taken. There is a limit to the amount of adamantite my body can refine. If I make more, it will take my vitality….」 Katya’s expression stiffened. 「What the hell is going on?」 「In the deepest part of the mine….evil doers have settled in. They are humans and seem to be researching….alchemy.」 I see. So it was that alchemist that took the ore. 「They took the adamantite from my body by force as if I’m just a normal rock.」 「How can they do that?」 「If that is the case, it means that it is alright for us to take that back by force.」 Everyone aside from Katya nodded but the adamantite king said in a gloomy tone: 「However, they are being escorted by…a hero from another world. That’s why I, the king of the mine, was defeated.」 「Hero…..from another world?」 「It was a young man. I’m sure his name is….Miyamoto.」 That’s a nostalgic name. I didn’t think we’d have a reunion at this place. Miyamoto, the leader of the high schoolers that left me in the forest of no return. I clenched my fists and headed for the deepest part of the mine. And so, we reached the deepest part of the mine. By the way, Sonja and the hand riding rabbits disappeared into the darkness of the cave. They said they found a mysterious wild boar. It is a famous rare ingredient so they wouldn’t miss the chance of hunting one. The deepest level was quite a large space. It’s about the size of a municipal city gymnasium. It looks like a base camp of mountain climbers. I could see tents of different sizes. At the edge of the way, slave looking people in shabby clothes are swing their pickaxes. They seemed to be mining for ore. We walked up to the largest tent and called out to them. Then, an old man dressed like an alchemist and a blonde-haired, toothless…guy named Miyamoto came out. 「Ah? Is that you, old man? You’re alive?」 Miyamoto said that to me while smirking. No no, there’s no way I’ll reply with a “long time no see” line. 「You….aren’t you supposed to be in the royal capital for your hero training?」 「Yah, right. However, they’re too….serious?」 Why is he talking like that…. 「What do you mean serious?」 「The training is too serious. It’s so serious that we have been driven to the point of pissing blood. I got so strong that I decided to back out.」 「You can…back out?」 「The word effort, I hate it to the bones! Maa, when I’m become powerful enough to be a B Rank adventurer, I thought I had the power to do whatever I want.」 Miyamota made a full smile. I mean, this guy is really….a scum among the scums. 「I went out to the city but there’s no way anyone will hire a runaway hero. Even the adventurer guild will not dare. However, I knew the existence of the underground guild and that solved my trouble.」 「Underground guild?」 「Ah, well, it’s a criminal’s guild. This alchemist here, Gramps Aldheim, is doing illegal research….he’s short in manpower so he hired me. In short, my current mission is to guard this ore mining expedition.」 I see. At least now I’ve confirmed that this group of people are nothing but a bunch of criminals. 「Old man, you probably don’t know this yet but I’ll teach you something good.」 Then, Miyamoto signaled a slave who’s currently mining. Then, kicked the slave as soon as it got closer to him. 「Gyaa!」 Seeing the slave rolling around, Miyamoto laughed. 「Haha. Isn’t it fun? In this world, money and power are justice. There people are marked with slave crests so they will never disobey even if they don’t want to, no matter how many times you punch or kick them…..it’s a good way to kill time. If you break a hand or something, they’ll even do something funnier.」 「You…..」 「Now, I just have to earn a lot of money and buy a lot of slaves, men and women, under my command. Isn’t that so much fun?」 I think I should correct the “scum” part. This guy is a savage. He’s not even human. And then, Miyamoto shifted his gaze to Ouroboros and….exclaimed. 「Oi, old man….who is that super beautiful maid over there?」 「Ah, a lot of things happened but she ended up living with me.」 He looked at me and Ouroboros alternately over and over again and then, Miyamoto held his head…. 「That beautiful lady over there? I don’t know what kind of things happened but that’s not good old man.」 「What do you mean?」 「Look at yourself old man, you look like an old man.」 No, I’m only 29 years old. A 29 year old is not an old man so I’m not old. 「This old man only has farming skills as a bonus. To put it simply, he’s garbage among the garbage. You should think about it carefully and choose a hero like me – an absolute strong person. How about we go inside the tent for a coffee?」 Then, Ouroboros asked me. 「Master….this is a piece of trash….do you mind if I kill it?」 「No, wait a minute」 「As you wish」 Ouroboros backed down with an unconvinced expression. I mean, as expected of a noble of the demon world. Killing someone is always an option. Her expression is so serious that I’m sure she’ll do it if I say go ahead…. That aside, Miyamoto made a confused expression. 「Eh? Could it be that you don’t like me?」 「Yes. I’m afraid I have to decline.」 「Eh? Why not? I’m definitely better than that old man, right? I’m young, good-looking, and a hero.」 I have to deny that “good-looking” part, Miyamoto. Perhaps to youngsters, a delinquent like you is strangely popular with some girls but you are mistaken. Once you’ve officially entered society, no decent woman will be attracted to you. 「It’s okay it’s okay. How about we share a little coffee?」 Then, Miyamoto grabbed Ouroboros’ right hand. Is this guy….planning to drag her into the tent? You should stop that! I can already see blue lines on Ouroboros’ face. I only temporarily stopped her but she will kill you for real. And then……. 「Ufufufu, a big catch nano desu?」 Sonja and the hand-riding rabbits arrived here while dragging a boar. As soon as Miyamoto saw Sonja—— 「…..how can such a cute girl exist in this world?」 As soon as Miyamoto saw Sonja, he started to dash towards her as fast as he could. And immediately told Sonja— 「I am a hero! I’ll tell you directly! Be my woman! You can have all the money and honor you want!」 No no Miyamoto….there’s no way those words can seduce anyone. Then Sonja said “Fufu” and kicked him. 「Ufufufu, this person is terribly disgusting desu?」 「Argh!」 Miyamoto was blown away with tremendous force and crashed into the wall of the cave. Or rather, slammed into the wall. 「I kicked a disgusting person, my foot is now dirty? I’ll wash it thoroughly later desu?」 Her tone was mild but her face was filled with ferocious discomfort. Maa, she was suddenly seduced by a stupid blonde, with missing teeth, and disgusting person. I guess her reaction is normal….. And then, Ouroboros walks up to Miyamoto who’s jerking into the wall. 「….I can tolerate what you’ve done to me however, you mocked my master as a piece of garbage, right?」 He grabbed Miyamoto’s collar and pulled him off the wall. Then, while holding Miyamoto with her right hand, keeping him suspended in the air, she continued to speak. 「Have you arranged your properties? Have you written a will? If you haven’t, please forgive me since you no longer have the chance to do so.」 Apparently, Ouroboros seemed to have recognized Sonja’s blow as my go signal. 「However….」 Then, Ouroboros gave out a cold laugh. 「If you can summarize it in 20 characters, I would at least hear it.」 「…….」 However, Miyamoto did not respond to Ouroboros’ words. It seems like he fainted from Sonja’s blow. 「You just boasted you are the strongest hero and yet…..fainted with Sonja’s blow.」 Then, a loud “pashin” was heard. Ouroboros slapped Miyamoto. 「Agi!?」 It seems like that slap woke up Miyamoto. He was stunned seeing the situation he’s in. 「You are far from the strongest. Let alone master and Cornelia-sama, 5 seconds is enough for me to kill you.」 Then, Ouroboros continued to feed Miyamoto with slaps back and forth. 「Agyu!」 —-slap. 「Byug!」 —-slap. 「Gugi!」 —-slap. 「Jaju!」 —-slap. 「Jiyo!」 Both cheeks of Miyamoto swelled up and looking at him, he is worse than a person with mumps. Oi oi, he totally looks like a manga character. Ah, a tooth flew out. As if it was something filthy, I evaded Miyamoto’s tooth. 「Ple…..pe……preessss stop….gya!」 —-slap. 「I don’t understand a damned bug’s language.」 Then….the back and forth slapping began again. —-slap. 「Abiba!」 —-slap. 「Pugi!」 「Isn’t this the mouth that insulted master?」 「Bugura!」 「Isn’t this the mouth that should be burned in the flames of hell?」 「Mugera!」 「Using this filthy mouth, repent to the God Anubis in the underworld, okay?」 「Nooo….please do-n’t….gubera!」 Ah, this time, it’s a straight right into the bridge of his nose. Ouroboros is smiling so much. She has a wide smile but looking at her eyes, she’s beyond scary. I mean, she’s basically a demon so I guess this is her true nature. I’m really glad that I’m lucky enough to have a positive relationship with her. So, when Miyamoto’s face was so deformed that even Frankenstein would run away, I extended my helping hand. 「Ouroboros…that’s enough.」 「But master…」 「Just stop」 「I agree desu yo? Even if that thing is disgusting, you don’t have to kill it desu yo?」 Just don’t kill. After this, let’s just tie him with a rope and hand him over to the city guard or even Arisa to have him judged by the law. A hero running away from training should be a serious crime. And Ouroboros threw Miyamoto down with an unconvinced expression. 「Ahi…..hiya….awawa…..」 After being released, Miyamoto looked so frightened he tried to crawl back to the big tent…..but he stepped on Sonja’s backpack that she had placed on the floor. Then, I heard the sound of carrots being crushed. Ah…..blood leaves Sonja’s face and her shoulders are trembling. —-that guy stepped on a landmine. And stepping on a land mine is the last thing he should have done. The hand riding rabbits can’t be reasoned with, so this is really bad. Then, the hand-riding rabbits began to buzz. Their ears perked up and their blue eyes instantly lit up with vermillion flames of rage. 「Weren’t you taught by your mother to not waste food?」 「This rotten bastard actually….crushed a carrot!」 「The only thing that you can pay for the crushed carrot is your life!」 「If we don’t do anything here, we will be disgraced by the hand-riding rabbits generations to come!」 「Ane ane-san! Permission to fight!」 「Rooaaarrr!! Ahhhhggghhh! Oooouuuuu! I can’t take it anymoreeeee! Let beat him uppppp!」 With a big smile on her face, Sonja thrust her right fist forward and stuck out her thumb upward. Then, she flips her right hand over making her thumb points downward. 「Now, little rabbits? Do it thoroughly until you are exhausted desu yo!」 Ah….his death sentence. He’s absolutely dead alright. —maa, he got what he deserved. I stopped it. I stopped it twice. I no longer have any obligation to stop it anymore. Then, the hand-riding rabbits jumped to Miyamoto. I slowly close my eyes, write a cross on my chest, and pray for the dead. 「Miyamoto….go to heaven.」 And then— 「Ugh…..argh……ugyaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa!」 Miyamoto’s scream echoed through the cave. The basic equipment of the hand riding rabbits is needle-like spears. Using those, every one of them is stabbing Miyamoto’s body….. Stab. Stab. Stab Stab Stab Stab Stab Stab Stab Stab Stab 「Ugyaaaaaaaaaaaaaaa!」 The scream and the scene can only be described as hellish. And then, the hand-riding rabbits started to glow. Ah, can these guys use magic too? Ah……….. —–Miyamoto’s on fire. Yeah, he’s burning. He was burned. Miyamoto was burned. 「giiiiiiii———」 No, to be precise, dozens of flames as big as a lighter’s fire are burning Miyamoto…… Well, he looked grilled but to the point of being burnt. 「That’s terrible….」 I mean, they are small attacks but I didn’t hear the tsuk tsuk, blam blam, burn burn stop for even a second there….scary. I’m really glad that these guys are not my enemies. The burning, stabbing, and relentless attacks on Miyamoto by the hand-riding rabbits did not stop for around 20 minutes. 「….are you alive?」 I don’t know what to say…..for now, I asked Miyamoto, who’s lying on the ground, in a hideous state, but he did not answer. He looks like a blood daruma with smoke coming from all over his body. I poked him with a stick I found nearby. Ah, he twitched. He seems to be alive. As expected of a hero, he has lots of vitality. 「If you’re lucky, you should be able to survive. After that, do something about yourself.」 I left a bottle of potion near Miyamoto’s head. I at least showed some mercy. Now, let’s speak with the grandfather alchemist who’s doing some dangerous research…. 「Ah, ahhhh….ahahaha…..hand ri….hand riding rabbits….so many….even the queen….in addition….a demon world noble….however….why in a maid’s clothes……..」 He has been muttering something since a while ago. Then, someone pulled my clothes and whispered. 「Now, what should we do, master?」 「Right….」I nodded. 「For now, tie everyone with rope and restrain them. They are doing something illegal so let’s hand them over to the adventurers guild. Of course, that includes Miyamoto.」 Well, in Miyamoto’s case, he needs to survive from the border of life and death first or he can’t be caught. 「As you wish, master.」 Ouroboros bowed after saying that. By the way, we decided to put to good use the large amount of ores the alchemist had collected. And so, we invited some craftsmen to come to our house to renovate our house. You can hear clang clang and blam blam everywhere. The dwarf girl….Katya, who looks like a 12-year-old girl, is indeed skillful. My house is being renovated under her watch. The work speed is also not bad since we hired ten elves that know carpentry. The metals needed were brought from the dwarf village. As for wood, they’re growing everywhere. Let’s just cut some. 「I can finally have my own room desu yo?」 「Even though I’ve been an adventurer for a long time and used living in a group…I still value my privacy.」 「Master….you even bestowed a room to a maid like me….」 Everyone’s excited. Maa, it can’t be helped since we’re all living in a shed. It was so small so we were really restricted. The kitchen is also going to be built properly so we would have a place to eat. We have been eating outside but now, we’re even going to have a large living room. There will also be a dismantling place that Arisa will surely love. We’re also going to dig a well so we won’t have to worry about drinking water. Of course, we’re also planning to build a bathhouse big enough for everyone. I’m embarrassed to say that our toilet has always been the outside world but once the house is complete, we’ll have one inside. It’s also been leaking badly and I’ve been fed up with it. In addition, we built a place dedicated for the altar to make it more magnificent. That Zenigeba god says that if we do so, he’ll give us a little discount. TN: Zenigeba is a manga about extreme poverty. I plan to make sake in the future so I also have a workshop for multipurpose use…. Maa, it’s going to have a long construction period because it is a large-scale project. However, they are going to build the private rooms of the main house at a rapid pace so we can live in them after a few days. Anyway, this will raise our standard of living in a stretch. I’m kind of emotional when I think about the time when I can only eat snakes. Also, everyone says they like their own private rooms after all. We used to sleep on the same bed until now. With this, I can finally rest my body at night….when I was thinking of that, Sonja began to say something. 「So, can you make a sturdy bed for the bedroom where we all sleep?」 「…..eh?」 「I agree. I was worried about the bed breaking when Sonja is going pyon pyon as a cowgirl.」 Certainly, when Sonja is riding on top of me…. No, rather than pyon pyon, she goes full pyonpyonpyonpyonpyonpyon…… 「Are we still going to sleep together? Don’t you have your own rooms?」 The three stared at me indirectly saying “What are you saying?”. Ah, I see. Their rooms are just their private rooms….when it is time to sleep, everyone will still sleep together. I can only smile bitterly as I think how hard this was going to be. 「Alright, let’s stop working and have dinner.」 And so, it was time for dinner. The elves and Katya had been working all day so they were very hungry. By the way, I’m not going to do anything stupid like charging them. I’ve always been the kind of person that brings juice and sweets to the movers when I was in Japan. Since they were the ones building my house, I think that’s the least I should do. The elves eat mostly vegetables while we eat meat. Dwarves just eat anything available….. So, how can we make sure that everyone will eat well? I’ve been thinking about it since late afternoon and I only thought of one thing. I ordered a certain item from the donation box. —-chanko nabe! Yeah, it’s a kind of nabe that everyone loves. You can eat a lot of vegetables and meat or you can just eat vegetables or just eat meat. At any rate, I threw in some wild boar meat. It’s an S-class rare food that the hand-riding rabbits had hunted in the mines. I also threw a lot of bean sprouts and cabbages from the field. There were more than ten of use so it’s quite a lot of food— 「What’s this? I’ve never eaten anything this delicious before!?」 「Is this the work of the spirit-sama of the forest!? These cabbage and beansprouts are out of this world….in addition, the soup….it’s too delicious!」 「Meat meat carrot? meat carrot?」 「Delicious desu yo. Very delicious desu yo.」 「Oi you? Can’t you at least cook it as curry nabe….」 「As expected of Tatsuya-sama!」 「Delicious delicious nano desu?」 「Master’s dishes are the best desu ne!」 Only the demon king Cornelia, who jumped out of nowhere to participate seemed to be dissatisfied but it is popular with everyone else. I mean, this boar meat is really delicious after all. The fat is sweet, the meat is super juicy, and the more you chew, the more you can taste the umami of the meat. If I open up a chanko nabe in Japan with this….it will definitely be popular. It’s my first time eating a nabe this delicious after all. I think the best nabe is when a lot of ingredients are cooked at once. The broth that comes out of various ingredients and the synergistic effect of all the ingredients makes an amazing dish. I cooked it from a big pot but it was gone in no time. I mean, the hand-riding rabbits eat too much food. I don’t know where they put it in their small bodies. The hand-riding rabbits seemed to have recently discovered the deliciousness of rice so they started making rice porridge by pouring cooked white rice and carrots into the leftover soup. 「Delicious desu yo. Very delicious desu yo」 「So good?」 「Soup of god desu yo」 The hand riding rabbits were eating so deliciously that everyone started getting some rice porridge…. 「This!? Is rice this delicious!? I’ve never tasted anything like this! 」 「Even the spirit-sama of the forest can’t make something like this 」 「Rice rice carrot? rice carrot?」 「Porridge should be eaten like this desu yo.」 「Oi you? Can’t you at least cook it as curry porridge….」 「This is the first time I’ve eaten rice porridge and I can’t believe it’s so delicious. As expected of Tatsuya-sama!」 「Master, I think I’m done eating. I have to prepare to clean up….」 And so, with the exception of the demon king, our homemade meal ended up being very popular today. So, that night was a tough one. It was a newly made bedroom and the only bed was as sturdy as ordered. Or rather, it was big. That night….aside from the usual Sonja, Maria, and Ouroboros, ten elves broke into the room. -0- The next day…. The exhausted me was watching the yellow sun after doing my farm work. Then, Katya, a dwarf, came to me during her carpentry work break. 「Hey there」 「Hnn? What’s the matter?」 When I looked at her, I saw that she brought some rice balls with her. Apparently, she wanted us to have lunch together. So, we washed our hands and sat down on a rock that was big enough to be chairs. 「These onigiris are delicious. Did you make them?」 「Yes. My interest was piqued with how delicious the rice here is. I had Maria teach me how to make them.」 They were very salty. When I took a bite of the onigiri, Katya smiled happily. 「Good, right?」 「Yes.」 Katya smiled happily. 「What’s the matter?」 「No, I’m just trying to get to know you.」 「What do you mean by that?」 「Last night…..I was sleeping in the next room.」 Ah, a lot of moaning should have leaked out. As proof of that, Katya’s cheeks were bright red. 「Oh…….ohhh….」 「Ano….that….I also….like I said before….I’m interested in that…..」 Katya’s face turned redder and said “No, it’s nothing!” and ran away. 「What was that……」 I saw off the running Katya. Read the latest update only at SHMTranslations.com That night, we had a party. All the women were drunk and sleeping together in the living room. I crawled into the bed thinking I can finally sleep alone today. 「Hello….」 Katya was hiding under the futon. That….made me speechless. 「I’m also….a girl, you know. I’m….interested in that.」 「But there are problems, right?」 I knew she was interested in that but….no way I’ll lay my hand on a young girl. If I lay my hand on this girl, aside from the guilt I’ll feel, I’ll be looked at like a scumbag by everyone around. That’s why I decided to stay away from her….but now…. And then, Katya’s body glowed. 「I….can get bigger or smaller. Dwarves are blacksmiths, you know. If you’re a girl, you won’t have enough muscle strength in doing heavy work so you have to strengthen your body. This is the application of that.」 「…..I see.」 It feels like a metamorphosis. Katya suddenly turned into someone in her late teens. She has a nice body. Of course, have I mentioned that she’s a beauty. No, but, I think someone under 18 years of age is still a no. Katya nodded as if she knew what I wanted to say. 「…..I’m….one hundred and twelve years old….you know…..one hundred and twelve….」 Then, there’s no problem. I heard that dwarves are also a long-lived race and it looks like it’s true. No, even so….I still feel a little resistant….. 「What’s wrong? What’s with that expression? Could it be that….you dislike me?」 And so, I said this with my honest feelings. 「I don’t dislike you at all.」 Since she’s of legal age and she transformed into a big beauty, there’s no problem at all. That means I can lay my hands on her without being persecuted. I hugged Katya. Then, Katya laughed mischievously and spoke. 「Later…I can transform bigger or smaller if you like.」 「What are you trying to say.」 「I can get bigger and smaller instantly. There are only the two of us now so we don’t have to worry about being seen. I’ll leave the rest to you.」 「Don’t joke around.」 When I said that, Katya laughed mischievously—she’s bewitching after all. 「I really don’t care which size do you prefer.」 So, a lot happened that night. As for the details, maa, ….I’ll just say I’m an evil guy. —and, maa, that’s the reason why Katya started to call me “oniichan” from “you”. 「The bedroom is finished, oniichan.」 Since Katia is pushing her chest out, I patted her head. Then, she said, “I didn’t report it to you because I want a head pat.” as she puffed her cheeks. However, I didn’t miss the fact that her cheeks loosened up. I was about to ask what kind of tsundere play is that but I don’t want to complicate things by saying that. Anyway, I just nod and smile while thinking it was cute. 「Ah, right, oniichan…」 「Hnn? What is it?」 「You want a full-scale renovation, right?」 「Well, yeah.」 –? ? ? ? ? Private Rooms –? ? ? ? ? Huge indoor bath –? ? ? ? ? Kitchen –? ? ? ? ? Living room –? ? ? ? ? Dismantling Shack –? ? ? ? ? Farming Shed –? ? ? ? ? Sake Brewery –? ? ? ? ? A few multipurpose huts Those are just to name a few things we want to be built. To secure water, we also need to dig a channel from the river and dig a well too. There is a lot of work to be done. 「Then, we have to build a furnace.」 「Furnace?」 「Yes. I have some metal materials with me but it’s a hassle to run to the dwarf village when I need something.」 「Hmmm….even though it’s a long term construction project, you don’t have to go that far, do you?」 「Because we have to make a lot of things in the future, don’t we? I’ll also live here from now on so….furnace is necessary.」 She just said something I can’t ignore. 「Eh? Katya’s going to live here?」 Then, Katya’s cheeks dyed red, and spoke again. 「O-o-of course….! O-o…..niichan is like my husband after all!」 「……Eh?」 「I’m not casual you know.」 「Ehto….」 When I was tongue twisted, Katya hugged me. 「……I……I….I love you.」 「O…….oh.」 「I can’t believe you’re actually….forcing a girl to say this to you. Unbelievable.」 The grumbling Katya said so. This girl, she’s really cute. Maa, for the time being, it seems like it is confirmed that a new official permanent resident has come. It’s really getting crowded. -0- My current roommates are Sonja, Maria, Ouroboros, and Katya. The ten elves will probably leave at some point but they’ll stay here for a while first. In addition, Arisa comes here at least twice a week and the elf queen comes once a week and stays for a night as part of her farming inspection. I’m not sure if I can continue like this….my body, I’m sorry. But it’s not like I dislike it. Yeah, I don’t dislike it at all. Read the latest update only at SHMTranslations.com 「Ah, then, after you’ve built the private rooms….and the well, you are free to build that furnace.」 「I see. I understand, oniichan.」 Good good. The plan to make more facilities in this place will proceed smoothly with this. 「Isn’t that too wide for a vineyard?」 Maria’s sexiness is reduced by half when she’s in her work clothes but I like the serious atmosphere around her. If she puts on some glasses, she’ll look like an intellectual oneesan. Actually, I prefer the sweaty construction site girl….like the architect who has been dispatched for site inspection from the head office. It is only the education system that says ladies don’t suit that place. But that’s not important. Anyway, Maria wiping the sweat accumulated because of farm work with a cloth looked very beautiful. 「Yeah, I’m planting to make sake.」 「Sake, is it?」 「Actually, our family’s finances are in a pinch.」 「….Eh? With the high-class materials supplied by the hand riding rabbits and the cyclops that you and Sonja hunted….shouldn’t we have a lot of money?」 「We spend money like idiots to expand and renovate our house, we spend money like idiots when it comes to seasonings and more than anything….」 「What? 」 「You party like there’s no tomorrow.」 That’s right. We’re getting a lot of alcohol from Earth that it’s getting really bad. Everyone seemed to be fond of chuchai in can. Well, I drink it too. TN: Chuchai is a brand of alcohol. That cost five thousand yen for a case of 500ml cans….in other words, 5000 pieces of gold coins. Basically, I order sake from either the elf village or the dwarf village but when it’s party time, sake from earth is still the best so we drink that. It’s not their fault but mine for ordering them. In any case, the balance in the offering box is less than 2000 yen and I’m intensely contemplating about it. 「That’s why I’m thinking of making wine and sake. Because of that, I had to expand the vineyard. Once this work is done, I plan to expand the paddy next.」 That means a waterway is a must. We’ve been growing a small amount of rice but with my farming skills, we only used little water for our paddy. 「If we use the grapes made by Tatsuya-sama, I’m sure we can make an out of this world wine.」 Well, I can easily adjust the sugar content and everything through seed creation. If I can make it feel like a half fermented juice wine, I might be able to please everyone, even Katya who’s not good with sake. 「Then, let’s make wine vinegar too. The elves and dwarves will like it, right?」 「They should. Especially the dwarves since they are alcoholics….it is rare for someone like Katya to show up.」 「I think we’ll make a good profit if we sell it to them. Of course, we better make sure that we’ll calculate our consumption and only sell the surplus.」 「Do you think Cornelia-sama likes wine too?」 「Ah, perhaps she does.」 Are curry and wine a good match…. I’m not sure if curry and wine go together or not. Let’s try cooking katsu curry next time. I’m sure it will be a good snack for sake if it is served without rice and add some egg like a curry donburi. Maa, and that’s how I’ve decided my future farming plans. For now, let’s concentrate on sake. Read the latest update only at SHMTranslations.com I also want to eat bread so I’ll probably make a wheat field too. I’m sure everyone would love pizza. —the next day. 「Areh? Where are the hand-riding rabbits? I haven’t seen anyone of them today.」 After completing my farm work, I asked Sonja. 「Fufufu. They are out, hunting desu yo.」 「Eh? All of them?」 Normally, half of the hand-riding rabbits will stay with Sonja in the name of guarding the queen. No, to be precise, to do things for Sonja. 「I heard it from Maria desu yo. Our family budget is in a pinch desu?」 Sonja said that while lying on the sofa in the living room and looking at the offering box catalog. Eh….? I froze on the spot. These girls….are really good girls. 「Fufufu. We discussed it together and decided that in the end desu yo. 」 Sonja pointed her head after saying so. It seems like she wants me to pat her head but she’s the queen so she basically does nothing but eat. The hand riding rabbits are great but she’s not. I mean, they have a bit of bourgeois…perhaps there will be a coup d’etat someday. When the elf queen showed up before, they immediately wanted to run away since it’s not related to carrots. They don’t seem to see their queen’s majesty at all. 「Eh? Are you not going to pet me? 」 Ah, no. She’s getting teary-eyed. It’s just like at night but if I ignore her like this….there will be trouble. When she’s in a bad mood, she’ll puff her cheeks and when you try to talk to her, all she’ll say is “I’m pouting right now desu! I’m pouting right now desu!”. The good thing is, you can just leave her alone for three days and once she gets bored, she’ll treat you normally again. 「Ufufufu. Being pet feels great desu ne. 」 While I’m petting Sonja, I heard the sound of someone knocking on the door. 「Oh? Arisa? Is today the day you’ll pick up the materials? 」 「No no. 」 Arisa shook her head and came into the living room. Then, she began to spread her luggage on the table. 「Since you talked about a dismantling shed, I brought a lot of tools. 」 Saw, various types of knives, grinding stones, tongs. She spread them on the cloth laid on the table. 「This will be our dismantling set. I was more of an assistant to a party, you know. I’ve been a non-combatant member of different parties so I can do all sorts of non-combat chores. 」 「Areh? But, aren’t you pretty strong yourself? 」 “Haha” Arisa laughed. 「Like I said, I’ve been a member of different parties. I’ve been in a few parties in my life but I’ve never shown my ability to anyone. 」 「Why?」 「Nothing is more valuable than life! If they knew my ability, they’ll force me to fight!」 Arisa said proudly while she sticks out her thin chest. 「I’m like a hawk that hides its claws! The moment the party is in danger, the best choice is to flee the scene!」 「Is that something you should be proud of?」 You’re such a selfish woman. 「However, why did you show us your skills when we were in the elf village?」 Arisa’s cheeks suddenly turned vermillion red. 「Tatsuya-nii has seen everything…..you have seen everything there is to see in me. Will there be a point in hiding…..」 Maa, I guess that’s true. However, I don’t feel bad about you being honest with me about something that no one else knows. 「So, this is our dismantling set. Where should I put them?」 「The dismantling shed has yet to be built. When Ouroboros, who’s currently washing clothes in the river, comes back, let’s have her decide where to put them temporarily.」 And then, Arisa smiled at me. 「Are you free today until dusk tomorrow?」 「Yeah, I’m free today. As for tomorrow, I’ll be as free tomorrow too. But I might think of doing something so might be busy.」 「Which is it?」 「There’s no immediate farm work to be done but there’s no end to what needs to be done in the future.」 「I guess it’s settled then.」 As she said that, Arisa grabbed my arm and hugged it. She pressed it against her chest with my elbow in a folded position. 「Oi, what are you doing?」 「Tatsuya-nii, why don’t you go out to town with me for a while for a date?」 「A date?」 「I’d like to apologize for ripping you off. I’m going to buy you all kinds of drinks.」 Maa, I guess it would be great to be treated with a meal or two. Come to think of it, our daily necessities were also running out. Basically, we have Arisa to buy goods in the city for us but she can only carry as much in one go. I also wanted to see the market of the city. Yes, I can order anything I like using the offering box but that’s such a gold-eating thing so it’s not as good as buying in the market. 「Okay. Then, let’s go. Hey, Sonja, want to come too?」 Sonja, who was lying on the sofa, turned her face to me and laughed meaningfully. 「Fufufu.I have some work to do later desu yo.」 Hnn? Work? Sonja, who has always believed that to work is to lose, is going to work….? I was wondering what she meant but at that moment, Arisa glared at Sonja. 「Idiot!」 「Ahahaha. I….said something stupid desu」 It’s pretty obvious. These girls seem to be hiding something from me. Maa, it doesn’t really matter. 「Then, let’s take Ouroboros with us. The only thing she had are the maid clothes from the demon world.」 Well, she still had her behind the scene oneesan clothes. As for Maria, she has a high-exposure bikini armor. I wonder if demons prefer those kinds of clothes. No, Cornelia is completely different from them. 「Ouroboros-san has something to do desu yo」 「Hnn? Ouroboros?」 「Maria too. By the way, Katya included.」 Sonja laughs. I mean, there is obviously something happening. 「I already expected you to be terrible but…..」 Arisa can only hold her head after hearing Sonja. It seems like she no longer has the intention to hide whatever they’re hiding from me…. 「Maa, let’s just go to the city with the two of us.」 We’re currently in the city, eating our way down the main street. 「Oh? Moraris fruit. Seeing something like that is quite rare….」 Arisa ran to the fruit stall. She gave a few silver coins which means it’s a pretty expensive fruit. One silver coin is around a thousand yen after all. 「Hey, Tatsuya-nii, this is my favorite food.」 She gave me one of the two she bought. 「Thank you」 It looks like some kind of pear although it’s longer and slimmer than a pear. The best description I can think of is that it is a combination of apple and pear. The crunchy texture was pleasant and the sweetness was not bad. However, Arisa looks uncomfortable. 「What’s wrong?」 「No, I just thought it doesn’t taste good enough.」 「Why? I think it’s tasty enough.」 「No no. I don’t think it tastes as good as it used to. The cherry tomatoes that Tatsuya-nii cultivated is better than this.」 No, that’s a tomato, it’s not a fruit. I set its sugar content to the maximum so it was almost at the level of confectionary sugar…. I mean, I think it would be better if I did it with a melon or something. Other crops like pumpkins and potatoes may also become as sweet as that. If I make a watermelon like that and juice it, I’m sure everyone will be happy. Girls love sweets after all. Okay, let’s make it next time. 「Maa, that’s all I have to offer after all.」 「No, you….are one of the strongest people in the world.」 「Thanks to that I became a little popular.」I said that with a bitter smile. In fact, the women living in my house are beautiful enough to make Japanese actresses and idols a run for their money. In Japan, even if I handstand in front of them, they won’t even give me a glance. 「No, that’s not it….I don’t think that’s the only reason.」 「Really?」 「In my case, for example, I think Tatsuya-nii is a good person.」 「….hnn?」 「That time when I ripped you off, it’s already at a level where I won’t be able to complain even if you tie me up and dismember me. The amount of money I took from you is just way too much.」 「Maa, it seems like the rule with regards to punishing robbery is very strict.」 「Also, today’s shopping is not about buying your things but buying for everyone’s needs, right? Even the farm expansion and renovation are basically because you want everyone to be better.」 「Well, that’s true.」 We decided to go to a women’s clothing store after we finished buying our daily necessities. 「I think you are wonderful. You’re even doing these kinds of things even though you are powerful enough to be self-centered and do whatever you want.」 When Arisa said that casually, I got a little nervous. No, I think it’s more of “embarrassed”. 「……」 「I’m not sure how to say it but, I’m sure everyone’s attracted to a lot of things about Tatsuya-nii. You are even from another world and you are a lot more different from people here but…in a good way.」 「Is that how it is?」 「Yeah, that’s my honest opinion.」 I’m embarrassed to hear someone saying something like that about me. 「So, what are you up to?」 「Eh?」 「Today, you purposely took me out to the city….you half forced me, didn’t you?」 When I said that, Arisa made a sour expression while saying “ah ah”…. 「So, what are you up to?」 「Even if you tore my mouth, I won’t say anything.」 「Why?」 「Can’t say.」 She looks pretty determined. 「If you don’t….」 「Please, listen to what I have to say first.」 「Hnn?」 「You’re staying at an inn tonight, right?」 「Yes, I will.」 Then, Arisa looked up to me while blushing. 「Today, it will only be the two of us so, I’ll do my best to serve you well.」 「Do you think that will be enough to fool me?」 「Do you dislike it….?」 And so, I replied in all honesty. 「I don’t dislike it at all.」 Arisa began to giggle. 「So I guess it’s enough.」 「Maa, I won’t deny it.」 We stocked up daily necessities and clothes so we went back and arrived home early in the afternoon. As soon as we arrived home, Arisa headed to the river with the hand-riding rabbits that had just finished hunting. She said the river is a good place to dismantle because it involves a lot of blood. -0- When I entered the house, I found that it’s unoccupied. Normally, Ouroboros should be doing some house chores and Sonja should be on the sofa. However, today, no one’s here. Maria is usually assisting either me or Ouroboros but….perhaps she’s with Ouroboros now. In addition, I can’t see any of the elves and even Katya who should be building things around. 「How come no one’s here?」 Just when I was craning my neck, Katya walked into the house. 「Where’s everyone?」 「Eh? I won’t tell you.」 What’s with you people? I’m slightly irritated. 「Tell me. What are you guys up to? You’ve been acting a little weird since yesterday.」 「I wonder where everyone is. What does it have to do with you, oniichan? Also, do I have the duty to tell you?」 What’s with her tone….? I started to sleep on the sofa in the living room to suppress my irritation. -0- And then, it is already dusk….or is it already night? 「I’ve slept a little too long.」 As I sat up, a hand-riding rabbit came to me. 「Ano desu ne? Ano desu ne?」 「What’s wrong?」 「Follow me desu yo」 While hopping, the hand-riding rabbit led me outside. We arrived in front of the building that Katia and the elves were making. This one will be a brewery in the future. Sure, the interior is not yet complete and there should be nothing inside it yet. So, when I went inside—- There was a banging sound. 「「Happy? birthday!」」 Inside the building is full of food and it is decorated for a birthday party. The banging sound earlier should be the small explosion magic that the hand-riding rabbits called crackers. 「You guys….?」 「Today is Tatsuya’s birthday desu yo」 I’m in a different world so I forgot about it a long time ago. However, one day, I asked Maria about the calendar of this world and compared it to the calendar of my previous world, and from there….she should have calculated it. So this is what they were busy about since yesterday? I’m sure I’m not supposed to be that happy for my birthday given my age but….something warm is spreading through my chest. No, I’m starting to cry. 「Today is a day of celebration nano desu! I present you the carrot cake nano desu!」 「I’ve prepared Tatsuya-sama’s favorite teriyaki.」 Ouroboros bowed her head. 「I’m not an expert in cooking so please forgive me….」 Maria offered me a glass of wine. 「 I and the elves worked hard to complete the interior since yesterday.」 「Ah, thank you, everyone.」 「Fufufu. Now, it’s time to give you our present desu yo.」 「Hnn? Present?」 「Today, we’re going to party till we’re drunk.」 「Ah, I guess you would.」 「So we’re going to do a lot of things before we collapse desu yo」 「Ehto….what do you mean?」 Then, Maria smiled. 「The present is….all of us desu yo」 「We’re not going to let you sleep tonight.」 At the end, Ouroboros started to remove her maid clothes. 「In other words, we’ll start now….and it will end at sunrise. Everyone….you are free to eat and drink as you wish….that’s it.」 One after another, everyone started stripping until their underwear. 「What an amazing present but give me a break.」 I gave out a deep sigh as everyone looked at me. And before anyone managed to ask something, I made the first move—- 「But I don’t dislike it at all.」 And that’s how my birthday turned out to be a big deal. Sugar has been produced. We’ve been using prototype sugar as seasoning for a while now and we’ve finally succeeded in mass-producing it. Do you know what tensai is? It’s a sugar beet that is grown in Hokkaido. This area where I live is actually quite far north and it is said that honey is the most common sweetener here. Strictly speaking, sugar can also be bought in the city but it’s very expensive. It seems like this was the case in medieval Europe as well. I also heard that Alexander the Great’s expedition, whether it was a lie or not, was to get hold of sugar-producing areas. But that has nothing to do with us. -0- We harvested a large amount of sugar beets from the sugar beet field and borrowed a few craftsmen elves who were working with Katya and started the sugar production hut. Incidentally, the hand-riding rabbits have been addicted to carrot cake since my birthday. With flour from the city, eggs from the offering box, and carrots from the field, they have been working day and night to make the carrot cake taste better…. In fact, Sonja is always looking at the offering box catalog on the couch and lately, she’s even taken the liberty of ordering herself once. When I asked the farming god using the altar if it’s okay even if the one who ordered was not the skill owner himself, he replied “It’s okay since she’s part of your family”. Yeah…. I mean, what do you expect from a money-grubbing god? Sonja’s money sense is kind of strange. Since we are currently profiting, I let her be. Maa, and just like that, Sonja has been ordering cookbooks and researching carrot recipes in addition to cakes. Seasoning in the kitchen has been enriched without my knowledge and I may have to remind her. —out of money. The savings in the offering box is less than a thousand yen….. -0- 「Let’s go to the city to sell sugar.」 I said that out loud in front of a cart full of sugar. I have an item box so I don’t need a cart but that would mean that no one but me could carry it. Farming would be inefficient if I don’t do it myself because of my skills and that’s the lifeline of our family along with the hunting of the hand riding rabbits. Because of that, I want to leave the peddling work to the elves. 「We’re going to sell sugar desu yo?」 「Sell sugar and get a reward carrot?」 「Captain, how far is it to the city?」 「Meat meat carrot meat carrot?」 「Is it okay to buy food in the city?」 Only one of us was eating lunch for some reason but it is pointless to point that out. The members this time were…. Me. Maria. Arisa. Two elves. Five hand-riding rabbits. As for how the business will be run, Maria, Arisa, and I will talk to the merchant guild first. Once the peddling route is finalized, we plan on bringing the two elves and five hand-riding rabbits as guards. The elves that the elf queen sent us are actually elite in their village but seem to be at a lower level than Arisa in terms of ability because they are normal elites. I mean, the hand-riding rabbits are actually the only guards. So, after walking through the forest for two hours, the hand-riding rabbit that was leading us turned around and looked at us. 「Captain!」 「Oh? What’s up?」 The hand-riding rabbit smiled and pointed diagonally to the right. 「Kaiser Dragon nano desu」 The elves and Arisa suddenly became gloomy. 「Kaiser Dragon…..? Isn’t that a disaster class……」 Ah, you mean that. It’s a big dragon. I mean, that obviously looks like a disaster, right? Are you telling me that the giant cyclops that Sonja, Maria, and the adventurer king defeated before were like that too? 「Did someone buy the wrath of the spirit of the forest? How can such an impossible level of misfortune happen….」 Arisa and the elves turned pale….this time, they definitely won’t act as combatants. 「Captain, permission to escape」 「Escape nano desu」 「Hop hop hop hop?」 「Escape escape….we’re going to escape.」 Ah, they started running away even though I didn’t permit them. They are really free….. No, thinking about it, they didn’t run away without permission when I’m with Sonja. Is that the majesty of a queen? Anyway, it seems like they won’t function as guards this time. Though I won’t discuss this with Sonja later. And then, the Kaiser dragon made a menacing roar towards us. It was a heavy bass sound that echoed deep into the lungs. 「Kyaaa!」 「No! This can’t be happening!」 The two elves and Arisa completely lost their will to fight and slumped down on the spot. 「Tatsuya-sama, I’ll—」 I stopped Maria, the only combatant, from talking. 「No, it’s okay.」 Then I took a step toward the Kaiser dragon while holding my hoe. 「Well….life is full of surprises.」 And I sighed. 「But Tatsuya-sama! Kaiser dragon is the strongest being in this part of the forest desu yo!? Let me assist you!」 「The strongest? Is it at the level of Demon King Cornelia?」 I heard she’s the evil dragon of darkness. I don’t know how strong she is but given everyone’s reaction, including her….it seems like I can compete with her. Then, the Kaiser dragon is the strongest in this place, does it mean that….it’s stronger than Cornelia? Isn’t that bad? Maria shook her head and said “No”. 「Cornelia-sama is exceptional. She’s at least three levels higher than the Kaiser dragon. Their power difference is similar to a baby dragon and an adult dragon.」 Then, there shouldn’t be any problem. And then, whether it read the atmosphere or not, the Kaiser dragon, who had been watching us, took a deep breath. 「—incoming dragon breath! Tatsuya-sama!」 I kept holding my hoe. Should I go for a preemptive strike? Or evade the dragon breath? When I was thinking so, the voice of god echoed in my head. 【Skill: Farming Resistance Level 10 has been activated】 Farming resistance? What the hell is that? And then, the dragon breath is spewed out— —a huge barrier appeared in front of us. The flame of the dragon was completely defended by the barrier. I didn’t even feel any hot air. Oi oi, how is this farming resistance? Then, the voice of god echoed in my head again. 【It’s a skill that can withstand strong sunlight while working during summer】 There’s no way sunlight would be at that level! It completely became a heat barrier like the robot anime used! TN: AT Field I mean, I guess god sometimes answers some questions. At that moment, the hand-riding rabbits that had been running away came back to us and started to make noise. 「Amazing! We’re completely unharmed by yako-san’s attack!」 「We’re in a push and pull mood!」 「Tug of war! Tug of war! Oh oh oh! I’ll be there!」 「Tonight, we’re going to have a Kaiser dragon hot pot!」 「Let’s ora ora it already!」 These guys are…..the moment they realized I have the upper hand, they suddenly returned and even went on their attack mode. The Kaiser dragon seems to be upset seeing us unscathed. It is now full of gaps. Then, Maria shouted. 「—now’s your chance, Tatsuya-sama! Plow that dragon’s head desu!」 「You don’t have to tell me!」 I mean, she’s acting like a side character when she says “plow the dragon’s head”…. Then, I jumped to the Kaiser dragon. The other party won’t just sit there and let me hit it so it fought back with its foreclaws— 【Skill: Farm Work Level 10 has been activated】 I kick the air while floating in the air to correct my trajectory in the air. Ehto…. My body moved on its own but…did I just kick the air? Thus, I corrected my course by force by jumping in the middle of jumping. —how much bullsh*t is skill level 10? I don’t even know what it means anymore. That’s right, Cornelia and the adventurer king noticed it immediately the moment they saw me. Anyway, I kicked the air a few times and reached the dragon’s head. 「Die!」 With a spirited shout, I plow the hoe into the Kaiser dragon’s head. 「Gggaaaaaaaahhhhhhh—」 The dragon let out a violent, earth-shaking scream. Bang! The dragon fell. It is currently convulsing on the ground. Upon seeing that, the hand-riding rabbits charged. 「It’s down, charge!」 「Come on! Come on! Come on!」 「Let’s go! Let’s go! Oh oh oh! Let’s go!」 「Let’s get in its ear and tear its brain!」 「Let’s ora ora it!」 These guys are really…. I mean, their combat ability is high and they are also cunning. If their attack mode is switched on, they’ll turn into madmen. I don’t want them to be my enemies. While looking at the hand-riding rabbits happily charging into the ears and nostrils of the dragon, I thought I better expand the carrot field when I got home. After defeating the Kaiser Dragon, I stored its corpse in the item box, as usual. I mean, it’s about three times bigger than the arc dragon we killed last time. It can hold anything and everything and although there seems to be a capacity limit, I can put as much as I want to put so there’s no problem. Thinking about it, it’s a pretty good cheat skill. If I start a logistic company in Japan, with the help of the item box, I’ll be a millionaire in no time. -0- Anyway, we arrived in the city and headed for the adventurers guild. This time, we had to negotiate with the merchant guild to determine the wholesale price of sugar…. Maa, the first thing we need to do is to sell from the adventurers guild. I’m running out of money and I want to be able to get cash as soon as possible. I’m curious how much it will cost….. Read the latest update only at SHMTranslations.com 「It’s been a while.」 As soon as the receptionist saw me and Maria, her expression tightened. Oi oi, as we approach the counter, I feel like she’s looking at us as if she’s looking at monsters. 「What’s your business today? 」 「Ah, I want to sell something. 」 「Another death hawk….or an arc dragon? I shouldn’t be surprised if it’s another arc dragon, right? 」 She’s glancing at Maria a lot. Apparently, the receptionist seems to have recognized Maria as someone of equal standing with the adventurer king. 「No, it’s a Kaiser dragon. 」 The receptionist immediately showed a scared expression. Then, after losing her mind for a while, she suddenly hit her palm and said “Ah”. 「You meanie. That’s more difficult to subdue than the previous evil cyclops….that’s a top disaster class monster. 」 「Eh? Is that so? 」 「The adventurer king has had an expedition in the capital since last week and it seems like the hand-riding rabbit queen is not with you either. I know you guys were amazing last time but….please don’t make fun of other people. I know it’s not impossible if the three of you will fight it side by side but….so, what is your business here today? 」 「Like I said, we will sell something. 」 「So, what are you going to sell? 」 「Like I said, Kaiser dragon. 」 「Can you stop joking already…. 」 「Perhaps it is faster to let you see the actual thing. 」 And so, I took out the item box. Maa, it’s better to say summoning it rather than taking it out. Anyway, from the item box, I pulled a huge dragon….that dragon head alone is already 2 meters high. 「No way…. 」 And thus, the unbelieving receptionist slumped on the spot. —then. We dropped by Maria’s foster father, Marx-san. In fact, although Marx-san is the famous adventurer king, he’s doing a lot of things other than adventuring. After retiring, he actually started a company with the money he saved. It was decided that the details on the sale of sugar would be decided by Arisa and the executives of the Marx Company. The basic flow is that we’ll refine sugar from sugar beet and transport it to the Marx Company. Then, the Marx Company will take care of the sales and the profit will be a 50/50 split. But, well….it was decided like that first but when Arisa asked Maria to ask Marx, the share became 7 to 3. Marx-san is spoiling Maria too much. From Marx’s point of view, it would be fine to sell products at low prices in order to sell them immediately. Maa, it looks like this trade will produce around 500 gold coins of profit per month. I can make the seed grow fast which means we could harvest every month. If we expand the farm, we can even get a thousand gold coins per month. In that case, I might need to hire workers from the elf village. Read the latest update only at SHMTranslations.com And so, we carried the Kaiser dragon to the dismantling shop. Since it was a gigantic monster, we agreed to share some of the dragon’s meat for free in exchange for the guild’s help in transporting it. 「Hey kid! Long time no see.」 It was the dismantler that took care of the arc dragon last time. He’s in his mid-fifties, muscular and strong. He’s wearing a bandana, a tank top, and work pants. He looks like a typical construction worker you’ll find in a construction site in Japan. 「Ah, long time no see.」 「Another death hawk….or an arc dragon? I shouldn’t be surprised if it’s another arc dragon—」 Then, when I took out the Kaiser dragon from the item box, the dismantler fainted on the spot with his eyes wide open. 「This is the first time in my life that I’ll be dismantling a Kaiser dragon.」 He’s really crying. He’s tearing up. I’m not joking. Seeing him like that, I wondered if a top disaster class monster is really that dangerous. 「You want to eat the guts, right? Maa, there shouldn’t be any problem if you cook it today.」 My item box can completely save me from that since it can stop time. There’s no need to worry. If I say that, he’s going to faint again so I’ll just keep quiet. 「Why? Can’t we eat the dragon liver raw?」 「I heard in the place further north here….liver can be eaten raw during winter. However, that’s because they are living in a cold region. Internal organs must be quickly consumed after all.」 Since I have my storage box, it doesn’t even need to be in a cold region. Sesame oil and a small amount of leeks will be good condiments. And of course, salt too. But all of them are in the cabin. Since it has come to this—- —liver sashimi! Dragon meat is like the finest wagyu beef so its liver should be like that too. I mean, I can no longer eat cow liver sashimi since I’m no longer in Japan… I used to love it like crazy but I guess it can’t be helped. Ah, I’m drooling just thinking about it. I’m sure it would be delicious if I wash down liver sashimi to my stomach using beer…. 「Let’s have a barbeque once we get home.」 「Barbeque?」 「Yeah, a barbeque party.」 I mean, dragon meat alone is f*cking delicious and this time, it would be better since it’s a Kaiser dragon. It’s okay to be a little extravagant. I was paid with orichalcum coins equivalent to 55000 gold coins. It’s only a small amount when converted to Japanese yen….at least we managed to score a regular income now. No, it’s only a small amount but I’m planning on making it big and turn the sugar hut into a sugar factory in the future. It wouldn’t be wrong to at least celebrate. So, when I get home, I’ll immediately order a case of 500ml beer cans and some good wine. Ah, and of course, I’ll order some yakiniku and ponzu sauce. It’s almost the same as the best wagyu beef so it will inevitably make your mouth greasy. I’ll make radish oroshi from the radishes I’m growing in the field and grate down some garlic and eat it with ponzu sauce. Whenever I feed garlic to Maria, she goes into a frenzy so I basically refrain from eating it but I guess it’s okay for today. I’m looking forward to going home. —No, it’s because I’m doing all this that I ran out of money. However, I can’t help it. I can’t beat my appetite. 「Liver? Liver? Raw liver?」 「So delicious desu! Dangerously delicious desu!」 「Hou, this is legendary….」 「Captain! Grill more carrots nano desu!」 「Liver liver carrot liver carrot?」 We’re having a barbecue and the hand-riding rabbits seem to like raw liver better than grilled meat. Sonja seemed to like raw liver too and used thin-cut carrots as condiments. Of course, she’s also drinking a lot of beer. 「I can’t believe it but it’s really amazing….oniichan. I never knew raw liver could taste so good…」 Katya, who looks like a young dwarf girl, is a non-drinker. She’s eating raw liver with oolong tea. She put chopped leeks as condiments. 「Oh no. If I eat this kind of food….will I able be able to stop myself?」 The fox beastkin Arisa is having red wine…her condiments are just sesame oil and salt. Come to think of it, won’t a beastkin instantly turn into mating season mode once she eats dragon liver? It looks like Sonja will give me a hard time later. 「I’m not a fan of raw food…..」 That was the succubus Maria who’s eating dragon spare ribs with ponzu sauce and garlic while saying “I’ll eat dragon spare ribs instead.”. A succubus would be dangerous once she eats garlic. This will be a hard night after all. 「Garlic is delicious!」 The elves seem to love garlic roasted in aluminum foil. I recommended meat but they are vegans. 「Everything is delicious, master.」 The maid Ouroboros is a picky eater. She doesn’t have any likes or dislikes. She drinks all kinds of alcohol and eats all kinds of food. 「Why didn’t you cook curry?」 「Is that all you can say?」 Cornelia said that with teary eyes. 「It’s not that I don’t like barbeque but….I especially came here for your curry….」 She looked really sad so I won’t tease her anymore. 「Curry at a barbeque party is….normal, right?」 I knew Cornelia would be here so I already cooked it earlier. By the way, I cooked dark curry. I dump the leftover meat, guts, and vegetables to make this curry. 「Oh! As expected of you!」 When Cornelia smiled, I felt a nasty gaze on my back. And when I looked…. Sonja and Arisa….looked like maniacs. 「It’s time to eat you!」 「I can’t take it anymore!」 The two carried me up with bloodshot eyes and ran to a hut. Eh? Eh? What the hell is going on here? Just when I was thinking why, I suddenly remembered. They’ll go on full mating season mode once they eat a liver of a ….dragon! And raw too. They were gobbling it up raw! 「Tatsuya! We’ll get this going until morning?」 「Tatsuya-niisan, mou, mou…..I can’t take it anymore!」 No no no no. When they’re on their mating season mode, they’re usually blushing and oozing with sex appeal but this time, they have bloodshot eyes and look completely carnivorous. And, well, like that— 「AAAAHHHHHHHHH———!」 My scream echoed under the moonlight that night. 「We’re off nano desu」 A hand-riding rabbit expedition team led by Sonja was formed. They are all wearing something an expedition team would wear. Beige short pants, short-sleeved jackets and shirts, and hats….they would look good in a jungle. They were prepared by Ouroboros but it’s a mystery why they know the stereotypical variety culture of Japan like the Fuji Hiroshi Expedition. And well, according to Cornelia….the number of high-level monsters in this area is decreasing. Cornelia’s source of income is hunting demon beasts and selling them to the demon world and as expected, she sent a letter….she asked us to give it a rest soon. We can hunt but we have to do it in moderation…..but our hunters, the hand-riding rabbits, will not listen to us. They are known as “gluttonous slaughterers” because they never leave any stones unturned wherever they pass by. To begin with, it’s impossible for them to settle down at one place since they are originally a nomad tribe of slash and burn culture. —and so, here they are, an expedition team. As you know, the forest of no return itself is a dungeon but there is actually a dungeon in the forest as well. It’s a legendary dungeon where many high-ranking adventurers had been sucked in and died and inside it, according to the story, there are plenty of gold and silver treasures along with the relics of the adventurers. 「We’re leaving nano desu?」 The expedition team consisted of Sonja, Maria, and 20 hand-riding rabbits. It seems to be a really dangerous dungeon. Maria herself says she doesn’t want to go but if we leave it to the hand riding rabbits….maa, I can already see that it’s going to be a disaster. Their sense of money is equal to nothing. If no one will come with them, they’ll bring home carrots and not gold nor silver nor any other treasure. That’s why I asked Maria to go with them. 「Ah, be careful—」 Then, the expedition team set off to the dungeon. 「It’s too hard…..」 While working on the farm, the elf who was in charge of wholesaling the sugar, came to me to complain. 「What do you mean it’s too hard?」 「Even if we have guards, it is impossible to push a cart that long.」 Yeah, it’s like ten hours on foot. Pushing a cart full of sugar all day long is indeed hard. 「Hmm….how about we buy an ox and have it pull the cart?」 「That’s a good idea but it will still take too long even with an ox. After all, if we leave here in the morning, we’ll arrive at the city by nightfall….」 「Hmm, what should we do then?」 「Let’s maintain the status quo for now but we have to improve it in the future….」 「Alright. I’ll call a meeting and discuss it altogether.」 That moment—–I heard Sonja’s cheerful voice. 「The legendary hero’s sword….I got it!」 -0- —Scene Change— -0- And, maa, that’s how the dungeon expedition team came back. Maria was under a confusion spell and didn’t know what’s going on while all the hand-riding rabbits had bandages on them. It seemed like they fought fierce battles. By the way, those bandages were the ones I purchased from the catalog store and gave to them as amulets. And Sonja was the only one who looked unharmed but the spoils of their expedition were terrible. –? ? ? ? ? Legendary hero’s sword –? ? ? ? ? A sack full of gold –? ? ? ? ? I don’t know. Rings, crowns, etc. For the time being, I had Ouroboros take care of the confusion magic casted on Maria in order to be able to hear what happened…. 「I don’t even want to remember. I don’t want to go on that dungeon ever again.」 After that, she said no more. The hand-riding rabbits also trembled and didn’t talk about anything. Only Sonja said something while smiling but only at the level 「It was fun desu? ufufufu?」. By the way, I confirmed it to Maria but it seems like it was indeed the legendary hero’s sword that was left deep underground. Also, those things they brought back were those not bulky things among what they found on their way. Anyway, it’s great that no one was seriously injured. Looking at them unable to walk steadily and even using walking sticks just to walk,? I also reflected for sending them out of the expedition like it was nothing. And anyway—we have cash. -0- And that’s it. We are now in front of it….the offering box. When I put the gold coins into the money box, the digital notation in the catalog increased from 10000 yen to 20000 yen. There shouldn’t be more than 10000 of them but I guess that means they are rare gold coins. By the way, the offering box is not one of those that you can see what’s inside like in Japan. Its inside looks like a black hole, it’s completely black. 「However, it’s hard to cash the crown and the others.」 Even if I ask Arisa to sell them, it will be quite obvious. I can ask Cornelia’s help and sell them to the demon world but the duty tax would be off the roof. What should I do now? 「Why don’t we just push them all in?」 Sonja threw the crown, ring, and all other treasures that were in the sack into the offering box. 「Oi!」 The treasures disappeared into the black hole unimpeded. I wondered if that was possible but when I checked the catalog again, the digital notation showed an increase of exactly 100000 yen. —apparently, it was possible. I mean, the gold and treasures of this world being sucked just like that….if I use currency, it will certainly have a considerable impact on the economy, right? Offering treasure would be okay with everyone but if we keep offering gold to the zenigeba god, the world will really be in trouble. Maa, this should be good….. 「Of course, I know it would be bad to cash the sword of the legendary hero.」 I’m not sure if it’s worth the money but after taking it home after so much trouble, I don’t think we should. And there— 「Let’s throw this one too.」 Sonja threw the sword of the legendary hero into the offering box. 「Oi! Sonja!」 That’s bad, right!? However, I wasn’t able to save it. The hero’s sword disappeared into the black hole as well. This is…. The digital representation on the catalog became 1.1 million yen. That’s equivalent to 1.1 million gold coins…. It’s a light truck alright. Boasting one of the most expensive things in the catalog…..1 million yen. My savings were almost gone in an instant but I’m sure I’m getting the most out of my money. It’s a light truck and for some reason, it is solar-powered. I don’t think there’s a company that makes such an incomprehensible product— 『It has an isekai specification. If you have any questions, please feel free to contact us and we will be happy to answer any questions you may have. However, since it is solar-powered, don’t expect much horsepower from it. 』 That was the answer of the zenigeba god. Of course, it can move using gasoline as fuel too but it also costs money to order fuel. In that case, it will be too costly to use it to transport goods to the city. Moreover, this is a rare offer from the zenigeba god, it seems like he’ll take care of it if it breaks down for free. 『You’re a regular sucker….cough! I mean, customer, so I’ll give you that much. 』 And that’s how it is. By the way, this solar power light truck can also store a lot of electricity. However, it would be bad if it runs out of electricity along the way so I thought it should carry at least one emergency polyethylene tank in the back. 『You can do that but that’s dangerous. I can’t afford to waste divine power if it was destroyed because of that. I’ll do something to make it safe. 』 This zenigeba god has a point. Maa, there’s no doubt that gasoline is a highly flammable and dangerous substance so let’s be grateful for it. Read the latest update only at SHMTranslations.com —and now, we’ve gathered in front of the light truck packed with sugar bags. 「You’re such a joker, Tatsuya-sama. There’s no way a big lump of iron can move using the power of the sun…」 Maria seemed to think I was joking and giggled. The hand-riding rabbits were running around the back and inside the truck with great interest. There were even four of them hanging on the steering wheel. By the way, there was a mascot doll in the car….it’s a hand-riding rabbit hanging on a string. When I saw her, I couldn’t help but blow her out. 「No, Maria….master has always surprised us. Since master said so, I think he can make the impossible possible….」 「However, Ouroboros, even if Tatsuya-sama is awesome, that’s simply not possible, right? Perhaps if it is something powered by a magic stone or something from the ancient magic civilization.」 Ouroboros made a sound by slamming her fist to her hand a little. 「Exactly, there are tons of magical equipment like this….they are certainly powered by magic stones but….」 However, Maria shook her head to the left and right. 「Magic stone is a luxury material that can rarely be taken from monsters like dragons. It’s too expensive to make it an energy source….of something that will transport sugar.」 I see. So, there were similar transportation devices from the ancient magical civilizations. And they even have the same fuel problem like diesel and gasoline. I can’t help but laugh. 「This doesn’t use magic stones.」 「I certainly don’t feel any magic reaction that is peculiar to a magic stone but….」 I got into the driver’s seat with the keys of the light truck in my hand. I put the key in the ignition and twisted it around. 「What’s that noise!?」 Everyone around began to buzz upon hearing the sound of the engine starting up. Then, I slowly stepped on the gas pedal. 「It’s moving!? That lump of iron!? And without a magic stone!?」 「Tatsuya is amazing nano desu! The iron carriage is amazing nano desu!」 「You’re really amazing, oniichan. Even a dwarf won’t be able to make something like this.」 Everyone is looking at the light truck curiously with sparkling eyes. Yeah, this is great. At best, it would be a little revolution in logistics if a light truck appeared in a place where carriage is the only means of transport. That said, this light truck is solar powered so it doesn’t give much horsepower but it is still better than pulling a carriage manually or by horse. And more than anything, it has speed. 「Maa, I’m not amazing, what amazing is this thing made in Japan.」 I laughed wryly while I muttered so…. 「Also, thank you zenigeba god for making it solar-powered.」 This was the only time I honestly thanked the zenigeba god. TN: No, I didn’t skip any chapter. Don’t you know that 58 is the next number after 55? At least according to the author. Don’t look for chapter 77 later too. 「Amazing desu yo! This thing is amazing desu yo!」 The day after the introduction of the light truck. At first, the light truck became everyone’s toy. I thought it would be hard to teach them but everyone had good motor skills and learned it quickly. 「Oniichan! What’s really going on here?」 By the way, the fastest one to learn was the dwarf Katya but it’s probably related to her being a manufacturing-type craftsman. She has great interest in power and seemed to have extraordinary enthusiasm for driving. 「Master, I’ll take it from here…」 Ouroboros is a slow driver and is extremely cautious. Too different from how she looks and her personality. 「Hahaha! Fun desu!」 Only Sonja is having trouble and almost can’t drive. However, she looks like she’s having fun with the rattling feeling of stalling. The hand-riding rabbits are treating it as an attraction. 「—I’m speed! I won’t let anyone run faster than me! HAHAHA! I’ll be the first one to reach 70 kilometers per hour!」 70 kilometers per hour on an unmaintained road…. Thinking about it normally, that should be dangerous, right? In other words, I never expected Maria to be the problem child. It’s like her personality suddenly changed as soon as she took the wheel and a really dangerous one. 「By the way, is the curry ready yet? 」 Cornelia didn’t show any interest in the light truck and kept asking me to make curry. When I asked her about it, she told me that she had been to Japan before and was not surprised by a light truck. When I asked her more about it, she said she’s been on an airplane before. She had seen tanks and fighter planes when she was working at a restaurant owned by a reincarnated person and she even knew a little about the theory of relativity, the basis of nuclear weapons. I mean, she was talking about the formula E=MC square. The magic formula of the age of gods that lead to the destruction of the world. I wanted to say “what happened to that guy” but…. Let’s put that aside. 「Well then, I’ll make curry for everyone for lunch. 」 「Okay! 」 Hearing what I said, Cornelia smiled. Then…. 「Tatsuya-sama! I am—speed! Let me go to the other side real fast! 」 With yankee like lines from a manga, Maria hurled along the road with the light truck. -0- —POV Change— -0- My name is Masashi Miyamoto. I’m a hero who came to another world from Japan. Due to various reasons, I’m currently walking in a forest. Wand what I mean by reasons…..is kind of a long story. Maa, we were teleported in a group, and my friends and I were given combat training in this world. For the first month or so, we were seriously trained in combat and since I was talented, I got stronger. But the people in this world are too serious. Their training menu was so hard that it could kill me so I left. Then, I signed up with the criminal guild and committed all kinds of evil deeds. —it was a lot of fun. No, evil things are really fun. It felt great to step on someone’s head when I’m collecting debt. As good as it is….I encountered a problem, that old man called Tatsuya. I don’t know why but he was surrounded by very strong beauties….because of him, I was caught by the righteous guild and almost got my neck cut off. Maa, of course, the great me always has a backup plan. Currently, I’m walking through the forest to join my comrades who also escaped from battle training. By the way, I’m using crutches because my foot is fractured. It’s all because of that old man….once my wound heals, I will not just half kill him, I’ll wholly kill him. That moment—I heard an engine sound from a distance for some reason. 「Why is there a light truck in this place? 」 What I saw was a light truck running at full speed towards me. It should be running around 100 kilometers per hour, isn’t it? I mean, why is there a light truck in isekai? —I don’t get it! I was so stunned that I froze on the spot….before I knew it, the truck was already close to me. I came to my senses and tried to run to the side of the road as fast as I could but…. —but I couldn’t! It’s too close for me, who’s on crutches, to evade! 「Truck-kun! Stop! Stoooooppppppp! 」 A little later than my scream, a loud voice came from the truck’s driver seat with an open window. 「Ahhhh! I mistook the gas pedal for the brake pedal! I’m not used to driving yet! Please run away! 」 At that moment, my lower body was hit by the bumper of the truck. 「Pubera! 」 Then, I flew for about 10 meters while dancing in the air. If I was in Japan, I would certainly die but this time, I’ll only be fractured. In other words, I thought—- —-it has been a while but it was good that I did combat training seriously…. TN: Author-sama ruined it when he didn’t get isekaid after being hit by truck-kun. Maa, the accounting is a mess. I’m basically doing nothing but farming, leaving that part to Ouroboros and Maria. In my mind, I was relieved to know that everyone except Sonja was reasonably well educated… So, I decided to test Ouroboros’ math skills. 「Ouroboros? What I’m trying to say is, put the X here….」 「Wa wa waaa….can we please not talk about that…..at least until evening, master?」 「Even Ouroboros….is only at that level….」 Etho, I mean. Ouroboros proved that she’s capable of only 3 digit addition and subtraction and 2 digit multiplication. Of course, not mental arithmetic. She needs to write them first. Maria’s at the same level while Sonja can’t calculate more than the number of fingers on both hands. I mean, Maria was taught by the best S rank adventurers of their era while Ouroboros seems to be educated in an elite class in the demon world. That’s right. It seems like the top-level education of this world is only at that level. By the way, Arisa can also calculate but it is impossible for her to do multiplication of more than 2 digits. —Thus, the inventory of vegetables and the number of gold coins don’t match at all. —I had her keep a record of all transactions and it all went down from there. 「Now, we’re in trouble.」 This is a real problem. There’s no way anyone can do accounting if they can’t even do math properly. Arisa said, there’s no way for anyone to learn that except for specialized merchants and they are very rare in this place….still, according to my senses, it is absurd. 「Ufufufu, I don’t care about money?」 I know. Speaking of which, I’m in trouble if Sonja suddenly becomes intellectual. However, serious people like Ouroboros and Maria are only at that level which is troublesome. At that time, when I was thinking about it…. 「Intruder desu?」 The hand-riding rabbit that had been left to guard the field against vermin came running into the house. Read the latest update only at SHMTranslations.com Now, the intruder. She’s petite, dark-haired, and looks 16 or 17 years old. She’s wearing a sorcerer’s cloak and carrying a sorcerer’s staff. Under her cloak, you can see a mini skirt blazer school uniform…. In short, she’s one of the high school students that got transmigrated in this world with me. While the others are blonde who looked like they came out of a yankee manga, this girl with black hair left an impression on me. Her eyes are beautiful too. I’m pretty sure this girl is called Mayu. I think she’s a girl who should be at a pretty low tier in a class hierarchy. And that’s the reason why she’s sympathetic with me which is also why she has left an impression on me. So, this girl fainted near the field full of blood and mud. I ordered Maria to cast healing magic and bathe her with a wet towel. She didn’t wake up for a few hours, perhaps due to exhaustion. In any case, her life is not in danger so we let her sleep on one side of the living room while we ate dinner….. Grrrrrr—–! The girl called Mayu woke up and was obviously very hungry. 「Ah….uncle….」 She seemed to be sleepwalking, gazing the surrounding blankly, and then— 「Hih! Hand riding rabbit!」 After saying that….she fainted again. I mean, after all, from a normal person’s point of view, a hand-riding rabbit….is simply outrageous. -Mayu Ayukawa’s POV- 「Strange」 That was the first thing I thought. Beastkins with danger rating of “S”: Hand riding rabbits And their queen who is designated as disaster class. Nobles of the demon world, a succubus from the royal family, and even Ouroboros, whose name alone makes everyone tremble. —when I saw Ouroboros wearing a maid’s clothes, I looked twice…no, thrice. I wouldn’t be surprised if some kingdom empty their country and send its entire army of knights here to bring down one of these huts. However, they…won’t be able to win. It’s not on the level of being out in the common sense area, it’s already….beyond that. Uncle has nothing but farming skills and is useless in combat. For them, who have sky-high fighting abilities, uncle should be just a small fry. However, that doesn’t change the fact that they adore uncle. What’s more, there are even ten elves and a dwarf girl. It’s not a secret that hand-riding rabbits and elves don’t get along and it’s unlikely for the famously eccentric dwarf race would choose to coexist with another race. How in the world did this happen?….my doubts were immediately cleared. The only reason I can think of is that Uncle Tatsuya has an all-around skill of being able to order various things from Japan. Ah, and his…farming skill too. The vegetables he cultivated with his skills and the food he cooks with the seasoning he orders are really delicious. To put it bluntly, the food in this world….doesn’t taste good at all. The ingredients alone are better than what you can find in Japan as long as you can afford them but the seasoning and cooking methods ruin everything. I mean, I’m eating pork teriyaki right now and…I’m almost in tears. I’ve experienced a lot of hardship….since I came into this world. It’s very nostalgic and….delicious. And the most important reason why the girls adore uncle is— —because of his personality. 「I’m sorry. I….left Uncle Tatsuya behind.」 「It’s okay, it’s okay. You don’t have to worry about it.」 「…eh?」 That’s right. He’s…that kind of person, isn’t he? He doesn’t care about the details and treats people nicely. This is something impossible in this cutthroat world. 「You stopped them, didn’t you? You probably stopped them but…. they threatened you.」 「….yeah. Maa…that’s exactly what happened.」 「It can’t be helped then. You wouldn’t be able to resist them after all.」 When I heard him say that, I was stupefied. 「What’s wrong?….why are you smiling bitterly?」 「No, it’s nothing.」 Yeah. This person….has a big heart. No, perhaps he has bottomless mercy. We did something terrible to him that even if he beats me out, I wouldn’t have any right to complain. However, he just smiled and forgave me. He looks a little unreliable but he’s good at smiling. While he was smiling, I felt guilt deep inside me. I can’t help but think….he should at least shout at me for it. From now on, no matter what happens, I’ll make amends for that time. And that aside— —maa, a lot has happened since I came to this world. Unlike in Japan, morality and ethics here are a mess. It’s a bleak world where people will be killed like it’s normal and even robbery is a normal choice for living. We were trained in combat to live but the only word I can describe what I’ve gone through is “hell”…it’s that much. I was thrown out of the training facility for being useless and after a lot of trouble, I was able to live in a relatively nice environment…but it was still bleak. —after seeing Uncle Tatsuya, I was able to remember Japan for the first time in a long time. In this world, uncle still acts like a normal Japanese uncle…. My heart was so broken that I cried a little bit. Anyway, I think it’s because uncle is like that….that he managed to attract these women. Because— Everyone’s being noisy together. Everyone’s having fun. Everyone’s laughing together. I have never seen a scene as natural as this in this world….perhaps there’s no other place like this in this world. That’s why I’m so….relieved that uncle picked me up. 「By the way, Mayu, why did you faint there covered in blood?」 「That’s….」 This is Mayu’s story summary. Mayu had the aptitude to be a sage. This aptitude is quite rare in this world, and she’s even expected to be an ace among the summoned heroes… However, she has a gentle character which has become her fatal disadvantage. She can’t even stab a monster during combat training. In addition, the training facility was a place where they were being trained is a very bad place where they were physically abused. –? ? ? ? ? Iron fist punishment –? ? ? ? ? Joint responsibility –? ? ? ? ? Mutual surveillance I heard that the situation of those who were transported in this world has worsened because of those. On top of that, Miyamoto’s group has escaped, making the already clampdown facility even tighter. The problem that arose after that was “joint responsibility”. Immediately after Minamoto’s group’s escape, Mayu was put in the crosshairs and the severity of joint responsibility and mutual surveillance rose off the roof. Every time Mayu could not kill a monster, an iron fist punishment will befall everyone in the name of joint responsibility….that worsen the situation. Mayu, who had accumulated grudge from her friends, was pushed down to the bottom of the abyss pretending it was an accident during a practice monster subjugation mission. She was injured severely to the point that she wandered between life and death but she was saved at the bottom of the valley by an eccentric sage who lives…in a village nearby. She was having a peaceful life while being trained by the sage there but an incident occurred. The sage who took her in died of an illness. The area around the village was unsafe but thanks to the sage, Mayu’s mentor, who’s looking over that place, that area was reasonably peaceful. And of course, since the sage died of illness, bandits and armed robbers began to attack the village. The village was abandoned by the lord because it was in a remote area and the village itself was in a state of ruin. The villagers spent their meager savings to hire adventurers to go out and defeat the bandits. And Mayu, being a disciple of the sage, joined the bandit subjugation— —as a result, she ended up lying in a pool of blood near my residence. 「Umu. Curry is delicious as expected!」 And so, Mayu’s story ended with the smiling Cornelia refilling her curry. 「What happened, Mayu?」 「The subjugation group has been annihilated and I think the village will face hard retaliation.」 「Maa, I guess they would.」 「My wound has healed….I have to go back. Even if I won’t win….there should be something I can do for everyone.」 When I tried to say something, Ouroboros shook her head to the left and right. 「Master, this is presumptuous of me….」 「What’s the matter?」 「I think it’s best if you don’t.」 「What do you mean?」 「—master, it is none of your business.」 「You’re saying….」 「That’s a normal story in this world and you can hear it everywhere. If you will make a move with something only at this level, things will get out of control.」 「That may be the case but….」 Suddenly, Cornelia barged in. 「Hey, you.」 「Hnn? What is it?」 「Today’s curry is a bit different from the usual.」 「Why? Is she the one who cooked it?」 Then, Mayu nodded. 「The secret ingredient is instant coffee. Also, maybe….it has more garlic than usual.」 Cornelia was speechless and opened her eyes wide. 「This lady….no, you….can make curry?」 TN: she now calls Mayu with the polite version of “you”. The same way she calls Tatsuya. 「Yeah. My mother died early so it has become my job to cook.」 「The idea of putting instant coffee to curry….there’s no way someone from this world will have that idea. At least that’s what I think. Curry is really something that can only be made by the inhabitants of that world.」 Cornelia was somewhat convinced by herself. She tapped Mayu’s shoulder. 「If Tatsuya’s not here, I would have appointed you as the minister of curry.」 What is a minister of curry…. Given the flow of the story….it looks like Ouroboros also thought about it too. We sighed together. 「So….what were you saying? About some bandits?」 「…..yeah?」 Then, Cornelia stood up and began to clench her fist. 「It has been decided! Let’s go to war!」 —at that moment, the overkilling of the bandits was confirmed. 「Sounds fun nano desu?」 「Captain! How many carrots are we going to bring?」 「Picnic desu?」 —at that moment, the annihilation of the bandits was confirmed. 「Master….let’s bring back the treasures of the bandits. That will be a good additional budget for our family. They’ll be annihilated anyway.」 —at that moment, the bankruptcy of the bandits was confirmed. 「I have an idea! How about we also ask the villagers to give us rewards?」 —at that moment, the villager’s grateful smile turning into a wry smile was confirmed. 「Ah, I’ll be guarding the house. I still have some laundry.」 「I can’t fight.」 Then, leaving Maria and Katya behind….the slaughter picnic led by the demon king and her companions began. -Bandit’s POV- A cave deep in the mountains. Everyone’s having a terrible hangover. We had beaten a group of adventurers hired by Ibiden Village a few days ago. Afterwards, we had extracted some information from the adventurers we had taken as prisoners. Here’s what we learned— 1. ? ? ? The village has been abandoned by its lord. 2. ? ? ? The village’s fund was exhausted when they hired adventurers. —in other words, it was confirmed that the attack of the adventurers was the village’s last stand. The plan for the future is to raid the village in a flashy manner in the near future and take away all valuable items except for farming tools without killing anyone. No, it’s not that we’re not really going to kill anyone. We will kill a few grown men to make an example of them and let a few dozen suffer. As for why we all have hangovers – well, we just had a victory party. I mean, how can we celebrate without drinking? Since we had confirmed our safety, we drank until we could no longer stand. 「Hey, aniki? We’re in luck, aren’t we?」 A toothless middle aged guy….a subordinate called out to me. 「Yeah. They’ve been abandoned by their lord and can no longer hire adventurers. That mean….we can do whatever we want to them.」 「But, why go easy on them? We can just kill all men and sell the women and children to the slavers….」 「This is why you’re stupid!」 I hit my subordinate on his head. 「Eh? What do you mean?」 「The lord has abandoned them, right? That decision cut off that village from others….and it’s already been a long time since that happened, right? You know what that means?….it means we can control the village for now on and for a long time.」 「….?」 「We’ll just have to leave them enough food to keep them alive and then, we’ll take the rest of their money from the sale of their crops!」 「However, what if the lord changes his mind during that time….? What if he sends his knights?」 「It’s good that you’re learning how to think. If that was to happen, it means it is the time to do what you suggested….we’ll kill all the men and sell the women and children to slavers.」 Then, my subordinate clapped his hands. 「You’re going to squeeze as much as you can from them and when things gets tough, you’re going to reap what you sow and be done with it?」 「Yeah, that’s the plan.」 Then, my subordinate started laughing with his hands on his stomach. 「Wahaha! As expected of aniki desu wa! You’re a genius desu wa!」 「Yeah, we will be safe for a while! Let’s get out of this hole and set up a hideout in the village.」 「Oh! That’s bold! But a good idea! The biggest disadvantage of banditry is that you have to sneak around but….this time, we’ll be the lord!」 「However, those adventurers were too weak.」 「A-rank adventurers are no match to aniki.」 「No, that little girl….the black haired disciple of the sage was strong. If the adventurers did not pull her down because they were too small fries….thing would have been pretty bad.」 「That’s true. She’s almost evenly matched with aniki.」 At that time – my subordinate, who was supposed to be our lookout, turned pale and jumped in. 「A-a-a-aniki!」 「What’s wrong?」 「do-do-do…..dora…………..! Dragon!」 「Huh? This is not the forest of no return. Are you sure it’s not a salamander or something?」 「No, I’m sure it’s a dragon!」 Well, if it’s a small dragon….I can take care of it. In the rare event that it loses at the competition for survival in the forest of no return, the weaker ones may flee outside…. 「What a pain in the ass.」 However, even for me, it will be difficult to subdue a dragon. I went outside praying that my subordinate was wrong— 「W-wh-wha…..what the hell is this!!!」 100 gigantic dragons—no, an army of zombie dragons was encircling our hideout. -Ayukawa Mayu’s POV- Here we are, in the mountains, in the square outside the bandit’s cave. And it was literally trampled. 「Gaaa!」 「H-h-h-help!」 The hand-riding rabbits jumped on the bandits and pricked and stabbed with their needle-like weapons. Then, Ouroboros-san caught one of the bandits by his collar with her right hand and lifted him up. 「Let me go.」 「Let you go? Eh? What do you mean?」 Then, a loud sound of a slap resounded. 「Agi!?」 「Let you go」 「What do you!?」 Slap, slap, slap. Ouroboros-san continues to slap the bandit again and again. 「Give me your money!」 —slap 「Gold!」 —slap 「Orichalcum coin!」 —slap 「Treasure!」 —slap 「And I’ll let you go!」 The bandit’s cheeks swelled up. He looks worse than someone who has mumps. 「P….p….prease….gya!」 —slap 「I don’t want to hear a f*cking bug begging for his life.」 Then, she slaps him back and forth once again. —slap 「Abiba!」 —slap 「Pugi!」 「Now, are you a little honest?」 When Ouroboros-san smiled deeply, I heard the loud laughter of the Demon King Cornelia. 「Hahaha! Bandits! I’ll show you something that is rarely seen!」 Then, Demon King Cornelia raised her right hand above her head— 「Black Dragon Genecide!」 Ridiculous amount of magical power gathered at the demon king’s palm. At that moment, I fell on the ground. A third eye, that looks like an eye of a reptile — opened on the forehead of the demon king. 「Kuhaha! Bandits! This is the improved version of an earth dragon’s golden roar—the secret skill of earth dragons! This can annihilate everything!」 Then, the demon king pointed in the direction of a distant mountain with her right hand. —boom. Ah, the mountain was blown away. No, to be precise, it looks like the surface of the mountain was blown away and the mountain turned into a bald mountain with only red soil and rock. 「Fuhaha! Bandits! Be scared more than you should be!」 Are you telling me, just to make them more scared than necessary….you did that? She summoned tons of zombie dragons but she didn’t use them at all…ah, I see. Perhaps she summoned the zombie dragon just to scare them more than necessary. 「Thi….this is absurd. What the hell are these people….」 And so, I sent my gaze to uncle. Then, I found a bandit creeping behind uncle— 「You are in danger, uncle! Elder fire!」 「Gugya!」 When I saw the bandit become a fireman, I was relieved….great. It seems like my body has completely recovered. The sharpness of my magic did not change. For now, it looks like no one has any intention of protecting uncle so I have to protect him… And there, the bandit boss, with A-rank prize on his head, a former sword saint, the one who had beaten me a few days ago, appeared from the cave. 「Oi oi, what’s this…」 The moment he saw 100 zombie dragons, I can see that he completely lost his will to fight. Maa, I know how he feels. This looks like a scene from hell. If I was an enemy, I would have prepared to die instantly. 「It is as you can see. You are in a desperate situation. You can quietly get caught…and we’ll hand you over to the adventurers guild.」 Hearing uncle’s words, the bandit boss shook his head. 「If I ever get caught, I’ll be executed. Since I’m going to die anyway—I would want to at least die as a warrior. Who is the strongest among you?」 This person’s head has a bounty even in the imperial capital but before that, I heard that he was a warrior who dedicated his life to the sword. I guess it is understandable that such a person wants to be slaughtered by the Demon King Cornelia in the end…. He’s now an evil person but he certainly has impressive sword skill. He’s also decent in his youth…. Since he’ll die….he wanted to boast to others that he fought with the strongest opponent. Or at least that’s what I think he’s thinking… If that is the case, he should have not fallen to the dark side. Then, the Demon King Cornelia thought for a while and said something to uncle. 「You. Equip your hoe.」 「Eh? I’ll be the one who’ll face him?」 「That’s his request….you’re the strongest melee.」 「Oi oi, seriously…..what a pain.」 Then, I froze uncomprehending what the Demon King Cornelia was saying…or what was going on. -Ayukawa Mayu’s POV- 「Uncle……strong…..!」 It was an overwhelmingly one-sided battle. It looks like the battle between Master Roshi and a kindergarten that I saw in a manga. —I mean….what’s with uncle? -he has a skill that can order something from Japan. -the crops he cultivates are all amazing -he’s so strong -he’s a good person -the people around him are OP I mean, his specs are….strange. And then I realized….I’m already looking at uncle differently. His face neither looks good nor bad. But he’s a little bit cooler…No, I’m talking about the atmosphere. In addition, since he’s 29 years old, he’s not really an uncle. I started thinking about it. —I’ll call him Tatsuya-san from now on. I’ve been struggling to survive ever since I came to…this world. After I was picked up by the sage, there were no young men around me. So, if there was a strangely high spec…gentle person who saved my life at such a time….well….maa….I’m sure….. —ah, what am I thinking? Then, I realized how I feel. Yeah….Until now, I was famous for being firm in my belief and I was even called Iron Wall Mayu. I mean, I was never interested in any man before and that’s the reason why I’ve never dated anyone before. However… .29-year-old man…. He’s not an uncle but he’s at the age where you can barely call him oniisan. Then, Tatsuya-san walked up to me and patted me on the shoulder. 「Wait….Mayu. Think again.」 「…..eh?」 「I’m sorry for giving you the wrong idea but, I’m sorry….I can’t be with a high school girl.」 「Eh? How did you know what I’m thinking?」 「Just now….I just heard Skill: Bug Alert level 10 has been activated.」 「….is that so?」 「….it is so.」 It seems like he can see everything. I mean, everything is like an ant to him, right? 「In any case, I can’t be with high school girls.」 「Why can’t you be with high school girls?」 「It’s impossible if you’re under 20.」 「….eh? But Sonja-san is….she’s a junior high schooler no matter how you look at her….」 「Have you considered the difference in race….that’s how her race developed. However, you are different….you are human and a genuine high school girl. That’s bad.」 Oh, is that so? She’s over 20 and only looks like that because she’s from a different race. I don’t really get it well but I don’t think me being under 20 is a problem. 「But we are in a different world, I don’t think you have to worry about something like that….」 「This is a very serious problem.」 「Serious problem?」 「Yeah, even if you and I are fine with it…socially, mangaly….no, more importantly, it would be bad for Square Enix.」 I-I don’t get what he’s saying but it sounds convincing. Besides, Tatsuya-san also has a very serious expression so it seems like I have no choice but to agree. 「However, ano….Tatsuya-san?」 「What?」 So, I told him the shocking truth that I had hidden until now. 「I’m no longer 16 years old. I’m technically 20 years old.」 Then, Tatsuya-san’s ears perked up. 「………What do you mean?」 TN: The manga publisher of this novel is Square Enix. You can read the plot armor explanation in the next chapter. Now, the following are the spoils of the battle. -Villagers’ reward, 200 gold coins -Bandit’s gold, 2000 gold coins -Bandit’s treasure, 7000 gold coins Yeah, I’m wondering if I can order fine daiginjo sake with these. I mean, no. I’ve been converting everything into sake. That’s mainly the reason why I’m always short on money. -0- By the way, Arisa was trying to haggle with the villagers so I gave her the taste of my fist. The villagers had given 400 gold coins in advance as a reward to the adventurers guild and it seems that they prepared the remaining 400 coins as a quest completion reward. Arisa tried to take those 400 gold coins. She said, “At least give us half….” And that’s what happened. -0- So, we decided not to order sake this time but use what we got to replenish various seasonings. Lately, Cornelia has been going to our house a lot so I have to replenish a lot of curry powder. And that’s what happened— -0- 「How can you calculate that fast?」 I muttered that to myself while I was dumbfounded with Mayu. She’s making a balance sheet for the crops and other things we have. 「I’m used to play with abacus….and I can do simple bookkeeping since I went to a business high school.」 「By the way, how good are you with arithmetic?」 「Eh? Without using an abacus, I can…do simple four-digit X four-digit multiplication….mentally.」 Ah….. This girl is a monster. Or are people who use abacus will eventually have this type of….superhuman ability to calculate? In addition to this, she also learned accounting from her business high school. 「Hey, Mayu.」 Then, I patted Mayu’s shoulder. 「Eh? What?」 「You….are hired as the person in charge of accounting!」 In this way, our accounting has become better at a whole new dimension level than before. Read the latest update only at SHMTranslations.com So, that night— As a celebration for our new accounting manager, we ordered three bottles of cheap whiskey through the zenigeba god. I also ordered some carbonated water. To save money, we had a highball party. Mayu balls herself 20 years old but she has never drink before. So, I let her give it a try and found that—she’s a big drinker. Her parents are from Kyushu so it seems like she has a genetic predisposition to drink. So as usual, we all got drunk in the living room. And when I crawled to my bed, thinking I could finally sleep alone for the first time after a long time— —Yeah, I knew it. I knew that Mayu have gone to bed first. But, I never thought she’ll go to my bed… 「Ah, Tatsuya-shan….」 Oh? It seems like no matter how much of a drunkard’s gene you have, you’ll really lose your mind the first time you get drunk. 「Why are you in my bed?」 「Sha……ano…….I…..I….Thatshuya-shan….」 Then, I felt her hands on my back. Maa, the famous confession when drunk scene. 「I can’t be with a high school girl. 」 「Youh know….I….I’m 20, right?」 「No, you look like you’re 16.」 「Ano ne? Really? There’s this convenient space….where you can practice magic and get old faster… 」 「Right?」 「Time runs differently there….2 days here will be 1 year there. So, I trained for 4 years. I should be 20 and look like one….」 Ehto…. I’m pretty sure there was a room like that in a world-renowned manga where aliens with kitchen-related names….waging word-destroying battles….shooting chi from their palms… It’s a useful setup for getting stronger in a short period of time. It’s a room where time seems to flow differently. 1 day outside is 1 year inside so you can practice hard there…. Wait, oi oi, seriously…. 「I—I—I’m….20, okay?」 Then, there’s no problem. No, but there’s something very forced about this….20 years old….but she looks 16 years old….. 「No, but….I don’t think….」 「Ugh….Tatshuya-shan…..could it be….you dislike me?」 And so, I sighed deeply. And said this with my honest feeling. 「I don’t dislike you at all.」 —thus, our family increased by one. 「Sorry! I’m very sorry!」 Cornelia, who had come to eat curry, awkwardly bowed to us. 「Oi oi, what do you mean?」 「Can you please stop the hand-riding rabbits….. from overhunting?」 「What?」 「As I told you before, the forest of no return is the home of high-ranking monsters.」 「Yeah, you did.」 「In other words, it’s a treasure trove of material resources.」 「Maa, they sold a lot as if they are rip off….those high-rank monsters’ bones and furs are pretty expensive but can be sold easily.」 「And those materials are my….pocket money….」 「They are also the lifeblood of this house.」 Well, we can really go on without them if we won’t buy sake…..but sake in this world is terrible. Recently, everyone’s tongues have become too fat that they can no longer drink elves or dwarves’ sake. —-a really bad trend. I knew a family that used to love 100 yen conveyor belt sushi but the moment they won the lottery, they only went to high-class conveyor belt sushi. Maa, they don’t even eat somewhere where sushi’s not moving…. Anyway, there’s no doubt that all the females of this family have become gourmet. 「What are you trying to say, Cornelia?」 「Demon beasts actually reproduced every year or two, however, if they are hunted like crazy like what you’ve been doing….」 「They won’t be able to reproduce….is that right?」 「Yeah. The demon beasts will be extinct in a few years at this rate.」 「That would be a major problem if that were to happen.」 Profits are rising from the sale of sugar from sugar beets. It has been going up up and away. That would have been enough for our daily lives but— —that zenigeba god’s rate is just a rip-off. With only sugar, we wouldn’t be able to afford seasonings let alone alcohol. After all, the rate is….one gold coin should be 10000 yen in this world but if it is converted to buy Japanese products, it is only equivalent to 1 yen. In other words, 10000 yen’s worth here in this world is 1 yen. 1 million yen is worth 100 yen. That’s the real problem. 「I understand. I’ll do something about it, Cornelia.」 「Okay. I’m not telling you to not hunt…I only ask you to refrain.」 After seeing Cornelia off, I now have something to worry about. I can only ask myself “What should I do…”. 「Tatsuya-san? What’s the matter? Why are you fiddling with your smartphone? You usually take a nap at this time, right?」 Mayu, who was doing accounting, asked me, who was lying on the sofa, after my break from my farm work. 「Some stuff happened.」 「Ah, is it about money shortage?」 「I’ve been thinking about it—how about I do some alchemy?」 「Hnn? Alchemy? On earth….alchemy has been denied by science so it shouldn’t work in this world too, right? It may have been useful as a cornerstone of the development of chemistry but, can you actually make gold using it?」 Then, I showed Mayu the search screen on my phone. When Mayu looked at my screen, she was a little bit confused at first but….she smiled when she saw through my intentions. 「Right….that’s definitely alchemy.」 「I know right?」 And so, I headed to Katia, the dwarf who’s in charge of building our house. 「Ya ho, Katya-chan.」 「Mayu-san and….oniichan.」 Katya and the elves are building our house and they are currently….on break and are having some tea. I’m asking Katya a lot of things. Just the other day, she completed the…forged. It is a full-pledged forge that even has a furnace. Katya said that even weapon making is possible. As for the monster materials from the hunted monsters from the forest of no return, it was decided that it would be better to sell them to the city after processing them here than wholesale them to the adventurers guild. That forge will be very useful in the future. I already have a plan of hiring dwarves craftsmen to make weapons and armors. I’d also like to hire some elves who are dexterous to process furs and others. However, that’s not what we are here for. When I showed her my phone to get to the point— 「By the way, oniichan…」 「Hnn? What’s up, Katya?」 「You’re going to ask me to build a bathhouse, aren’t you?」 「Ah, we have to draw water from the river so it is kind of a big project….I also plan on using it to solve the water problem for domestic use and agricultural use too.」 「Okay, but I have a proposal.」 「A proposal?」 「Your phone reminded me of something I found in there….I want to remodel the bed.」 「What do you mean?」 「I want to make a huge bed where everyone can sleep together and it should be that princess type.」 「Ah, you mean the one with a canopy? I don’t really mind.」 「I’d also like to adopt the idea of putting mirrors everywhere in the bedroom but that would cost a lot.」 「…..what are you saying?」 「And the clothes that Mayu is wearing…」 「Blazer school uniform?」 「Yeah. I want to have clothes like those prepared for a certain number of people. I want to wear the nurse one from your world……prepare several numbers of those too. I also want to add a room that can be used as a walk-in closet so we can change clothes anytime.」 「Seriously….what are you trying to do?」 「And finally….this will be a major project—-」 Katya continued to look serious. 「I want to put a rotation function on the bed.」 「This is not a love hotel!」 And it’s even a Showa era one. The other day, I was strangely excited and….told them to look at my phone while saying “This is the bedroom of another world!”. It’s not hard to imagine that I have opened a page of a love hotel feature or something. Well, it’s not that she’s interested in eroticism. It might have touched her craftsman’s heart after seeing the state-of-the-art facilities. 「So, why are you here?」 「Ah, here’s why….」 Then, I showed Katya the screen of my smartphone. Katya is unable to read Japanese so I have to verbally explain what’s written one by one. 「I see….so, you have perfected alchemy in your world? Maa….even if it’s not perfected, this will definitely be profitable.」 「This should be enough to deal with our money shortage, right?」 「Of course!」 So, while they were constructing our house, I asked Katya to start making something with the use of alchemy if she could. It looks like it will probably take some time but I don’t have a problem with that. -0- In the meantime, since it’s very alchemy-like, I thought of making it the bread and butter of our family’s business. So, I discussed it with Ouroboros and we decided to limit the hunting of the hand riding rabbits to 1/3. That would mean that we just lost more than half of our income. We were already in a tough spot even before this. Even if we make money through alchemy, our family budget would still be in red. 「Let’s not drink for now….」 I also thought of making and selling our own sake. If I were to go into the details of the production process, I didn’t get it so let’s skip it— For now, I decided to increase our wine production. We had been expanding the vineyard for this purpose for some time. Our main objective is to produce a lot of wine. By adjusting the alcoholic fermentation, we can even make wine vinegar which can be used as seasoning so we can kill two birds with one stone. -0- After making the prototype, I taste-tested it—I was taken aback. The sugar content of my grapes was not half bad so the prototype was very sweet. After the fermentation, it was a little sweet but in a good way. It was so sweet that it can even be called super high-quality fruit wine. It was especially popular with the ladies and Arisa even said “This will sell even at a rip-off price!”. Then, Arisa got strangely excited and said something like this, 「How about we invite the bigwigs from the city?」 According to her, the best way to sell wine is to sell it in the human city. She also said that humans would pay the highest price for the thing that I asked Katya to make. The wine and the thing will probably be sold through the company of adventurer king Marx which is Maria’s foster father. However, the scale of the business is getting bigger. She said that it would be better to invite the city’s administrative official and talk to them once to say hello. Read the latest update only at SHMTranslations.com A few days later. Arisa and the adventurer king talked to the city’s administrative officials for me and it was decided that there will be a house visit. 「So….we’re going to have guests in this house….I’m kind of nervous.」 There are rules in the city for selling alcohol so it’s definitely better to talk to them. I’m not used to entertaining guests though. In any case, I prepared souvenirs for the official. A bottle of wine that we made. Sugar that we made. Smoked devil boar meat. Potato chips I ordered with my skill. It is said that the official is a very stubborn man and doing things under the table will be counterproductive. So I purposely left out expensive items but I wonder if my prepared gifts are enough. And since he likes to drink, I prepared some other banquet food with strong flavor…. I’m currently working on the main dish. Well, in other words, it will be the dish that will be served at the end of the banquet. The process of making the dish is as follows: 1. ? ? ? Simmer death hawk bones and devil boar bones in a skillet for 24 hours to make the base soup. 2. ? ? ? Pressure cook the devil boar meat with soy sauce, mirin, sake, and garlic for two hours. 3. ? ? ? Char siu will be served as side dish. 4. ? ? ? Boil noodles ordered from Japan. 5. ? ? ? Mix the char siu sauce broth from step 2 with the base soup from step 1 and add a lot of artificial flavorings. 6. ? ? ? Ramen is ready! Now, this is the first time I’ve made my own ramen in another world…I wonder how it will be. If it was well-received, it might be a good idea to skip the artificial seasoning part and open a restaurant somewhere. The big wig from the city arrived. It looks like he’s really a big wig since he has seven attendants. One of them is a secretary and the other six are high-ranking adventurers who are acting as his guards. Maa, they call him Vice Mayor Arman so I guess he’s really a big wig. And I see that the adventurer king Marx is also here. He seems to have brought a number of people from his company too. In fact, the sale of sugar at a very low price has become a hot topic in the city and even the big wigs of the merchant associations wanted to visit me. 「So, in addition to sugar, I’d like to sell this in the city too…」 That’s what I said. Maa, I guess we’ll have a business meeting first before the banquet. That’s normal since we can’t talk about anything seriously if we’re drunk. And so, I let a hundred white balls roll on the living room table. 「They are….pearls?」 Everyone held their breath upon hearing that. Well, speaking of pearls, like in Japan, it is also considered a luxury item here too. 「However, Tatsuya, this place is not near the sea, right?」 Marx looks at me suspiciously. 「Strictly speaking, they are not real but technically speaking, they are.」 Pearls are basically crystallized calcium carbonate. I had seen a TV program once about how to make artificial pearls and I had searched for the details on the internet. The ingredients are easy to find: mayonnaise and slaked lime. We can make our own mayonnaise in this world. Slaked lime is only a few dozen yen per kilogram so once we order it…we can mass-produce pearls. There are plenty of materials but it’s difficult to crystallize them. So, since we knew the materials and the process, we relied on the intuition and skills of our dwarven craftsmen – Katya. She seems to have failed a few times but her craftsmen spirit did not give up and in the end, she completed it. Arisa said “Let’s pretend they are real and sell them!” but I said “that’s not a good idea” and dropped my fist on her head. Maa, you can’t charge the same price for artificial and natural pearls. However, in this world, the idea of creating artificial pearls doesn’t even exist. Any logical buyer would be satisfied if we say that it was crystallized with the help of s super mysterious magic….Arisa said, “Then, let’s at least sell them to a half or even until the third of the original price.” —In other words, we can sell it as we wish even at the natural pearl price. It’s alchemy after all. That said, we can’t make too much since the price of pearls would collapse. We are thinking of selling them in small quantities over a long period of time. Then, Vice Mayor Arman exclaimed “No no…” with a pale face. 「You can mass produce sugar in this cold region and even make pearls….who the hell are you? I can only think of them as god’s work.」 「Well, it’s a trade secret.」 And that’s about it. Arisa took care of the details and we ended up selling the pearls through Marx’ company. Incidentally, the vice mayor permitted us to sell red wine without a hitch. -0- And it’s time for the banquet. 「Devil boar meat….?」 While drinking red wine, Vice Mayor Arman reached out to the katsu devil boar as if he was afraid of it. 「It’s delicious! And so crispy!」 Duh, it’s a tonkatsu. If it’s not crispy, it won’t be called tonkatsu. 「It goes really well with red wine! What is this sweet and spicy sauce? Oh, and…is this a death hawk!?」 Vice Mayor Arman’s eyes are black and white as he took a bite at a karaage. Well, it’s a high-difficulty subjugation target and we’re serving it like an ordinary food so it’s not a surprise that he was surprised. 「I can only eat this kind of luxury food several times a year. But…this is a very opulent feast. Then, let me try tasting the main course, the dragon steak.」 「Ufufu, it’s not just any dragon, it’s a kaiser dragon steak desu yo?」 What Sonja said scared the vice mayor so much that he almost spewed it out of his mouth. 「Cough! Cough! I don’t even know if you can eat even an ordinary dragon’s meat at the imperial capital’s ultra high-class restaurants….Kaiser? Is it really okay for me to eat it?」 「Ahahaha. You can desu yo. Kaiser dragon meat is delicious, right?」 「Yeah, of course. The ingredients alone are wonderful and the chef’s skill is not half bad either. As for the seasonings….they are dream-like.」 No, they are just karaage powder and tonkatsu sauce. And then, wasabi soy sauce. All of those are thanks to the zenigeba god. And the girls who I asked to stay away from the house because they would scare the guests…came in. 「Unfair desu?」 「Banquet nano desu?」 「Meat meat carrot meat carrot?」 It’s the hand riding rabbits but as soon as the vice mayor saw them, his face turned blue. 「Hiii! Hand riding rabbits!」 This is exactly why I prohibited them from coming…. 「No, you don’t need to be scared」 A hand-riding rabbit nodded in agreement. 「I’m not a bad hand riding rabbit!」 I don’t know if he actually believed us but….the vice mayor seemed to ease up a little even though he’s still pretty scared. 「No, I was….just surprised to see some hand-riding rabbits.」 Then, the vice mayor looked at Sonja seriously. 「Come to think of it, this young lady here surprisingly looks similar to the hand riding rabbits….」 「Yes, I’m their queen desu yo?」 As expected, the vice mayor collapsed on the spot. -0- And then…. After all of that, everyone was drunk. After all, it’s inevitable that you’ll drink more if you are eating delicious foods. Read the latest update only at SHMTranslations.com By the way, at the end….we all ate ramen. However, not only the vice mayor but everyone else fainted because of Sonja. We had made quite a lot of ramen but it was gone in a blink of an eye. There’s also the eating competition between the hand-riding rabbits and everyone else. I had no choice but to get some chicken ramen and serve it to everyone again which was also very popular. Yeah, I guess ramen would be popular no matter what world it is. Let’s talk about money. Currently, I have a monthly income of over 5000 gold coins. (That’s about 50000000 Japanese yen.) One of the biggest contributors was the artificial pearls which I could sell for around 1000 pieces per month. However, the fact that we’re still depending on the hand riding rabbits’ hunting remains unchanged. We’re in a situation where the hand-riding rabbits are devouring limited resources and one day, we’ll reach the limit. We need to get to a point where we can break even with our balance even without the hand-riding rabbits. However, the problem is that we need too much money…. -0- I’ve concluded that we need to make what we can in this world. It’s good to know that we already produced the prototype of soy sauce and miso but the most expensive seasoning is curry powder….. Cornelia often comes and it is at a level where she thinks this place is her home….there’s always a need to cook curry. There was even a time when I woke up in the morning and headed to the living room only to find her eating curry on her own saying “I’m disturbing you.”. In short, I’m planting curry powder ingredients in the field. Basically, as long as I have the right spices and ingredients, curry is just a matter of mixing like a science experiment. All I need to do is to search the internet and do some trial and error experiments and I’ll be able to make it. The most important thing for the finished product is the tongue of those who’ll eat it but that’s not really a problem. Actually, Japanese and English curry are difficult to make but I’ve made Indian curry several times already. The Indian curry I made was well received by everyone. Read the latest update only at SHMTranslations.com Then, a miscalculation occurred when I was making curry. This miscalculation is something that could have revolutionized our source of income than the artificial pearls and would have been very helpful for our family’s tight budget. You see— 「What do you mean by red pepper? You mean red powder, right?」 I’m currently talking with Arisa, who came here to pick up the monster materials from the hand riding rabbits, while drinking tea in the living room. 「Let me see your field, Tatsuya-niichan.」 「Ah, go ahead.」 And I took Arisa to my spices field. 「Uwaaaaa…..this is amazing. All of them are spices?」 「The demon king eats a lot and everyone likes curry too.」 「Can we harvest a certain amount on a regular basis?」 「Of course, if I want to.」 Then, Arisa turned her gaze to me. 「Hey hey, Tatsuya-niichan.」 「What?」 「Can you let me take care of this?」 「What do you mean?」 「You know that spices are traded for their equal weight in gold, right?」 That moment, I gulped. Thinking about it, it’s so obvious. I wondered why I hadn’t noticed that before. In medieval Europe, spices were so expensive that even nobles couldn’t afford to use them. It’s the same in this world. They can only be bought in the south and the reason they cost like rip off is the transport fee. However, I have a seed creation skill and I can also customize it to cold region specifications. 「Are you planning to sell spices?」 Arisa nodded and grinned. 「This is incomparable with sugar. This…is basically on a revolutionary level. The merchant guild will turn over. Maa, leave it to me and think of it as if you’re transporting them via a big ship!」 Arisa said so and hit her chest proudly. -Rine, innkeeper’s daughter’s POV- I’m from an old innkeeper family. It is both our tradition and prestige but because it’s so old, there are a lot of strings attached….it makes us hard to move. Recently, there have been more and more inn that are cheap and competitive only lacking in interior decoration and services. —taken. Yes, they were the ones who’ve been taking our guests. Our old-fashioned attentive service and carefully prepared luxurious meals. That’s how we do things but we couldn’t keep up with….time. Our management is on fire. Right now, we are even struggling to purchase enough food for tomorrow’s dinner…. My father, who is also a chef, doesn’t care about management. He only cares about serving the best ingredients and carefully preparing the food using the best techniques for his customers. Of course, our prices are also the best. That’s why there are no customers. Every day, as the person in charge of accounting and purchasing consumable goods, including ingredients, I always say to myself “Nothing good will come from being stingy!” But what’s with these ingredients? It only brings us closer to doom. And now, I’m visiting the market…the biggest problem I have is purchasing spices. They are so expensive that they are said to be traded with their same weight in gold. And of course, it’s a painful expense…especially in a falling business. 「Ano….aren’t you asking too much?」 「If you think so, then don’t buy it.」 My favorite ingredient store asked me for a 40 percent increase in the price of red powder. 「No, but….」 「Let me tell you this, the peddlers were attacked by bandits so the purchase price has gone up.」 「With all due respect, sir—」I said. I’m a merchant’s daughter too. If I don’t say what I have to say, I will be tricked and kicked into the dust in the world of business. 「You seemed to have sold with only 20% price increase to the customer earlier.」 「Oh, is that so?」 The grocer said so without taking offense. 「I change the price depending on the customer. We are at a critical time because of the soaring purchase price after all.」 「….Eh?」 「Let me explain it to you. That customer is a regular customer so I decided to split the increase in the purchase price to 50-50 between us and the customer….he’s been a regular customer for a long time.」 「Then, if you can sell me that much too….we’ve been your customer for a since generations ago….we can even be called partners.」 The grocer chuckled. 「I’ve heard about that otaku’s inn….it won’t last long, right?」  He also changed his tone, sending his mocking gaze to me. 「….what about it?」 「I’m saying that you should give up and we don’t plan on being partners with you.」 「…..!?」 I heard that my grandfather’s and great grandfather’s generation….have given big loans for this ingredient store. In addition, when the other side was struggling, there was a time that we even bought ingredients from them with added price…. I thought that we have a long trusting relationship but…. Then, the grocer said with a smile. 「I don’t mind if you don’t buy from us. We’re the only ones who sell spices in this market. If you have any complaints, please go to the next town. However, since there is a soaring purchase price….you probably buy it at the price I said earlier.」 I was so frustrated that I began to cry. It’s not that I’m asking you to give me preferential treatment over others and lower the price. If there is such a thing as a price for regular customers, then treat me as a regular customer…that’s all I want…. However, without spices, we can’t entertain tomorrow’s guests. I opened my wallet and was about to pay with the little gold I had left then, I heard—- 「Then, let’s get down to business! We’ll sell our peppers at half price compared to others! And What’s more, since it will be your first purchase from us, you’ll get 75% off instead of 50%!」 A fox eared girl spread a carpet beside her and on the carpet are all sorts of spices. Starting with red powder, peppers, turmeric….and a huge variety of other spices that she had never seen before. All of them are piled up in a huge pile. The amount of red powder alone was probably several times the amount of what was on display at the ingredients store she’s currently negotiating with. With a smiling face, the fox-eared girl continued. 「Take it or leave it! The upper purchase limit per person is 5 gold coins…what are you waiting for? Buy now!」 「50% less than the others?」 「How can she sell it at that price!?」 「So basically, the 75% discount is only for today!?」 Maa, those are normal reactions. It goes without saying that people flocked to her in a blink of an eye. -0- —everyone did alright. Less than a month later, the ingredient store that my inn had been buying too stopped selling spices. There is a rumor that the grocer has also withdrawn from the sugar business. It is said that they have a large amount of bad inventory of spices and sugar and have a large amount of debt…. Furthermore, rare monster ingredients, which is the main business of the ingredient store….has recently been sold at low prices by the company that the fox eared girl belongs to. The company seems to hunt, dismantle, transport, and sell them by themselves. Everything was handled in a first-class manner but they are very cheap. Aren’t they amazing? -0- And this is not a rumor but I heard directly but I heard it from the financial company. They are already judging their business partners that are no longer feasible to continue and will stop them personally. In other words, the financier has already been preparing for debt collection. That includes coercive measures including seizure of the ingredient store that our inn has been trading with for generations….and that’s it. A few days after I sent Arisa to the city, the mayor and vice mayor came to my house. Of course, the adventurer king Marx is also with them. 「Huh….you guys never cease to amaze me.」 The vice mayor sipped his tea and sighs after saying that with admiration. 「To think you’ll wholesale spices at that price…」 The mayor stared at me blankly. 「Are you sure you’re going to leave everything to my company?」 It was Marx-san who said that. 「Yeah, the most convenient way for us to deal with it is to leave it to you.」 「However, Tatsuya, do you have any idea of what kind of disaster might befall you? No, it’s already happening…」 「I was surprised that mayor-san came here but, what do you mean?」 「Considering the monthly income I heard from Arisa…the lord will surely come out with all his might. People might die.」 「That doesn’t sound peaceful. What’s going on?」 「Spice trade is also known as the…golden dead or alive road.」 「Those are bad sounding words…or did you mispronounce them?」 「No, you heard it right.」 I didn’t think that Marx-san…would say something like that. Maa, it’s probably just a coincidence or mistranslation. 「So, what exactly is happening?」 「It takes a long long way to get spices from the south. Along the way, encountering monsters and bandits are also a normal occurrence….」 「I see. That explains the dead or alive part.」 「Yes, but if you make it, you’ll make money, lot of money.」 「That’s the golden part. So, what about the lord?」 「Spice trade involves a lot of things….large global companies and various countries around the world. It is a system that makes millions of gold.」 「You’re talking about…when a lot of unidentifiable spices were thrown in the mix, right? Surely, those who have the monopoly and are vested with the system will not overlook it.」 「No, that’s not it. Their target is your production method.」 「….production method?」 「We can no longer fool them. You’ve been too daring and now it is obvious to everyone….sugar, spices, etc….all came here, right? You produced something that can’t be produced in this area. Do you think it’s a problem?」 「Yeah, it is basically a money tree.」 「Our city is a self-governing territory, however, above me, the mayor, is the country. So, the lord….it is also a matter of time before it is conveyed to the king. No, I think the king already heard of you.」 「What if that happens?」 「The best thing that would happen is that a large portion of this farm will become under the direct control of the king. The worst would be the farm will be taken over. That’s how great your profit is.」 Oi oi, seriously….thinking about it, I can’t help but facepalm myself. 「No, this is the demon king’s territory.」 「That part is vague. Demon King Cornelia doesn’t govern her territory that much….You guys are doing business with a human city so everyone will think that this place is under the king.」 「No, I have permission from…Cornelia herself. She said I’m the lord of this place. 」 And then, they all froze. 「Y-y-y-you….were recognized as a territory lord by Demon King Cornelia?」 The three’s faces became pale…apparently, even a position as a village chief here means a lot. 「However, since that is the case….this will become a territory war.」 Marx sighed. 「What’s wrong?」 「In fact….the king is already preparing to threaten the farm here. It has been reported that the only forces here are the hand-riding rabbits and their queen….they are already gathering a subjugation force to exterminate them.」 「Oi oi, aren’t they itching for a fight too much….」 「Let me tell you the truth. We originally came here to mediate between you and the king. We came here to have the king profit in the form of tax. However, since this place is a territory recognized by a demon king….we can no longer do that since this is not the territory of the king in the first place.」 「In short, if they threaten us with force, that is nothing but picking a fight against Cornelia.」 The two and Marx nodded. 「We have to stop them. I will immediately go to the capital on a fast horse but….I’m sure I won’t make it in time.」 「Why are you so sure about that?」 「The king is an impatient bastard who believes in speed. Perhaps….he already gathered the forces needed and are already on their way to have a discussion with you in the form of intimidation. At that point, the demon king won’t sit still. I won’t make it in time but….I ask you to please be calm.」 「By the way, what’s the other party’s war potential?」 「It’s a hand-riding rabbit extermination group. There are five sword saints, ten sages, and fifty holy knights…but that’s the minimum. You can even call them the full power of the kingdom.」 Then, Marx claps his hands. 「—also, there should be the fugitive hero, Miyamoto.」 -Miyamoto Masashi’s POV- After that— I was blown away by the light truck. Both my legs and ribs are broken and I was in a helpless state. And after crawling around the forest for three days and three nights….without eating or drinking—I met a senpai. He was a high school student who had been sent to a juvenile detention center for being a delinquent. So, he was teleported in this world too. He had made a legend that he had escaped from jail and was missing…now, that mystery was solved. When he was on his way to school, he noticed a magic circle on the ground, and immediately after, he found himself in this world. —senpai. There’s no end on his list of evil deeds. He picked up a hundred women and impregnated them. It is said that he never used birth control so he invented his own martial arts to deal with it. —secret technique: Dark Fist of Abortion. That sounds absurd. However, there are rumors that he managed to get away with it which is one of the great things about him. There’s also a story where he threw a Molotov cocktail at a motorcycle police officer when they were chasing him. There’s also a story of how he honey-trapped the principal of his school by using a JK beauty and got him to rescind his expulsion. As a fellow delinquent, I really admire him. Yeah, we all admire him. —Nakajima….Atom-senpai. His name alone is cool. So, senpai picked me up, who’s crawling like an insect in the forest, and even used healing magic on me. Hearing his story, it seems like senpai trained seriously as a transmigrator and became a sage. As a sage….at the moment, he’s currently working for the country. Even so, he still was able to work with the criminal guild while working for the country. He’s the coolest. Unlike a half-wit like me, he’s a real evil-doer….amazing. He is on a different level. I’m nothing but half-baked compared to him. He utilized everything around to become the strongest. I had to back out of training so I’m only half strong. I know that senpai’s guts in that area is the real deal. I was so lucky when I said “I should have done it like senpai did” because…he took me to some sort of facility. From what I heard, it seems like this facility leads to a mysterious space where only two days will pass here and 1 year will pass inside. I was thrown inside it…it was the best place to get stronger in a short period of time but you won’t get any older. By the way, anyone can only use that space for a maximum of five years and I spent five years there. I have trained so hard that I was even surprised with myself. Senpai said, “If you can’t do that much, you can’t live as one of the strongest in this world.”. Along with those words, he handed me a list of skills and magic that can be acquired. If I don’t take this task seriously, I’m sure senpai will kill me as soon as I go out. —I remember all the torture legends of senpai. They are nothing but gruesome. I don’t want to have my eyeballs burned out or an ice pick inserted into my fingernails while I’m still alive. And— I’m currently walking through the forest on a special mission. I was told that the king had ordered a raid on a house where those hateful… hand-riding rabbits are hiding. 「Hey hand riding rabbits—the new and improved me is back!」 Senpai smiled and patted me on my shoulder. 「Ah, now you won’t lose to a hand-riding rabbit. You can even fight against two of them.」 In addition to senpai and I, there are sword saints and sages with us. It is an exaggerated force that could match an entire country. 「By the way senpai, everyone’s strong so we probably can beat anything, right?」 「Ah, Miyamoto, if we are to face anything—」 Then, senpai proudly said this. 「—as long as we won’t face a demon king, we will win!」 I also nodded proudly when I saw senpai like that. I will follow senpai for the rest of my life! Our hero, the strongest badass…Nakajima….Atom-senpai! 「—as long as we won’t face a demon king, we will win!」 I nodded proudly at him. 「I’ll follow you for the rest of my life!」 You, our hero, are the strongest badass…..Nakajima….Atom-senpai…! And at that time, we found a little girl walking in the forest. 「Fox ears. It’s strange that we could meet one here.」 She looks like an 11 or 12-year-old girl. That twin-tailed, blonde girl is walking with a beautiful, fox-ear oneesan with a slender body. 「….how could the two of them walk alone in this forest….we should bring them with us.」 That blonde girl….she’s so beautiful as if she’s a work of art. The word cute was invented for her. She’s not in my strike zone because I don’t have that kind of hobby but if she was found by someone with that hobby, that person would surely be blown away. Maa, even if she’s not in my strike zone, I still like the fox ear oneesan. I mean, she’s slender but she’s properly busty in the right places. Yeah, she’s a fit erotic type. Also, though I don’t dislike it, she’s surprisingly speaking in kansai dialect. And at that time….I noticed that Atom-senpai was in a nostalgic state. 「….atom senpai?」 「To think that such a lovely girl exists. 」 「You mean the fox ears? I know what you mean…she’s plump at the right places….but slender on all others. 」 「No, not the older one! I’m talking about the blonde twin tails! 」 —that’s your type! Come to think of it, I think I heard some rumors like that about senpai…. 「Anyway, there’s no one else but us in this forest. Even if someone sees us, we’re from the criminal guild anyway. It won’t affect us in any way. Shall we commit a crime and kidnap them? I’ll take the fox ear and senpai will take the blonde twin tail…. 」 Senpai shook his head and sighed. 「You can’t do that, Miyamoto. 」 「Why? 」 「What do you mean? 」 「…..Yes, Lolita no touch. A little girl is meant to be loved with eyes, you know.」 「Then, let’s just get the fox ears….」 「No.you.don’t….you can’t do that, Miyamoto.」 「Why?」 「….the blonde twin tail and the fox ears seem to know each other. If we take the fox ears….won’t the blonde twin tail be scared? I’m not na?ve enough to dye that angelic smile with fear.」 Damn it….he transformed into a gentleman. However, senpai is scary when he’s angry. 「So, Miyamoto.」 「What is it?」 Atom-senpai took sweets from his bosom….and handed it to me. 「Use this and pick up the blonde twin tail.」 「Pick up?」 「Yes, I want to see her closer….I want to love her with my eyes. I want to be healed by watching her adorable figure. Also, we are currently in the forest of no return….I’m worried about the blonde twin tail. I can’t let a work of art-like little girl like her be in danger.」 Ah, this guy is a perverted gentleman. But, but….after all, senpai is scary when he’s angry. So, I walked to the blonde twin tail and offered her some candy. Then, she said “you have an auspicious intention….” but decided to come with us without complaint. We are going to accompany these girls to their destination guaranteeing their safety but it seemed that we were going in the same direction. —and, well….that’s how we arrived at our destination. The home of those hateful hand-riding rabbits. 「That guy…isn’t that Miyamoto?」 Miyamoto, who appeared in front of me, was different from the previous Miyamoto. How do I say this? Until now he feels spattered but now, he feels solid as if he’s a first-class adventurer. 「Tatsuya-sama…who are those people?」 I can only shake my head at Maria’s question. In front of our house is an armed group of around 30 people. For some reason, I feel like each of them has the same level of power as a hand-riding rabbit. 「They should be the messenger from the royal capital that Marx-san was talking about.」 And then, Miyamoto— 「That oneesan…what a glamorous body….bombastic…fantastic!」 While looking at Maria, Miyamoto said that while the hole in his nose is getting bigger. His crotch was already captured by Maria. And then, Miyamoto saw Mayu. 「Why is Mayu here?」 So, Mayu said this while blushing. 「Currently, I’m….Tatsuya-san’s lover.」 We’re lovers? No, given our situation, we are….I guess. My mindset is still thinking from a monogamous family’s point of view. Miyamoto was confused after hearing Mayu’s words. 「Oi oi, no matter how much offensive I do, Mayu always has an iron wall….how can you be with an old man? Are you kidding me?」 「…..」 「Oi, Mayu? You have black hair and normal clothes. You’re not flashy but plain. Your family is also poor and you rarely talk so you have no friends. The reason I accepted you in a high caste group like us…was because you have a pretty face.」 「…..」 「The only thing you’ve got is your face…」 So that’s how their original relationship has been. Mayu, who’s being told by that by Miyamoto, is just biting her lips. 「…..」 「Oi, Mayu? Since you’ve come to this world, you’ve been a slowpoke that can’t even kill a monster, right? That said, aren’t you as useless here as you were useless in Japan?」 「….even when we were in Japan…I’ve never considered you as a friend.」 「Haha, that’s what it is. You and the old man are a couple….maa, aren’t you useless scums a good match?」 「Shut up…you f*cking bug.」 Ouroboros barged in. I didn’t miss the sadistic grin she had on her face the moment she saw Miyamoto. Maa, she gave him the “Hokuto Hyaken” last time after all. TN: Hokuto no Ken parody. 「Ah, if it isn’t Ouroboros-oneesan—long time no see! You did whatever you wanted last time, didn’t you?」 Seeing Miyamoto’s smile, Ouroboros was surprised. 「Master?」 「What is it, Ouroboros?」 「It seems like….he became skillful desu.」 「I can see that but, how skillful is he now?」 「Probably around—a hand riding rabbit.」 I see. I’d say it’s above Arisa, insanely lower than Sonja, and way below Maria and Ouroboros. 「Maa, for me—he’s just around a punch.」 「Ah, I guess he is.」 Miyamoto’s shoulder trembled when he saw us looking down on him. 「Don’t speak as if you can see our ability. Good. By the way, I have something to ask you, old man.」 「What?」 「I’m sure you’re happy to be surrounded by beautiful women but your harem ends here. All of your lovers will be…tied together with ropes and….I’ll be toying them badly later.」 Don’t be ridiculous. Maa, since Sonja is here, I feel like we can win by a large margin even without me and Cornelia… And at that time—a hand-riding rabbit jumped out of the bushes. 「Hahaha! Miyamoto nano desu?Are you going to play with us again nano desu?」 With a smiling face, the hand-riding rabbit tried to jump on Miyamoto with a spear in her hand. But then…. 「Hand riding rabbit! I know your weakness!」 When the hand-riding rabbit was about to pierce Miyamoto’s eyeball with a spear, it stopped in the air. Miyamoto used a carrot taken out of his bosom as a shield. 「Hahaha! I can’t attack this nano desu!」 Then, Miyamoto took that chance to attack. 「Hand riding rabbit! This is my thanks for last time! Roar, god of thunder! Thunder fall!」 It was a sharp thrust by a large sword imbued with lightning magic. But to use a carrot as a shield…what a despicable bastard. 「Uwa! I’m done for nano desu!」 The hand-riding rabbit was blown away towards us as she shouted. 「Hey, are you okay?」 I mean, she received a direct hit on the neck…blood is flowing. Her hair is also burned by lightning….it is scorched and is also curly. It is said that their beautiful straight hair is the charm of the hand riding rabbits…. 「Fuee….not okay nano desuuu…..」 Perhaps she was shocked to be hit by Miyamoto. The hand-riding rabbit began to shed large grain of tears. 「….oi, Miyamoto.」 「What is it?」 I bring out my hoe and hold it towards Miyamoto. 「Ah, what’s with that farming tool? Oh? Are you by any chance going to attack me with a farming tool? Hahaha! Really funny!」 I glared at Miyamoto and said. 「Miyamoto—bastard, you angered me!」 「Miyamoto! Bastard, you angered me!」 「Haha, what are you talking about, old man? Are you stupid? Ah, I see, that’s what it is….Kukukuk, I know that your companions are strong. 」 Then, Miyamoto pointed to his back and said: 「But we have 30 men here! What can you do?!?」 At the same time, Miyamoto turned around and—exclaimed. 「Victory nano desu?」 「Hahaha, our army is invincible.」 「It’s been a long time since Sonja-noneesan works properly.」 「Ouroboros-san and Maria-san are both strong nano desu?」 While Miyamoto was trash talking, Sonja’s army as well as Ouroboros and Maria were already annihilating them. I was only watching them but looking at it, Sonja alone can take care of them. Just speed alone, she’s a whole new level than the rest. Maa, as the hand riding rabbits were saying, Sonja properly works….in fact everyone’s strong. The truth is,? without Sonja, Ouroboros, and Maria, they’ll probably struggle since they are outnumbered. That’s why Sonja seriously fought from the start making the other party unable to do anything and immediately finishing the match. So, speaking of Miyamoto…. 「What the….hell are you guys….?」 No one responded to his words but Ouroboros walked in front of Miyamoto. 「….you mocked Mayu, our compatriot, earlier, didn’t you?」 Then, Ouroboros grabbed his collar with her right hand. Miyamoto was suspended in the air and Ouroboros continued to speak. 「Are you done arranging your properties? Have you written your will? I’m sorry if you haven’t and please give up if you have that plan. However—」 Ah, I’ve heard those lines before….I made the sign of the cross in front of my chest. 「If you summarize everything in less than 20 words, I’ll take them as your last words.」 Then, Ouroboros made a freezing smile. 「Last time, I only half-killed you, but this time—I’ll wholly kill you, got it?」 「Last time, I only half-killed you, but this time—I’ll wholly kill you, got it?」 「…..hih…..hih….hiiiiihhhh!」 Then, the sound of a slap burst on Miyamoto’s face. 「Agi!?」 Ouroboros continued to feed Miyamoto’s face with back and forth slaps. 「Agyu!」 —slap. 「Bugi!」 —slap. 「gugi!」 —slap. 「Jaju!」 —slap. 「jiyo!」 Just like last time, both Miyamoto’s cheeks swelled up worse than a person who has mumps. Ah, and like last time, his teeth flew out again. I mean, I wonder if Miyamoto needs dentures soon. 「Pl….pl….please…gyaaa!」 —slap. 「I won’t listen to a bug who’s begging for his life.」 And then….it’s slapping time again. —slap. 「Abiba!」 —slap. 「pugi!」 And there – not only Ouroboros, Maria went to the guy who seemed to be Miyamoto’s senpai and raised him up with one hand. 「You….are you the boss of this trashy bug?」 「S-s-stop! STOOOPPPPP! No no no no no no! I have nothing to do with him!」 「Fumu. If you don’t have anything to do with him, then good…I don’t have a hobby of killing the innocent…」 Maria’s surprisingly straightforward. Mayu suddenly speaks. 「Ah……Nakajima….Atom-san! He used to hang out with Miyamoto as well!」 「I knew you were related!」 「Pl…..ple….please….stop….gyaa!」 —slap. 「I can’t hear a trash bug who’s begging for his life.」 This time….it was Maria who slapped someone back and forth. —slap. 「Abiba!」 —slap. 「pugi!」 「No….I’m really….gubera!」 These two demon nobles….are scary. They are both laughing so much. They are both having a full smile but their eyes are scary. Then, the faces of both Miyamoto and Atom were so deformed that even Frankenstein would escape because of fear….surprisingly, Cornelia helped them. 「Ouroboros, Maria….stop right there.」 「Eh? What do you mean, Cornelia-sama?」 「Sure, these guys are invaders, however….earlier…they gave me sweets. I think that’s enough for me to do this. Give me some face and…spare their lives.」 Basically, Cornelia can’t see them as bad guys. I mean, they came here together and they even fed her so she might have some sort of affection. 「….If that is your wish, then it can’t be helped.」 So, it seems like the case is settled. After that, let’s tie them up with a rope or something. Let’s send them back to the royal capital or wherever they came from via Marx-san. Ouroboros and Maria looked somewhat unconvinced but they still threw Miyamoto and Atom away. 「Ahi….hiya…ahaha….」 The two newly released guys are trying to escape…to the place where their companions are lying down. 「Ah!」 And there, Cornelia is just watching them with arms crossed. They were escaping unsteadily. And they are currently unsteadily walking to the place where the outdoor stove is….an outdoor stove where the pot with leftover curry from yesterday was. —clang clang clang. The pot was smashed and the curry it contained was all over the ground. Ah….Cornelia’s face looked like it was drained of blood. Moreover, her shoulders are trembling. —it’s over. Last time, it was the hand riding rabbits but this time, he’s done for. 「Well, Miyamoto, is it?」 Cornelia smiled beautifully but terrifyingly. It could be described as ghastly. 「Are you prepared to be burned by the flames of purgatory?」 「Well, Miyamoto, is it?」 Cornelia smiled beautifully but terrifyingly. It could be described as ghastly. 「Are you ready to be burned by the flames of purgatory?」 And at that time—Atom-kun dogeza on the spot. 「I I I I I I’m very sorrryyyy!」 He’s so loud that every one of us turned our gaze to Atom-kun. 「My dead father…taught me not to waste food! I’ve very sorry!」 And then, Ouroboros cruelly looked at him. 「—there’s nothing stranger than a villain begging for his life.」 「Wait, Ouroboros.」 「….Cornelia-sama?」 「Atom…raise your head.」 Atom, who’s rubbing his forehead on the ground while doing a dogeza, raises his head. Atom-kun was crying. It looks like he’s truly reflecting. 「I-I-I….did something bad to the farmer….I shouldn’t have wasted the food….I’m really sorrryyyyyy!」 Areh? Why does it feel like he’s honestly reflecting? 「I’ll eat it! I’ll make sure that the curry won’t be wasted!」 Atom-kun scooped up the curry that was on the ground and began to put it in his mouth. He’s shedding tears already and…it looks like he really felt he has done something horrible. 「By the way, this curry….it has coffee in it, right?」 「Hou? Do a bastard like you know how to make curry…?」 「I came from a fatherless family….making curry for my little sisters is my job….my little sisters are happy when they eat curry….that’s why I like cooking curry myself. Our family also puts coffee in our curry. In addition….we also put red pepper.」 「Hou….red pepper, is it? Would you mind if you let me…taste it?」 「Ah! Of course desu! I’ve ruined it so it’s normal for me to compensate for it…! No, please let me cook for you!」 「However, spicy….I’m not a fan of those kinds of food.」 「Yogurt will make it milder.」 「Yogurt….? Yogurt….?….you sound like a real deal.」 The conversation went in a strange direction…. Cornelia’s cheeks are too loose. Then, Miyamoto shouted while half crying. 「Senpai! You….are you trying to use that story to have the demon king forgive you? How can you say you came from a fatherless family and even cook for your little sisters!」 There, Mayu barged in. 「It’s true that Atom-senpai cooks curry. His family was my apartment neighbor….sometimes, he brings me a bowl of curry….while wearing a pink apron…」 That fact is shocking in a way or another. Given the scary muscle delinquent look of Atom, I can’t imagine him bringing his neighbor a bowl of curry while wearing a pink apron. 「Eh!? That can’t be true! How can you make up something disgusting, senpai!?」 「What are you saying, Miyamoto?」 「Didn’t you give all the women you impregnated with your dark fist of abortion and leave them behind? Just because you were beaten, you suddenly became a good house guy?」 「No, you’re talking about a rumor. I mean…I’m a virgin. My face is scary so I’m easily misunderstood and people like you come around me but…my hobby is playing galge.」 「Eh!? Seriously!?」 「Seriously.」 「But you were in a juvenile detention center….」 「My house was robbed. My little sister almost got stabbed with a kitchen knife so I got pissed….And given how big I am, I kind of overdid my self-defense….」 Oi oi, seriously, this conversation is going in the wrong direction. 「No, but, you joined the criminal guild in this world…..」 「I am a fugitive hero so I have no choice but to join the criminal guild in order to make a living. However, I’ve never done any criminal activity. I only act as escorts and bouncers.」 「No, since you escaped from your duty as a hero, you are basically a scum…」 「They summoned me here at their own convenience, forcing me to put my life on the line to fight…don’t you think something is wrong with that? I don’t think that running away from that situation can make anyone a scum.」 「But you said….Yes, Lolita no touch.」 「That basically means that little girls are to be loved but can’t touch. What else do you want to ask?」 Yeah. Atom-kun is definitely not a scum. Even Maria, who’s happily beating him out earlier, can no longer look at him directly. Then, Cornelia held out her right hand to Atom-kun. 「It seems like there were various misunderstandings between us. Let’s have a handshake of reconciliation.」 However, Atom-kun did not try to hold Cornelia’s hand. 「What’s wrong?」 「Yes, Lolita….. no touch.」 Cornelia laughed. 「Don’t worry. I’m a— legal loli.」 Hearing those words, Atom-kun made a slightly surprised expression. Then, the two of them shake hands with smiles on their faces. 「Atom, your curry….I’m looking forward to it.」 Then, Cornelia glared at Miyamoto. 「So, Miyamoto….are you ready to be burned by the flames of purgatory?」 Hearing those words, Miyamoto shouted his loudest scream today. 「Why am I the only one who’ll get punished!?」 「Apology letter….is it?」 A few days after we sent back the high-rank adventurers and fellows from the criminals guild tied up with ropes, a guy from the royal capital who introduced himself as the Minister of Defense came. What they did was a direct provocation towards the Demon King Cornelia even though they’re not aware of it. They took a polite and humble attitude after. They even said that the king himself would come to apologize if we can wait for a few more days but I said “You don’t have to go that far…” and the matter was settled there. Incidentally, there was a reason why I forgave them easily or rather…let them go. As for why, it’s Arisa. She was present during my meeting with the minister and she demanded a lot of national favors related to business. She had written dozens of contracts on the spot. It goes without saying that my brides are all horrible… So— -0- Miyamoto took a direct hit from Cornelia’s extreme magic. Maria said, “Turned to dust.” Sonja said, “Turned to star nano desu yo.” Mayu said, “A lot of evil things will happen if that was kept alive.” ….That’s it. Anyway, that was amazing. First, Cornelia blew Miyamoto a few kilometers away using wind magic and then, she flew into the sky. Then, Cornelia transformed into a gigantic dragon—and a beam came out from her mouth that looked like something similar to world popular shounen manga where aliens with food names transformed to blonde superhumans. As a result, a crater with a radius of about a kilometer was created. I didn’t ask for it but the voice of god said “Even if you have farm work resistance level 10, you will receive a fair amount of damage if you take a direct hit.”. Only fair!? Thinking about it, it seems like skills that reached level 10 are a cheat themselves. I’m going to conclude that Miyamoto is missing. We can’t say he is dead or alive since we never find any corpse. —if he’s dead, that would leave a bad taste in my mouth. -0- As for Atom-kun, he has been offered a job at our company as a cook. According to him, he was troubled by the fact that if he belonged to a criminal guild, he might be forced to do something evil one day. He and Mayu seemed to have known each other since childhood and no one objected when she guaranteed him to be a good person. By the way, I’m the head chef so I’m only supposed to be in the kitchen when we get some rare ingredients. And, so, well— 「Aniki! How can it taste like this!?」 That’s Atom-kun when he tastes the ingredients. He’s a diligent cook and….pretty useful. As for the person himself, he’s like a gag character. He’s a macho guy but a sage, he’s a lolicon and a galge fanatic but looks like someone who kills for fun…. Maa, to put it in a good way, he’s kind and powerful. -0- Anyway, since he’s the one cooking in his family, he has good foundation in cooking. I lived alone for a long time and I like cooking that I can even make my own homemade ramen…maa, I’m not that good but the food I cook is usually delicious. I know how to utilize chemical seasonings and I feel like most of my dishes can score 70 points. Mayu can also cook. Since it is time for a banquet, the ones in charge of cooking are me, Mayu, Atom-kun, Ouroboros, and Maria. To be honest, it was tough because everyone drinks and eats like crazy. Read the latest update only at SHMTranslations.com The night of the banquet, when I warned Atom-kun about drinking…. 「Eh? But I’m 20 years old.」 「What are you saying? Aren’t you in high school?」 I suddenly thought about that mysterious room where time flew faster but it seems like even without considering that, there won’t be a problem. 「No, I’m kind of embarrassed to admit it but….you know aniki…alright, I’ll say it. I was held back a year in high school. Not just once nor twice, but thrice.」 —-idiot. There’s a genuine idiot here. Even Mayu, who knew about it, was holding back her laughter. She’s even on the verge of collapse. Incidentally, he worked part-time for school expenses and also helped with the expenses of their family. He’s a really good kid. As for me, I was quite happy that my burden at night will be finally reduced….Atom-kun is here after all. With the 10 elves, I have to do it with 15 people each night. Or rather, it was even harder because I’m attacked by multiple individuals. Sonja the hand riding rabbit, Arisa the fox beastkin, and Maria the succubus…when they’re in their mating season, even Atom-kun would be fine. However, after observing the situation for about a week, I have not seen anyone who goes to Atom-kun’s remote hut at night. I asked Sonja why— 「Everyone loves Tatsuya, of course we’ll sleep together with you nano desu yo.」 She said that with a “What are you even asking?” expression. One day, after Miyamoto was blown away. I was sitting on a tree stump, lost in thought, after finishing my farm work. —thinking about it, it all started with Miyamoto, right? Miyamoto left me here and my survival began. I ate snakes, filtered water…it was really hard at first. And then, a hand-riding rabbit came, and after that, women came after another. Everything that happened starting that time was all good for me. —and to top all of it, I gained the skill: King of the Night. The girls never stood a chance against me but still continue to attack me night after night. Life is strange. -0- 「Now….」 I got up and headed home. Then, on my way back, I saw Katya leading a group of elves going into the forest with materials. 「Hnn? What’s going on, Katya?」 「No, it’s…」 Then, in panic, Katya covered her mouth and said, 「I-i-it’s nothing!」 「Eh? What do you mean by “nothing”…?」 「I mean, go away, oniichan!」 「Eh?」 Maa, I don’t know what they are doing but let’s just go along with it. -0- So, I headed home but on the way back, I ran into Arisa, who was unloading a wardrobe case from the light truck. 「Wah! Tatsuya-niichan!」 「Hnn? What’s with that case?」 「No, this is…ano….that….areh!」 「areh?」 「It’s nothing!」 As I suspected, Arisa seemed to be in a panic. I’m sure they are hiding something. And then I thought, “Hnn? Isn’t this that pattern…?”. These guys are being suspicious again like what they did on my birthday. -0- So, I went home and asked Sonja and Ouroboros about it. They said, 『Ufufufu?I don’t know what you are talking about desu?』 『Master, I think you’re imagining things.』 Thus, there’s nothing I can do. Even though it’s already obvious…. -0- As I was wondering what to do, I noticed Atom-kun. So, I called him outside the house and made sure that no one’s around aside from me and him. When I asked him, 「No, aniki, I can’t tell you anything…」 Given his answer, I quit prying there. Maa, they’re trying to surprise me which is good. Snooping more would be inelegant. Thus, that day, I pretended to not notice anything, ate dinner, took a bath, and went to bed. The next morning— When I woke up, I saw a hand-riding rabbit… dressed up in formal attire. Anyway, it seems like she’s waiting for me to wake up. There is no one else in the bed which feels strange given the usual frivolity. And so, I was led by the hand-riding rabbit to a certain place…the place where I met Katia and the elves yesterday. -0- A few minutes later, when we were walking on a grassy path of the forest, I gasped. —this was a real surprise. I found them in pure white wedding gowns…I’m talking about my wives. This is a special wedding venue and the guests Marx and Cornelia are smiling. Also, I almost laughed at Atom-kun who’s wearing a priest’s outfit. 「But, what kind of ceremony is this, Maria?」 「According to Cornelia-sama, something that is called a sermon will be performed desu.」 「Hnn? Sermon?」 Cornelia nodded and came to me. 「According to Ouroboros, you are indulging in impure sexual relationships.」 「Impure?」 「According to what I heard, you do it every night…and it seems like you always had impure sexual intercourse with an unspecified number of people.」 「No, it’s not my fault. Rather, I’m the one who’s being assaulted.」 「Anyway, you should know how to differentiate things.」 「Differentiate?」 「Unlike Japan, polygamy is not uncommon in this world. If you get married, it won’t be impure, don’t you think so?」 「Ah…that’s true.」 Then, Sonja asked Cornelia with pure intention. 「However, why didn’t anything develop between Cornelia and Tatsuya? You don’t hate him at all, right desu?」 Hearing that, Ouroboros froze and Cornelia smiled wryly. 「Eh? Eh? What’s wrong desu?」 「Sonja, you can’t ask her that.」 「Eh? What do you mean desu?」 Cornelia shrugged her shoulders while saying “good grief”. 「It’s okay, Ouroboros.」 「But, Cornelia-sama….he is……」 Then, Cornelia looked up at the sky and looked at the distance. 「Isekai Food Guild….」 「Cornelia-sama!」 Cornelia seems to be very lonely. It’s a mystery why a name of a book came out but I can’t tsukomi given the situation. 「What do you mean, Cornelia?」 「Right. You know that I used to work at a certain restaurant, right? I had a bit of something with the restaurant owner. Anyway, I’m not going to sleep with anyone other than the man I once…manipulated.」 I see. I guess that means that the demon king also had a lot of history. However, there’s something bothering me. 「B-but Cornelia, like Atom-kun had said, you’re yes Lolita no touch…is there a man who dabbled with you even if you’re like that?」 「Of course, I’m a legal loli after all. Or rather, I was already married and already have children.」 「Seriously!?」 「Seriously. Maa, that’s an old story…what I have now are more of descendants and I’m the ancestor.」 Cornelia has a warm expression but Arisa in a wedding gown came to me. 「Tatusya-niichan! Why don’t you wear this!?」 It’s a tuxedo. -0- And, maa, just like that— The wedding ceremony was very lively. The reason why Atom-kun was the priest was because he’s a genuine sage. The vow ceremony was a bit of a mess but the kiss was amazing. After all— —Sonja —Arisa —Maria —Ouroboros —Katya —Mayu There are six of them. There was some kind of queue for the kiss and it was totally different from the wedding I know. So, as soon as I’m done kissing them, the banquet started. Cornelia was eating curry and everyone was eating and drinking. Maa, it’s the same as usual except for the clothes. It was fun as usual, happy as usual, and the food and drinks were as good as usual. And so, we ate and drank and had a great time until the night. -0- That night— When we returned home drunk and wasted, Sonja said something, 「Well, it’s our wedding night nano desu?」 Oi oi, the banquet was amazing, you know. We drank a lot more than usual and everyone was drunk. When I looked around at everyone, I saw that they were all wearing…their wedding gowns and only took off their underwear. They seem to be very motivated to do something too. 「Oi oi, you’re so drunk. Also, am I supposed to deal with all of you at once?」 To be honest, I’m already exhausted from drinking too much. When I was about to ask them to give me a break and just do it tomorrow, everyone looked at me with sad expressions. 「Tatsuya? Do you not like me nano desu?」 「Tatsuya-sama….do I disgust you?」 「Master….if you don’t like me, I won’t force myself on you.」 「Tatsuya-niichan….you don’t hate me….right?」 「Oniichan….you don’t like me? I’m sad….」 「Tatsuya-san, do you dislike me….?」 So, I had no choice but to reply. 「I don’t dislike you at all.」 The women in wedding gowns came to me. And so, the usual night goes on -0- And just like that— —it seems like my noisy slow life will continue to be happy in the future. -Nakajima Atom’s POV- My aniki is really awesome. First of all, he’s insanely strong….I mean, he’s so strong that you wouldn’t believe it. He can kill a kaiser dragon in one hit. Yes, one hit. One attack. One blow. He’s that amazing. -0- He’s also popular. Very popular. Even though he’s average-looking, he’s incredibly popular. It’s not an exaggeration to say that once he meets a beautiful woman, he’s bound to have more wives. The day he meets her will be the day he’ll say “I don’t dislike it at all.”. He’s really amazing. Yeah, right. He’s a walking harem maker. And those who are attracted to her are also amazing people. The hand-riding rabbit queen. A succubus noble. A money-hungry fox ears. A JK with sage aptitude. A young dwarf girl that can turn older or younger at will. I don’t know what is what anymore. What do you mean by a dwarf girl that can transform older or younger? I don’t want to criticize that setting since some scary people will defend it. As aniki had said, in manga, if he said “I don’t dislike it at all.” while she’s still a girl, the editor-in-chief will get mad. On the other hand, if you keep her in older form, lolicons will be disappointed. That’s why she can transform bigger or smaller. I see. So that’s why at that time, you left it to the reader’s imagination. Anyway, he’s awesome. -0- His friends are also amazing. One of them is a demon king herself. A demon king who loves curry. Moreover, she’s a legal loli. I don’t even get what’s happening anymore. He’s the demon king of curry? What do you mean? According to what I heard, aniki became as strong as a demon king around a month when he got teleported into this world —one month. Yes, within just a month, he has become one of the rulers of this world! After all, he’s at the same rank as a demon king. No no, I’m not exaggerating. That’s too terrible, right? I’m even trembling myself. -0- So, what’s the most amazing thing about him?….when I cooked something and put the wrong amount of seasoning— 「Atom-kun, this is too salty.」 「I’m sorry, aniki…」 「Well, everyone makes mistakes so don’t worry about it.」 「Eh? You’re going to eat it? You don’t have to eat that poorly cooked dish.」 「It’s not like it tastes so bad that you can’t eat it and—」 「And?」 「Atom-kun worked hard to cook it, right? The ghosts will be angry if we waste food.」 Right, ghosts will haunt those who waste food. Mayu and I laughed while saying “I miss Japan”. After hearing us, aniki laughed with us— —that’s it. Aniki is a good person. What can I say….he’s an average good person. This world is actually a dark fantasy world and almost all of those who transmigrated only experience bad things. That’s what happened to Miyamoto, that’s what happened to Mayu, and that’s what happened to me. In this bleak world, it is normal for anyone to fall into darkness. However….while we are here, both Mayu and I can laugh naturally. The reason behind it is aniki’s existence…with him as the center, kindness is spreading in this world. —that’s why I like aniki. I’ll follow him for the rest of my life. That’s what I promised myself. My farm work was done. Ouroboros prepared a cup of tea for us and we were drinking it together on the wood deck in the garden. Then, the skipping Sonja said something like this. 「She’s the Demon King Cornelia’s aide….but here, the devil marshal Ouroboros is being treated as a maid…Tatsuya is amazing nano desu?」 「Eh? Is Ouroboros actually that amazing?」 No, I know she was Cornelia’s aide. Then, Ouroboros only giggled. 「No way that’s true.」 「No, Sonja would never lie nor say nonsense.」 Well, she’s always the happy-go-lucky type. She’s the one who doesn’t care about upper or lower social positions. 「Fufufu, I may be amazing compared to the weak but among the true strong, I’m…」 No, I know you’re strong. What I want to hear is your backstory. The previous master of Ouroboros is a legal loli so she’s not very dignified. In this house, she’s completely treated like a maid. 「By the way, how many subordinates does Ouroboros used to have?」 「I’m a cadre of Cornelia-sama’s Dragon Shrine. Hmmm….I’d say there are around 20 people who are lower than me.」 「Oh? That’s surprisingly few.」 Well, what can I say? She’s just a little girl demon king who likes curry. In addition, I heard that she’s half retired so I guess she really doesn’t have much power. 「Well, there used to be a lot of servants and soldiers but now, Cornelia-sama is unarmed and frugal.」 「By the way, how many subordinates do you used to have?」 「In the Dragon Shrine, I used to have around…500000 people working full time.」 「You were that amazing?」 「I’m an aide of a demon king…in short, her direct subordinate. That much is normal.」 She has 500000 in that place alone? I see. They really seemed to have been very amazing in the past. No, but if you think about it, Cornelia is a legit demon king and if she seriously wants it, she can easily make millions of demons move. -0- Fuh, if you underestimate her just because she’s a curry lover, you’ll get beaten up. In the future, I’ll be a little more careful and add fukujinzuke to her curry. Fufufu, I can already see her smiling. 「So this Dragon Shrine is big enough to accommodate 500000 people?」 「Yeah, it’s big.」 「Well, how big is it exactly?」 「It’s about 20 kilometers from the entrance to Cornelia-sama’s bed-chamber. The site is 30 kilometers square and it includes the soldier’s quarters, maid’s quarters, tavern, and stores selling daily necessities.」 「That’s no longer a compound, that’s a city.」 「Including dragons and lizardmen, I am a reptile king. I am named Ouroboros because I am a demi-god called serpent god.」 「Demi god….amazing.」 「Cornelia-sama is not a demigod, she is, one of the 12 demon kings…an existence synonymous with god.」 「Cornelia-sama is not a demigod, she is, one of the 12 demon kings…an existence synonymous with god.」 「……all right, let’s increase her curry’s meat and not just fukujinzuke.」 「Yes? What are you talking about?」 「No, I’m talking to myself.」 We’re acting like good friends but I think I’ve actually been treating her badly. I’ve been teasing her a lot…. The other day, when I served her Hayashi rice instead of curry, she was really upset. In a certain punishment game, I pinched her cheeks…. 「Ouroboros, should I give you a little more salary or should I give you pocket money?」 「Eh? Why are you going to do that?」 「A demi god’s monthly salary is 25 pieces of silver coins(250000 yen), isn’t that bad?」 Originally, Ouroboros came to serve me as a form of punishment from Cornelia. After all, a demi-god should be properly treated as a demi-god. Then, Ouroboros giggled. 「It’s fine, master.」 「What do you mean?」 「The food here is better than the Dragon Shrine and master always gives us clothes and other gifts.」 「Maa, that’s true. But I’d be happy to give you more money if that’s alright with you.」 Ouroboros smiled and said, 「I already feel incomparably blessed to be able to serve master.」 Music to my ears. I can’t help but smile after hearing that. Morning. As soon as I wake up, sweet scent hits my nose. With my sleepy eyes, I scratch my head and sigh at the women responsible for the smell. Drowning in a sea of perfume…is there something like that? I smiled wryly as I looked at the princesses sleeping in their sexy underwear. I mean, Arisa bought perfume and underwear from the city yesterday. Then, she gave those things to these girls and I had a hard time after. 「Maria reeks more of perfume than me nano desu. Give me more nano desu.」 Said Sonja the hand-riding rabbit queen. 「Sonja is someone from the cute girl faction so perfume doesn’t suit you.」 Said Maria, the succubus. 「Yes, this is for nobles of the demon world like Maria and me…」 Said Ouroboros, the maid. 「Oneechans! I’ll be a sexy dynamite if I transformed!」 Said Katya, the dwarf girl. 「Tatsuya-san, don’t forget about me just because I am weak presence character.」 Said Mayu, the 20-year-old JK transmigrator. 「Perfume…is it? Elves don’t usually use it because it puts us at a disadvantage when hunting but that is useful at night time.」 Said the elf queen, who hasn’t appeared for a while. 「I don’t participate in your nighttime bed ritual but….hmm, I’ve missed using perfume.」 The demon king nods. By the way, she’s not my wife. 「Hey! These are the souvenirs I bought from my business trip! Thank me!」 And well, that’s the fox beastkin Arisa… Yeah, there are too many characters. And each of them has quite a thick character. That’s actually the reason why Mayu’s presence is so thin even though she has a 20-year-old JK transmigrator setting….right. -0- And so, last night, everyone went ahead and used a lot of perfume. They didn’t just empty one bottle but two bottles. Mayu and Arisa said “You only need a little bit of perfume” many times but they weren’t able to stop the idiot Sonja and since the others are muscle brains, they competed with her. I mean, Sonja sprayed it like a water gun splashing it on everyone. Ouroboros was splashed badly so she splashed back. Anyway, it became a perfume fight. After that, we had a fashion show of sexy underwear while drinking. Cornelia, who read the atmosphere, returned home… After making me wear sexy briefs….everyone attacked me…. —and now, we’re in a sea of perfume disaster. -0- The sweet smell is in the air. When I opened the closed window, my eyes met with the Fenrir, who we recently had kept as a watchdog. It sniffed and whined then ran with its tail down. 「I guess the smell of perfume is too much for it.」 The smell is certainly intense but I don’t it’s it has to go that far. Ah, but even after one night, it is still this strong so I guess it’s really pretty bad. I guess we all have to take a bath in the morning. -0- —Scene Change— -0- I asked Atom-kun to heat the drum bath for me. So, when I was taking a bath, a sleepy-eyed Sonja noticed me, took off her clothes— —And dove into the drum bath. She then hugged my right arm in the bath. 「Oi oi, Atom-kun was just here….aren’t you ashamed? He’s going to see you naked.」 「I don’t mind if I was seen by Atom desu yo. He’s like a family desu.」 「Eh? Do you really see him like that?」 「Yeah, if Tatsuya’s pet Fenrir is here, are you going to be ashamed?」 Ah, I see. That kind of family huh. 「No, that’s a terrible way to treat Atom-kun.」 「No no, everyone loves Atom-kun desu yo.」 「You mean as a pet, right?」 「He’s such a cute pet after all desu yo」 If Atom-kun hears you, he’ll cry. He’s a good guy and he respects me. I wanted Atom-kun to be happy. 「Tatsuya-niichan, didn’t you promise that you won’t love someone preferentially!」 A pouting Arisa came in— 「I’ll wash your back.」 Maria came in— 「How’s the water, master?」 Ouroboros came in— And, well, like that, everyone came into the drum bath one after another. 「You know that the bath is small and you still all came in, are you idiots?」 I shouted but the ladies acted as if they didn’t hear me. Maa, we all hustled in the drum bath that morning. —ship. We are busy fishing on a large galleon. 「I caught a seaweed nano desu?」 「I caught a shoe nano desu?」 「Fuhaha, we, hand riding rabbits….even in terms of fishing, are super first class….our talent is horrible.」 Presently, the hand riding rabbits are fishing garbage and they are very excited about it. 「Master….I’m sorry but you’ll have to excuse me from serving you personally for a while…」 Ouroboros looks like she’s seasick. And we are supposed to enjoy this ship ride. 「Has the king gone insane? How can he send little girls to subjugate the kraken…」 The captain of the ship, a man named Samson, called out to us. He is currently in charge of the sea monsters in the adventurers guild. He seemed to have been a pirate before and only belonged to the guild in certain meanings. 「What do you mean little girls…don’t you know anything about the hand riding rabbits?」 「Ah, no. I’m not that familiar about the land affairs.」 I see. I now understand his worries. 「Will you be okay? Kraken is one hell of a monster. 」 「How big is it? 」 「Well, it’s mostly tentacles…a tentacle is around 40 meters long. It will catch the ship first and then, constrict it with its tentacles like a snake.」 「Fumu fumu. 」 「Then, it will destroy the hull and sink the ship. It will eat the drowning people thrown overboard after that. 」 That’s certainly terrifying. It’s really a monster. 「It is a sea monster so….swordsmen and other melee are helpless against it. The only effective technique to deal with it is using mages and shoot it with magic from a distance. 」 「Maa, we’ll be fine so rest assured. By the way, is kraken material popular?」 From what I heard so far, it seems like we can’t rely on the hand riding rabbits this time. The muscle brain Sonja is useless too. Maria and Ouroboros can use magic…and of course, Cornelia is here. —this is an easy win no matter how I think. 「Hahaha, you are really funny. Do you really think you can get rid of the kraken?」 「That’s why we are here.」 「You were sent by the king so I guess you have something in you but the land and the sea are different. Also, it doesn’t look like there’s anyone from your party that can use magic to beat the kraken.」 「I already told you we will be fine.」 「If you get killed, the ship will be destroyed. Even I will be part of it. I’m not going to leave my life on your hands.」 「What are you trying to say?」 「When we reached the waters where the kraken resides, I’ll give you a small boat.」 「Huh?」 「If you want to die, go f*ck yourself. I don’t want to be part of it. I’m not here to babysit a bunch of kids, got it?」 He said so and sent his gaze to Cornelia, Katya, and Sonja and spat on the spot. This guy suddenly began to say something unreasonable. So, what should I do with him… 「Aniki….leave it to me.」 「Atom-kun?」 「I’ll give him a good beating.」 Atom-kun is a good boy. When he saw that we were being taunted, he did not stand by. 「Oi, captain! What’s wrong with babysitting!? That’s the best thing in the world! People like you are unforgivable!」 That’s the reason you’re mad! This guy…he’s a hardcore hentai gentleman. The kind that loves little girls. And Atom-kun grabbed the captain’s collar— —ah, he’s being beaten up. The captain was originally a muscle brain and he’s also a high rank adventurer and a former pirate. Atom-kun looks like a muscle delinquent but he’s a sage. He’s basically not good at melee. And Atom-kun came back with teary eyes. 「I have failed you, aniki….I’m sorry.」 「Maa, I think you are too hot blooded, Atom-kun.」 And then…Cornelia spoke grumpily. 「Oi, captain.」 「Ah? What is it, kid?」 「Oi oi, if Cornelia’s going to be the one to pick the fight, it won’t end well.」 「Don’t worry, I’m not going to start a fight.」 「Hnn?」 「Captain, you said that you’ll give us a small boat when we arrive in the kraken territory, right?」 「Yes, that’s right. I won’t come with you.」 「The waters where the kraken reside is…in that place, right?」 Cornelia pointed north and the captain nodded. 「Yes, that’s right.」 「There are about 20 of them gathered there in about 1 kilometer square in that place. Let’s destroy them all.」 And Cornelia pointed her palm on to the north. 「Super Maximum Magic: Level 10 Raijin!」 —lightning. A roar echoed along with a flash at the north horizon. I mean, even though it is quite far away, I could clearly see the thick lightning. No, it’s more of a cylinder since it has a radius of 100 meter. 「That’s it. If you get closer to that area, you’ll see the kraken burned by the electric current floating around. When you get back to land, don’t forget the boat you’ll give us, okay?」 Cornelia said that to the captain and wink. The captain collapsed and looked incredibly pale. This girl is really a cheat. You mean you cast lightning and sent its electric current throughout the sea within a radius of one kilometer? To think I’m as powerful as this girl…. The captain repeatedly opened and closed his mouth like a fish and finally, he managed to ask us a question. 「Y-y-y-you…..who the hell are you?」 「—a group of farmers?」